

	MOBIQUITY. TECHNOLOGIES Trademark of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.. Serial Number: 86159201 :: Trademarkia Trademarks





























































Apply Online!
Attorneys

Services 

U.S. Trademark Registration Service 
International Trademark Registration Service 
Trademark Office Action Response 
Trademark Statement of Use 
Trademark Renewal 
Trademark Assignment 
Trademark Watch 
Trademark Cease & Desist  
Trademark Comprehensive Search  
Copyright Registration 
Patent Services 
Incorporation Services 
Business Page Creation 
 More Services... 


Help
Contact Us


Login






















Trademark Search 
Trademark Category
Advertising,  Business & Retail Services
MOBIQUITY. TECHNOLOGIES










 
Get FREE email alerts













MOBIQUITY. TECHNOLOGIES  Trademark Information
 Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.
Advertising agency specializing in the design and execution of word of mouth, viral, buzz and experiential marketing programs; Advertising and marketing consultancy; Advertising and marketing services provided by means of indirect methods of marketing communications, namely, social media, search engine marketing, inquiry marketing, internet marketing, mobile marketing, blogging and other forms of passive, sharable or viral communications chann...




Perfect for these industries

Advertising,  Business & Retail Services





Words that describe this mark
advertising   agency   specializing   design   execution   word   mouth      viral      buzz   experiential   marketing   programs   advertising   marketing   consultancy   advertising   marketing   services   provided   means   indirect   methods   marketing   communications    
                                    




This is a brand page for the MOBIQUITY. TECHNOLOGIES trademark by Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. 
                                in Garden City, NY, 11530.
Write a review about a product or service associated with this MOBIQUITY. TECHNOLOGIES trademark.    
                                Or, contact the owner Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. of the MOBIQUITY. TECHNOLOGIES trademark by filing a request to communicate with    
                                the Legal Correspondent for licensing, use, and/or questions related to the MOBIQUITY. TECHNOLOGIES trademark.
                           






On Tuesday, January 7, 2014,  a U.S. federal trademark registration was filed for 
                        MOBIQUITY. TECHNOLOGIES by 
                        Mobiquity Technologies, Inc., Garden City, NY  11530.
                        The USPTO has given the MOBIQUITY. TECHNOLOGIES 
                        trademark serial  number of  86159201.  
                        The current federal status of this trademark filing is REGISTERED.
                        The correspondent listed for MOBIQUITY. TECHNOLOGIES is 
                        
                        
                                            MOBIQUITY TECHNOLOGIES, INC. of 
                                            600 OLD COUNTRY RD STE 541,  GARDEN CITY, NY 11530-2054,  
                                .
                            The MOBIQUITY. TECHNOLOGIES trademark is filed in the category of 
                            
                                    Advertising,  Business & Retail Services
                                . 
                            The description provided to the USPTO for MOBIQUITY. TECHNOLOGIES 
                            is Advertising agency specializing in the design and execution of word of mouth, viral, buzz and experiential marketing programs; Advertising and marketing consultancy; Advertising and marketing services provided by means of indirect methods of marketing communications, namely, social media, search engine marketing, inquiry marketing, internet marketing, mobile marketing, blogging and other forms of passive, sharable or viral communications channels; Advertising and marketing services, namely, promoting the goods and services of others; Advertising services, namely, promoting and marketing the goods and services of others in the field of marketing via print and electronic media; Advertising services, namely, promoting and marketing the goods and services of others through all public communication means; Advertising, marketing and promoting the goods and services of others using kiosks; Advertising, marketing and promotion services in the field of marketing; Advertising, marketing and promotional services related to all industries for the purpose of facilitating networking and socializing opportunities for business purposes; Advertising, marketing, and promoting the goods and services of others via marketing; Advice in the field of business management and marketing; Affiliate marketing; Arranging and conducting marketing promotional events for others; Assistance, advisory services and consultancy with regard to business planning, business analysis, business management, business organization, marketing and customer analysis; Branding services, namely, consulting, development, management and marketing of brands for businesses and/or individuals; Business advice and analysis of markets; Business consultation and management regarding marketing activities and launching of new products; Business management and consulting services for the health care industry, namely, customer service, accounting services, and marketing services; Business management and consulting services for the health care industry, namely, customer service, accounting services, and web-based advertising and marketing services; Business marketing consulting services; Business marketing services; Business monitoring and consulting services, namely, tracking web sites and applications of others to provide strategy, insight, marketing, sales, operation, product design, particularly specializing in the use of analytic and statistic models for the understanding and predicting of consumers, businesses, and market trends and actions; Consultation services, namely, creative and strategic consultation regarding development and production of marketing campaigns for others; Custom writing services comprising public relations and marketing materials for the audio, video and technology industries; Development of marketing strategies and concepts; Development of marketing strategies, concepts and tactics, namely, audience development, brand awareness, customer relations, online community building and digital word of mouth communications; Direct marketing advertising for others; Direct marketing consulting services; Direct marketing services; Entertainment marketing services, namely, marketing, promotion and advertising for independent recording artists; Entertainment marketing services, namely, marketing, promotion and advertising for recording and performing artists; Event planning and management for marketing, branding, promoting or advertising the goods and services of others. 
                            





Word mark:
 MOBIQUITY. TECHNOLOGIES


  Status/Status Date:  


REGISTERED

9/8/2015



  Serial Number:  
86159201


  Filing Date:  
1/7/2014


 Registration Number:  
4806413 


 Registration Date:  
9/8/2015


 Goods and Services: 
Advertising agency specializing in the design and execution of word of mouth, viral, buzz and experiential marketing programs; Advertising and marketing consultancy; Advertising and marketing services provided by means of indirect methods of marketing communications, namely, social media, search engine marketing, inquiry marketing, internet marketing, mobile marketing, blogging and other forms of passive, sharable or viral communications channels; Advertising and marketing services, namely, promoting the goods and services of others; Advertising services, namely, promoting and marketing the goods and services of others in the field of marketing via print and electronic media; Advertising services, namely, promoting and marketing the goods and services of others through all public communication means; Advertising, marketing and promoting the goods and services of others using kiosks; Advertising, marketing and promotion services in the field of marketing; Advertising, marketing and promotional services related to all industries for the purpose of facilitating networking and socializing opportunities for business purposes; Advertising, marketing, and promoting the goods and services of others via marketing; Advice in the field of business management and marketing; Affiliate marketing; Arranging and conducting marketing promotional events for others; Assistance, advisory services and consultancy with regard to business planning, business analysis, business management, business organization, marketing and customer analysis; Branding services, namely, consulting, development, management and marketing of brands for businesses and/or individuals; Business advice and analysis of markets; Business consultation and management regarding marketing activities and launching of new products; Business management and consulting services for the health care industry, namely, customer service, accounting services, and marketing services; Business management and consulting services for the health care industry, namely, customer service, accounting services, and web-based advertising and marketing services; Business marketing consulting services; Business marketing services; Business monitoring and consulting services, namely, tracking web sites and applications of others to provide strategy, insight, marketing, sales, operation, product design, particularly specializing in the use of analytic and statistic models for the understanding and predicting of consumers, businesses, and market trends and actions; Consultation services, namely, creative and strategic consultation regarding development and production of marketing campaigns for others; Custom writing services comprising public relations and marketing materials for the audio, video and technology industries; Development of marketing strategies and concepts; Development of marketing strategies, concepts and tactics, namely, audience development, brand awareness, customer relations, online community building and digital word of mouth communications; Direct marketing advertising for others; Direct marketing consulting services; Direct marketing services; Entertainment marketing services, namely, marketing, promotion and advertising for independent recording artists; Entertainment marketing services, namely, marketing, promotion and advertising for recording and performing artists; Event planning and management for marketing, branding, promoting or advertising the goods and services of others


 Mark Description: 
The mark consists of a dot or circle before capital "M" and after the "Y" in word "MOBIQUITY" with the word  "TECHNOLOGIES" under the word "MOBIQUITY"


 Type Of Mark: 
Service Mark


 Published For Opposition Date: 
6/23/2015


Last Applicant/Owner:

Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.Garden City, NY  11530
Why is this contact information displayed?  

Why is this contact information displayed? [Close]
The USPTO makes this data available for search by the public so that individuals can locate ownership information for intellectual property, much the same way a county might make real estate property ownership information available.
Since our website is synchronized with the USPTO data, we recommend making any data changes with the USPTO directly. Our website will auto-update when the USPTO data is updated.
You may also contact Trademarkia to make a request for the removal of your personally identifiable information or trademark data.  Such requests must be made in writing and will be subject to verification of ownership.  This policy allows verified trademark owners to specify: (A) that their identifiable information be masked, or (B) that their trademark pages permanently deleted from Trademarkia.com.  
                                                Requests may be made directly to customer.service@trademarkia.com and every effort will be made to honor them within 48 hours. 
Click here for further details.
[Close]




 Mark Drawing Code:  
Drawing/Design + Words


 Design Search: 
See Similar Logos >>



                                                    Plain single line circles  (Geometric figures and solids   -  Coding and searching guide) see more design...


                                                    Circles that are totally or partially shaded. (Geometric figures and solids   -  Coding and searching guide) see more design...




Register Type:  
Principal


 Disclaimer:
 ("TECHNOLOGIES")


 Correspondent:


MOBIQUITY TECHNOLOGIES, INC.
600 OLD COUNTRY RD STE 541
GARDEN CITY, NY 11530-2054







 Use in Commerce Trademark - Applicant has provided proof of use of this mark in commerce to USPTO.





Classification Information



Primary Class: 
 Class (035) - Advertising; business management; business administration; office functions. 


First Use Anywhere: 
9/1/2013


First Use In Commerce: 
9/1/2013





Trademarkia is the largest search engine for U.S. trademarks.  Each month hundreds of trademarks around the world are filed by licensed attorneys in the LegalForce/Trademarkia network! You can register your trademark in 170+ countries in the world through LegalForce Network.
 LegalForce Network can help you incorporate a business around your MOBIQUITY. TECHNOLOGIES trademark in less than 5 minutes.  Trademarkia makes the process easy and convenient, so start now!
 Trademarkia.com is a free search engine of publicly available government records.  Trademarkia.com is not a law firm and does not represent owners & correspondents listed on this page.
Trademark Document Retrieval >>







Trademark - Apply Online!


100% Satisfaction Guarantee protect your valuable brand now.



How it works?
What you get?






1. Legalforce RAPC - #1 U.S. Trademark Filing from 2010 to now.
2. Describe how your business or product is being used. Register your mark in 176+ countries. Just $199 + govt fees! Start here >>






1. Top Global IP Attorneys - Credibility and Experience!
2. All processes will be performed in a timely manner. You will be informed periodically about the process.






Keep Track of this Brand.

 Trademark Watch Services
Keep track of how your trademark is being used. Available in the United States and in more than 176 countries. Round-the-clock monitoring. Monthly report on potential infringement.
                                

Watch this Trademark 

Trademark Watch Services read more...

Current Trademark Status:

9/8/2015
REGISTERED


Free Trademark Search:






Correspondent Search:



MOBIQUITY TECHNOLOGIES, INC.


                                             
                                         is a correspondent of MOBIQUITY. TECHNOLOGIES trademark. 
                            	    


Current Overall Rating:

 (0 review)
                            
What You Can Do:




Start Your Business



FREE Logo Creator



Add to Favorites



View Documents



FREE Trademark Search



Start Trademark Filing Process



Protect this Mark Internationally



Custom Logo Design $159



Search mobiquitytechnologie on popular social networks






                                Trademarkia lets you see how your 
                                personal name, product name, 
                                trademark name or username is being used on any of 530+ new 
                                and popular social networks.  
                                Be the first to reserve your name  and get help stopping others from using it - all in one place!















Trademark Oppose Service


You can request for Extension of Time to Oppose this mark or Oppose it now.



                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 







Status Update Alerts

Status Update Alerts are email updates of the latest trademark status change. Please make sure you provide the correct email. 


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 









Review & Rating

Please Rate and Review for MOBIQUITY. TECHNOLOGIES 




MOBIQUITY. TECHNOLOGIES is providing Advertising agency specializing in the design and execution of word of mouth, viral, buzz and experiential marketing programs; Advertising and marketing consultancy; Advertising and marketing services provided by means of indirect methods of marketing communications, namely, social media, search engine marketing, inquiry marketing, internet marketing, mobile marketing, blogging and other forms of passive, sharable or viral communications channels; Advertising and marketing services, namely, p....
                


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password to be associated with your review.
                 

                 If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password before posting your review.
                 


* Please Rate: 


     




* Your Review: 



 Please enter your review.



* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



 

  
                             



 
























Mobiquity Inc










































































About
Services
Careers
Contact











Alexa
AWS
Case Studies
Blog






























We create compelling digital experiences.

















WHAT WE DO


Every business has an engagement opportunity.


Mobiquity is a digital engagement provider that helps the world’s leading brands show they care to the people who matter most. Our collective team of consultants, designers, developers, cloud advisors, and data scientists is driven by the human experience. It leads us to the “why” for your users, the “how” for your business today, and the “what could be” of tomorrow.














Services
We offer end-to-end services to help our clients envision, deliver, and continuously improve digital experiences that show their users they really care.




Strategy
Define your strategy and design your business
Experience Design
Envision multi-channel experiences through research and design
Product Engineering
Develop innovative software products leveraging Agile processes
Cloud Services
Gain scalability and flexibility with the power of AWS
Analytics
Use data to drive better experiences and inform future decisions

















Featured Podcast
Talking Alexa: A Podcast From Mobiquity's Global Alexa Lab
Voice-Plus
Listen Now







Our Global Lab for Amazon Alexa is helping brands to find their voice with voice-plus innovation.
Learn More










As an AWS Premier Consulting Partner, we re-envision engagement for your customers and employees.
Learn More








Featured Blog
Contextual Experiences That Drive In-App Conversion
Thought Leadership
Read More












Clients







































Featured Case Study
Nestlé

Strategy Experience Design Product Engineering Cloud Services  AWS Alexa






Bringing Voice-Plus to the Kitchen
Find Out How















Work With Us
Our global team is committed to creative collaboration, innovation excellence, and embracing the diverse perspectives that drive success.

























About
Mobiquity is a digital engagement provider for the world’s leading brands. We create compelling digital experiences to help you show you care to the people who matter most.
Read More



Blog















A New Way To Eat Fresh? Subway Introduces Self-Serve Kiosks
Read More



















Mobiquity’s Joel Evans To Talk Voice At Innovation Congress 2017
Read More



















Mobiquity Team Receives Second Place in Global AI Hackathon
Read More







Latest Tweets


Tweets by @mobiquityinc

Follow Us On Twitter








© 2017 Mobiquity Inc., all rights reserved. | Privacy Policy







































Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.                                                                                             - Garden City                                       , NY         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



NY



Garden City



Advertising Agencies



Advertising Agencies



                            Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.
                                    



 





















M 


Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.                                                                                            
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



600 OLD COUNTRY RD RM 541 GARDEN CITY, NY 11530
Get Directions



(516) 256-7766
www.acemarketing.net                                                                                    





Business Info



 Founded 1998
 Incorporated NY
 Annual Revenue $2,491,875.00
 Employee Count 30
 Industries Advertising Agencies
 Contacts Michael D Trepeta                                                                                                       







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.                                                                                             was founded in 1998. The company is located in Garden City and incorporated in New York. Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.                                                                                             specializes in Advertising Agencies. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







M

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.



















News on Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.


























































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology















                                Organization                            


                                        Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.                                        ▼





                                Topic                            


                                        All Topics                                        ▼








People

                                    Find news about people
                                





Alumni

                                Find news on alumni of any org
                            





Industries

                                Find news on a particular market
                            





Your Contacts

                                Find news on your contacts
                            








Sign up for free daily alerts on this feed:











By pressing Sign Up, you agree to our Terms of Use, Privacy Policy, and the LexisNexis Terms & Conditions


















Follow




                            Change Feed
                        


Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.











Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. filed form 10-Q


                                May 16, 2017                                 • 
                                SEC                            










Mobiquity Networks Joins PlaceWise Media's Active Shopper Exchange (ASX)


                                April 27, 2017                                 • 
                                GlobeNewswire                            


                                  ... mobile location data and marketing company and wholly owned subsidiary of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (OTCQB:MOBQ), has announced an agreement with PlaceWise Media to join the ...
                                









Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. filed form 10-K


                                April 14, 2017                                 • 
                                SEC                            










Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. reported raising $1.6M in a private placement filing on March 7, 2017


                                March 9, 2017                                 • 
                                RelSci Data Update                            










Mobiquity Networks Adds New App Partner to its Publisher Network 


                                December 13, 2016                                 • 
                                ICT Monitor Worldwide                            


                                  ... (GlobeNewswire) - Mobiquity Technologies Inc. (OTCBB:MOBQ), wholly owned subsidiary, Mobiquity Networks, a next generation location marketing ...
                                









Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. filed form 10-Q


                                December 9, 2016                                 • 
                                SEC                            










Mobiquity Networks Partners with Beauty App Perfect365 to Reach Cosmetics and Retail Shoppers


                                November 2, 2016                                 • 
                                GlobeNewswire                            


                                  ... advertising beacons in the US and a wholly owned subsidiary of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (OTCQB:MOBQ), announced today it has partnered with beauty app Perfect365, the ...
                                









Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. filed form 10-Q


                                August 22, 2016                                 • 
                                SEC                            










Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. filed form 10-Q


                                May 16, 2016                                 • 
                                SEC                            










Screenvision Media Unveils "Connected Cinema" Experience To Elevate The Impact Of Brand Storytelling At Upfront Event


                                May 13, 2016                                 • 
                                PR Newswire                            


                                  ... data to information gathered through mobile technology alliances with SITO Mobile, Mobiquity Networks (OTCBB: MOBQ) and Gimbal, will augment insights and enhance on-screen targeting. To ...
                                









Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. filed form 10-K


                                March 30, 2016                                 • 
                                SEC                            










Mobiquity Networks' Publisher Network Now Includes Apps Aggregating More Than 50 Million Downloads


                                March 23, 2016                                 • 
                                GlobeNewswire                            


                                  ... beacons in the United States and a wholly owned subsidiary of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (OTCQB:MOBQ), today announced that its mobile app publisher network has reached ...
                                









Mobiquity Networks Announces -Mobiquity Entertainment Network' To Deliver Beacon-Triggered Movie Studio Promotions


                                March 17, 2016                                 • 
                                GlobeNewswire                            


                                  ... beacons in the United States and a wholly owned subsidiary of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (OTCQB:MOBQ), today announced its highly specialized mobile advertising network offering €“ ...
                                









Mobiquity Networks Delivers Results for Advertisers With Successful Holiday Campaigns


                                February 23, 2016                                 • 
                                GlobeNewswire                            


                                  ... beacons in the United States and a wholly owned subsidiary of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (OTCQB:MOBQ), today announced results from a series of paid holiday season ...
                                









Mobiquity Networks Announces Compliance With Google's Latest Eddystone Beacon for Chrome


                                February 18, 2016                                 • 
                                GlobeNewswire                            


                                  ... beacons in the United States and a wholly owned subsidiary of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (OTCQB:MOBQ), announced today that its beacons are now compliant with Google's ...
                                









Mobiquity Networks Creates Movie Theater-Based Mobile Advertising Network with Screenvision


                                January 28, 2016                                 • 
                                GlobeNewswire                            


                                  ... 2016 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Mobiquity Networks, a wholly owned subsidiary of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (OTCQB:MOBQ), the largest network of retail mall-based mobile advertising beacons in ...
                                









Mobiquity Networks Partners With Shopular to Deliver a Smarter Shopping Experience


                                November 17, 2015                                 • 
                                GlobeNewswire                            


                                  ... 2015 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Mobiquity Networks, a wholly owned subsidiary of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (OTCQB:MOBQ), which owns and operates a leading national location-based mobile advertising ...
                                









Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. filed form 10-Q


                                November 13, 2015                                 • 
                                SEC                            










Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. filed form 10-Q


                                August 14, 2015                                 • 
                                SEC                            










OTC Markets Group Welcomes Newly Verified OTCQB Companies


                                May 6, 2015                                 • 
                                ENP Newswire                            


                                  ... New London, and West Lebanon, New Hampshire and in Norwich, Vermont. Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (OTCQB: MOBQ) - Mobiquity Technologies is a location-based mobile technology company ...
                                









US lenders to benefit from Bluetooth beacons


                                February 18, 2015                                 • 
                                Global Banking News                            


                                  ... banking apps after a deal was signed between Bluetooth beacon network operator, Mobiquity Technologies, and Relevant Solutions, a supplier of in-store shopping content to financial ...
                                









Simon And Mobiquity Technologies To Expand iBeacon Network Nationwide, Creating Opportunity For New Level Of Connection Between Shoppers And Retailers


                                August 4, 2014                                 • 
                                PR Newswire                            


                                  ... Nationwide, Creating Opportunity For New Level Of Connection Between Shoppers And Retailers. Mobiquity's iBeacon solution enables location-aware content and personalized engagement between consumers and their ...
                                









Mobiquity Technologies Enters Into a $15 Million Common Stock Purchase Agreement with Aspire Capital Fund, LLC


                                April 1, 2014                                 • 
                                Business Wire                            


                                  ... $15 Million Common Stock Purchase Agreement with Aspire Capital Fund, LLC . Mobiquity Technologies Enters Into a $15 Million Common Stock Purchase Agreement with Aspire ...
                                









Mobiquity Technologies Releases its SDK and Unveils the Largest Shopping Mall-Based Beacon Network in the Nation for Retailers and Brands


                                March 26, 2014                                 • 
                                Business Wire                            


                                  ... Shopping Mall-Based Beacon Network in the Nation for Retailers and Brands . Mobiquity Technologies Releases its SDK and Unveils the Largest Shopping Mall-Based Beacon Network ...
                                









Mobiquity Technologies Tapped To Promote Divergent via National Bluetooth Network


                                March 4, 2014                                 • 
                                Business Wire                            


                                  ... Mobiquity Technologies Tapped To Promote Divergent via National Bluetooth Network . Mobiquity Technologies Tapped To Promote Divergent via National Bluetooth Network Mobiquity Technologies , ...
                                







Related News Feeds






Board and Executive Moves involving Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.







Advertising & Marketing







Board and Executive Moves in Advertising & Marketing







Alumni of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.

























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink



 






Want to see the full history of news or view news on a particular date? Upgrade to RelSci Professional now!


Start My Free Trial  ➤










 Industry:




 Select a Topic:



 Keyword:



Go  ➤









 Find an Organization:






 Select a Topic:




 Keyword:




Go  ➤









 Find a Person:






 Select a Topic:




 Keyword:




Go  ➤









 Name of a School:







 Or Name of an Organization:









 Select a Topic:




 Keyword:




Go  ➤








Thank you. You are now subscribed.Please wait for the page to refresh...










You are now subscribed to this feed.










You have unsubscribed to this feed.










Thank you. You can now subscribe to more RelSci news feeds.










 To subscribe to more than one feed, please enter a password.




 Please confirm your password



Go  ➤








You've found a premium RelSci Pro feature!



Follow News On Your Contacts

Upgrade to RelSci Pro now to easily sync your contacts and stay in the know on the news about the people important to you.


Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.



Not Now








You've found a premium RelSci Pro feature!



Search News On Keywords

Curate your news even further with the ability to filter feeds based on specific keywords mentioned in the articles.


Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.



Not Now













Industries

                        Find news on a particular market
                    





People

                        Find news about people
                    





Organizations

                        Find news about organizations
                    





Alumni

                        Find news on alumni of any org
                    





Your Contacts

                        Find news on your contacts
                    












                Free Daily Alerts
            


                Sign up for free daily alerts on this feed
            




Sign Up ➤

                    By pressing Sign Up, you agree to our Terms of Use, Privacy Policy, and the LexisNexis Terms & Conditions




                Already have an account?  Click here to login.















Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤













Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. 10-Q May. 16, 2017  5:22 PM | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (MOBQ)FORM 10-Q | Quarterly ReportMay. 16, 2017  5:22 PM|About: Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (MOBQ)View as PDF

 Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (Form: 10-Q, Received: 05/16/2017 17:25:06) 












	SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION

	WASHINGTON, D.C. 20549




	 




	FORM 10-Q




	 




	QUARTERLY REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION
	13 OR 15(D) OF THE

	SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934




	 




	FOR THE QUARTERLY PERIOD ENDED MARCH
	31, 2017




	 





	COMMISSION FILE NUMBER: 000-51160




	 





	MOBIQUITY TECHNOLOGIES, INC.



	(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)


	 






	NEW YORK




	 




	11-3427886







	(State of jurisdiction of Incorporation)



	 



	(I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)






	 




	600 OLD COUNTRY ROAD, SUITE 541

	GARDEN CITY, NY 11530



	(Address of principal executive offices)


	 



	(516) 256-7766



	(Registrant's telephone number)


	 


	(Former name,
	address and fiscal year, if changed since last report)


	 


	Indicate by check mark whether the registrant
	(1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding
	12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports) and (2) has been subject to such filing
	requirements for the past 90 days.


	Yes ☒    No ☐


	 


	Indicate by checkmark whether the registrant
	has submitted electronically and posted on its corporate website, if any, every Interactive Data File required to be submitted
	pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T during the 12 preceding months (or such shorter period that the registrant was required
	to submit and post such file).


	Yes ☒    No ☐


	 




	Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated
	filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the definitions
	of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer”, “smaller reporting company”, and “emerging
	growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act. (Check one)


	 




	 



	Large accelerated filer 

	o





	Accelerated filer 

	o






	 



	Non-accelerated filer 

	o





	Smaller reporting company 

	x






	 



	Emerging growth company 

	o




	 




	 


	If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the
	registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards
	provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.

	o





	 


	Indicate by check mark whether the
	registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act).


	Yes ☐    No ☒


	 


	As of May 15, 2017, the registrant had a total of 191,421,390
	shares of Common Stock outstanding.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	 



	 







	 




	 



	MOBIQUITY TECHNOLOGIES, INC.




	 




	FORM 10-Q QUARTERLY REPORT




	TABLE OF CONTENTS




	 





	 


	 


	PAGE


	 




	PART I. FINANCIAL INFORMATION


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Item 1. Financial Statements (Unaudited)


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets as of March 31, 2017 (unaudited) and December 31, 2016 (audited)



	 


	 


	3


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations for the Three Months Ended March 31, 2017 and March 31, 2016 (unaudited)



	 


	 


	4


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Condensed Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Three Months Ended March 31, 2017 and March 31, 2016 (unaudited)



	 


	 


	5


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Notes to Condensed Financial Statements (unaudited)



	 


	 


	6


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Item 2. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations



	 


	 


	19


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Item 3 Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures



	 


	 


	25


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Item 4. Controls and Procedures



	 


	 


	25


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	PART II. OTHER INFORMATION


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Item 1. Legal Proceedings



	 


	 


	26


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Item la. Risk Factors



	 


	 


	26


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Item 2. Changes in Securities



	 


	 


	26


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Item 3. Defaults Upon Senior Securities



	 


	 


	26


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures



	 


	 


	26


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Item 5. Other Information



	 


	 


	26


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	Item 6. Exhibits and Reports on Form 8-K



	 


	 


	27


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	SIGNATURES



	 


	 


	29


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	2



	 







	 




	 


	 












	MOBIQUITY




	TECHNOLOGIES, INC.




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 






	Condensed Consolidated Balance Sheets


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	 




	 




	March 31,




	 




	 




	December 31,




	 






	 




	 




	2017




	 




	 




	2016




	 






	 




	 




	Unaudited




	 




	 




	Audited




	 





	Assets


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Current Assets:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash and cash equivalents


	 


	$


	921,828


	 


	 


	$


	213,184


	 




	Accounts receivable, net


	 


	 


	218,001


	 


	 


	 


	298,928


	 




	Inventory, net


	 


	 


	85,236


	 


	 


	 


	79,291


	 




	Prepaid expenses and other current assets


	 


	 


	19,304


	 


	 


	 


	38,929


	 




	Total Current Assets


	 


	 


	1,244,369


	 


	 


	 


	630,332


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Property and equipment, net


	 


	 


	9,121


	 


	 


	 


	15,392


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Intangible assets, net


	 


	 


	29,967


	 


	 


	 


	37,117


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Other assets


	 


	 


	36,876


	 


	 


	 


	43,332


	 




	Total Assets


	 


	$


	1,320,333


	 


	 


	$


	726,173


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Liabilities and Stockholders' Deficit


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Current Liabilities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Accounts payable


	 


	$


	738,775


	 


	 


	$


	914,697


	 




	Accrued expenses


	 


	 


	547,128


	 


	 


	 


	1,161,628


	 




	Derivative liability


	 


	 


	1,797,007


	 


	 


	 


	350,700


	 




	Convertible promissory notes, net


	 


	 


	362,258


	 


	 


	 


	10,832,275


	 




	Total Current Liabilities


	 


	 


	3,445,168


	 


	 


	 


	13,259,300


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Long-term portion of convertible promissory notes, net


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Total Liabilities


	 


	 


	3,445,168


	 


	 


	 


	13,259,300


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	AAA Preferred Stock, $.0001 par value; 5,000,000 shares authorized 1,122,588 and zero shares
	issued and outstanding at March 31,2017 and December 31, 2016, respectively


	 


	 


	11,854,063


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Stockholders' Deficit:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Preferred Stock, $.0001 par value; 5,000,000 shares authorized, zero and 240,000 shares issued and outstanding at March 31, 2017 and December 31, 2016, respectively


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	25


	 




	Common stock, $.0001 par value; 500,000,000 shares authorized; 191,421,390 and 99,020,103 shares issued and outstanding at March 31, 2017, and December 31, 2016, respectively


	 


	 


	19,153


	 


	 


	 


	9,913


	 




	Additional paid-in capital


	 


	 


	43,925,693


	 


	 


	 


	38,652,075


	 




	Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss)


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	(13,047


	)




	Subscription receivable


	 


	 


	(456,504


	)


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Accumulated deficit


	 


	 


	(57,467,240


	)


	 


	 


	(51,182,093


	)




	Total Stockholders' Deficit


	 


	 


	(13,978,898


	)


	 


	 


	(12,533,127


	)




	Total Liabilities and Stockholders' Deficit


	 


	$


	1,320,333


	 


	 


	$


	726,173


	 





	 


	 










	See notes to condensed consolidated financial statements.       




	 








	 



	3



	 







	 




	 






	 


	 


	 


	MOBIQUITY






	TECHNOLOGIES, INC.






	 


	 


	 


	 






	Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations 


	 


	 








	Three Months Ended March 31,


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	 


	 


	 


	Unaudited


	 


	 


	 


	Unaudited


	 




	Revenues


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Product revenue


	 


	$


	352,332


	 


	 


	$


	458,050


	 




	Service revenue


	 


	 


	81,787


	 


	 


	 


	59,182


	 




	 


	 


	 


	434,119


	 


	 


	 


	517,232


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cost of Revenues


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cost of product revenue


	 


	 


	334,276


	 


	 


	 


	453,396


	 




	Cost of service revenue


	 


	 


	96,292


	 


	 


	 


	108,193


	 




	 


	 


	 


	430,568


	 


	 


	 


	561,589


	 




	Gross Profit


	 


	 


	3,551


	 


	 


	 


	(44,357


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Operating Expenses:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Selling, general and administrative


	 


	 


	1,860,195


	 


	 


	 


	2,521,308


	 




	Total Operating Expenses


	 


	 


	1,860,195


	 


	 


	 


	2,521,308


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Loss from Operations


	 


	 


	(1,856,644


	)


	 


	 


	(2,565,665


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Other Income (Expense):


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Interest expense


	 


	 


	(1,133,933


	)


	 


	 


	(630,027


	)




	Interest income


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	1


	 




	Change in derivatives


	 


	 


	462,193


	 


	 


	 


	219,338


	 




	Derivative expense


	 


	 


	(1,038,439


	)


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Loss on extinguishment of debt


	 


	 


	(2,706,197


	)


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Impairment of intangible assets


	 


	 


	(12,127


	)


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Total Other Income (Expense)


	 


	 


	(4,428,503


	)


	 


	 


	(410,688


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net Loss


	 


	 


	(6,285,147


	)


	 


	$


	(2,976,353


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)


	 


	 


	13,047


	 


	 


	 


	(20,042


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net Comprehensive Loss


	 


	$


	(6,272,100


	)


	 


	$


	(2,996,395


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net Loss Per Common Share:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Basic and Diluted


	 


	$


	(0.06


	)


	 


	$


	(0.04


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Weighted Average Common Shares Outstanding:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Basic and Diluted


	 


	 


	111,234,302


	 


	 


	 


	80,061,939


	 





	 




	See notes to condensed consolidated financial statements.                




	 








	 



	4



	 







	 




	 








	 


	 


	 


	MOBIQUITY






	 TECHNOLOGIES, INC.






	 


	 


	 


	 






	Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows


	 


	 


	 








	Three Months Ended March 31,


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash Flows from Operating Activities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net loss


	 


	$


	(6,285,147


	)


	 


	$


	(2,976,353


	)




	Adjustments to reconcile net loss to net cash used in operating activities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Depreciation Expense


	 


	 


	78


	 


	 


	 


	30,628


	 




	Amortization - Intangible Assets


	 


	 


	7,150


	 


	 


	 


	7,150


	 




	Amortization - Debt discount


	 


	 


	641,363


	 


	 


	 


	525,279


	 




	Stock issued for services


	 


	 


	314,310


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Change in derivative instrument


	 


	 


	(462,193


	)


	 


	 


	(219,338


	)




	Stock-based compensation


	 


	 


	273,092


	 


	 


	 


	183,785


	 




	Initial derivative expense


	 


	 


	1,038,439


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Loss on extinguishment of debt


	 


	 


	2,706,197


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Loss on disposal of assets


	 


	 


	12,241


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Common stock issued for services


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	97,800


	 




	Expenses paid from note


	 


	 


	567,737


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Changes in operating assets and liabilities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Accounts receivable


	 


	 


	80,927


	 


	 


	 


	37,908


	 




	Inventory


	 


	 


	(5,945


	)


	 


	 


	(8,856


	)




	Prepaid expenses and other assets


	 


	 


	20,033


	 


	 


	 


	21,911


	 




	Accounts payable


	 


	 


	(167,543


	)


	 


	 


	21,730


	 




	Accrued expenses and other current liabilities


	 


	 


	(81,554


	)


	 


	 


	36,632


	 




	Accrued interest


	 


	 


	345,515


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Total adjustments


	 


	 


	5,289,848


	 


	 


	 


	734,629


	 




	Net Cash Used in Operating Activities


	 


	 


	(995,300


	)


	 


	 


	(2,241,724


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash Flows from Investing Activities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Purchase of property and equipment


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	(4,430


	)




	Net Cash Used in Investing Activities


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	(4,430


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash Flows from Financing Activities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Proceeds from the issuance of notes, net


	 


	 


	1,300,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Proceeds received from exercising warrants


	 


	 


	95,834


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Proceeds from issuance of common stock


	 


	 


	311,250


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Cash paid on accrued interest


	 


	 


	(3,140


	)


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Proceeds for the issuance of preferred stock


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	400,000


	 




	Net Cash Provided by Financing Activities


	 


	 


	1,703,944


	 


	 


	 


	400,000


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net change in Cash and Cash Equivalents


	 


	 


	708,644


	 


	 


	 


	(1,846,154


	)




	Cash and Cash Equivalents, beginning of period


	 


	 


	213,184


	 


	 


	 


	2,044,662


	 




	Change in foreign currency


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	(20,042


	)




	Cash and Cash Equivalents, end of period


	 


	$


	921,828


	 


	 


	$


	178,466


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Supplemental Disclosure Information:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash paid for interest


	 


	$



	–



	 


	 


	$


	38,075


	 




	Cash paid for taxes


	 



	$




	–



	 


	 


	$


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Non-cash Financing and Investing Activities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Stock issued for interest


	 



	$




	670,631



	 


	 


	$


	35,215


	 




	Conversion of note and interest into AAA Preferred
	and Common Stock


	 



	$




	12,749,771



	 


	 


	$


	–


	 





	 


	See notes to condensed consolidated financial statements.




	 


	 








	 



	5



	 







	 






	MOBIQUITY TECHNOLOGIES, INC.







	NOTES TO CONDENSED CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS



	THREE MONTHS ENDED MARCH 31, 2017 AND 2016



	(UNAUDITED)




	 




	NOTE 1: SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING
	POLICIES




	 



	NATURE OF OPERATIONS – On September
	10, 2013, Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. changed its name from Ace Marketing & Promotions, Inc. “the Company” or
	“Mobiquity”). We operate through two wholly-owned U.S. subsidiaries, namely, Mobiquity Networks, Inc. and Ace Marketing
	& Promotions, Inc. Mobiquity Networks owns 100% of Mobiquity Wireless S.L.U, a company incorporated in Spain. This corporation
	had an office in Spain to support our U.S. operations, which office was closed in the fourth quarter of 2016.


	 


	We operate a national location-based mobile
	advertising network that has developed a consumer-focused proximity network which we believe is unlike any other in the United
	States. Our integrated suite of proprietary location based mobile advertising technologies allows clients to execute more personalized
	and contextually relevant experiences, driving brand awareness and incremental revenue.


	 


	Mobiquity Technologies, Inc., a New York
	corporation (OTCQB: MOBQ). Through its wholly-owned subsidiary, Mobiquity Networks, Inc. has evolved and grown from a mobile advertising
	technology company focused on Driving Awareness and Foot-traffic throughout its indoor mall-based beacon network, into a next generation
	mobile location data and marketing company. The Company provides precise unique, at-scale location based data and insights on consumer’s
	real world behavior and trends for use in marketing and research. With our combined exclusive data sets of shopping malls, premium
	outlets and cinemas beacon data, and first party location data via our advanced Software Development Kit (SDK) utilizing multiple
	geo-location technologies; Mobiquity Networks provides one of the most accurate and scaled solution for mobile data collection
	and analysis. This should create several additional revenue streams, including, but not limited to; Push Notification Campaigns,
	Re-targeting Campaigns,

	Data Provision,

	Audience Profiles, Attribution Reporting and
	Custom Research.


	 


	Ace Marketing is our legacy marketing and
	promotions business which provides integrated marketing services to our commercial customers. While Ace Marketing currently represents
	substantially all of our revenue, we anticipate that activity from Ace Marketing will represent a diminishing portion of corporate
	revenue as our attention is now principally focused on developing and executing on opportunities in our Mobiquity Networks business.


	 


	GOING CONCERN - The accompanying consolidated
	financial statements have been prepared assuming the Company will continue as a going concern. The Company's continued existence
	is dependent upon the Company's ability to obtain additional debt and/or equity financing to advance its new technology revenue
	stream. The Company has incurred losses for the three months ended March 31, 2017. As of March 31, 2017, the Company has an accumulated
	deficit of $57,467,240. The Company has had negative cash flows from operating activities of $995,300 for the three months ended March
	31, 2017. These factors raise substantial doubt about the ability of the Company to continue as a going concern.


	 


	Management has plans
	to address the Company’s financial situation as follows:


	 


	In the near term, management
	plans to continue to focus on raising the funds necessary to implement the Company’s business plan related to the Bluetooth-enabled
	iBeacon compatible technology. Management will continue to seek out debt financing to obtain the capital required to meet the Company’s
	financial obligations. There is no assurance, however, that lenders and investors will continue to advance capital to the Company
	or that the new business operations will be profitable. The possibility of failure in obtaining additional funding and the potential
	inability to achieve profitability raises doubts about the Company’s ability to continue as a going concern.


	 


	In the long term, management
	believes that the Company’s projects and initiatives will be successful and will provide cash flow to the Company that will
	be used to finance the Company’s future growth. However, there can be no assurances that the Company’s efforts to raise
	equity and debt at acceptable terms or that the planned activities will be successful, or that the Company will ultimately attain
	profitability. The Company’s long-term viability depends on its ability to obtain adequate sources of debt or equity funding
	to meet current commitments and fund the continuation of its business operations, and the ability of the Company to achieve adequate
	profitability and cash flows from operations to sustain its operations.


	 


	PRINCIPLES OF CONSOLIDATION - The accompanying
	consolidated financial statements include the accounts of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc., formerly known as Ace Marketing & Promotions,
	Inc., and its wholly owned subsidiaries, Mobiquity Networks, Inc., Ace Marketing, Inc., (which has had its name changed to Ace
	Marketing & Promotions, Inc. and Mobiquity Wireless S.L.U.). All intercompany accounts and transactions have been eliminated
	in consolidation.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	6



	 







	 




	 


	The Condensed Consolidated
	Balance Sheets as of March 31, 2017, the Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations for the three months ended March 31, 2017
	and 2016 and the Condensed Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016 have been prepared
	by us without audit, and in accordance with the requirements of Form 10-Q and, therefore, they do not include all information and
	footnotes necessary for a fair presentation of financial position, results of operations, and cash flows in conformity with accounting
	principles generally accepted in the United States of America. In our opinion, the accompanying unaudited condensed consolidated
	financial statements contain all adjustments necessary to present fairly in all material respects our financial position as of
	March 31, 2017, results of operations for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016 and cash flows for the three months ended
	March 31, 2017 and 2016. All such adjustments are of a normal recurring nature. The results of operations and cash flows for the
	three months ended March 31, 2017 are not necessarily indicative of the results to be expected for the full year. We have evaluated
	subsequent events through the filing of this Form 10-Q with the SEC, and determined there have not been any events that have occurred
	that would require adjustments to our unaudited Condensed Financial Statements.


	 


	The information contained
	in this report on Form 10-Q should he read in conjunction with our Form 10-K for our fiscal year ended December 31, 2016.


	 


	ESTIMATES - The preparation of financial
	statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles requires management to make estimates and assumptions that
	affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial
	statements and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. Actual results could differ from those
	estimates.


	 


	FAIR VALUE OF FINANCIAL INSTRUMENTS- The
	Company measures assets and liabilities at fair value based on an expected exit price as defined by the authoritative guidance
	on fair value measurements, which represents the amount that would be received on the sale of an asset or paid to transfer a liability,
	as the case may be, in an orderly transaction between market participants. As such, fair value may be based on assumptions that
	market participants would use in pricing an asset or liability. The authoritative guidance on fair value measurements establishes
	a consistent framework for measuring fair value on either a recurring or nonrecurring basis whereby inputs, used in valuation techniques,
	are assigned a hierarchical level.


	 


	The following are the
	hierarchical levels of inputs to measure fair value:


	 




	 




	·





	Level 1 - Observable inputs that reflect quoted market prices in active markets for identical assets or liabilities.





	 



	·




	Level 2 - Inputs reflect quoted prices for identical assets or liabilities in markets that are not active; quoted prices for similar assets or liabilities in active markets; inputs other than quoted prices that are observable for the assets or liabilities; or inputs that are derived principally from or corroborated by observable market data by correlation or other means.





	 



	·




	Level 3 - Unobservable inputs reflecting the Company's assumptions incorporated in valuation techniques used to determine fair value. These assumptions are required to be consistent with market participant assumptions that are reasonably available.





	 


	The carrying amounts
	of the Company's financial assets and liabilities, such as cash, prepaid expenses, other current assets, accounts payable &
	accrued expenses, certain notes payable and notes payable - related party, approximate their fair values because of the short maturity
	of these instruments.


	 


	The Company accounts
	for its derivative liabilities, at fair value, on a recurring basis under level 2.


	 




	 


	 


	 


	Level 1


	 


	 


	Level 2


	 


	 


	Level 3


	 


	 


	Total


	 




	 



	Fair value of derivatives



	 


	 


	$


	–


	 


	 


	$


	1,797,007


	 


	 


	$


	–


	 


	 


	$


	1,797,007


	 





	 




	Embedded Conversion Features




	 



	The Company evaluates
	embedded conversion features within convertible debt under ASC 815 "Derivatives and Hedging" to determine whether the
	embedded conversion feature(s) should be bifurcated from the host instrument and accounted for as a derivative at fair value with
	changes in fair value recorded in earnings. If the conversion feature does not require derivative treatment under ASC 815, the
	instrument is evaluated under ASC 470-20 "Debt with Conversion and Other Options" for consideration of any beneficial
	conversion feature.


	 



	Derivative Financial Instruments




	 




	The
	Company has financial instruments that are considered derivatives or contain embedded features subject to derivative accounting

	related to four convertible notes issued and outstanding totaling $1,200,000 which included a ratchet provision in the
	conversion prices which range between $.05-.30. Embedded derivatives are valued separately from the host instrument and are recognized
	as derivative liabilities in the Company’s balance sheet. The Company measures these instruments at their estimated fair
	value and recognizes changes in their estimated fair value in results of operations during the period of change. The Company has
	estimated the fair value of these embedded derivatives for convertible debentures and associated warrants using a multinomial
	lattice model as of March 31, 2017. The fair values of the derivative instruments are measured each quarter, which resulted in
	a gain of $462,193 and derivative expense of $1,038,439 during the three and months ended March 31, 2017. As of March 31,
	2017, the fair market value of the derivatives aggregated $1,797,007, using the following assumptions: estimated 0.1 to 0.5-year
	term, estimated volatility of 211.09% to 338.04%, and a discount rate of 0.00% to 0.92%.







	 











	 



	7



	 







	 





	 



	Cash and cash equivalents
	include money market securities that are considered to be highly liquid and easily tradable as of March 31, 2017 and December 31,
	2016. These securities are valued using inputs observable in active markets for identical securities and are therefore classified
	as Level 1 within our fair value hierarchy.


	 


	The carrying amounts
	of financial instruments, including accounts receivable, accounts payable and accrued liabilities, and promissory note, approximated
	fair value as of March 31, 2017 and December 31, 2016, because of the relatively short-term maturity of these instruments and
	their market interest rates. No instruments are carried at fair value.


	 


	CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS

	-

	The Company considers all highly liquid debt instruments with a maturity of three months
	or less, as well as bank money market accounts, to be cash equivalents. As of March 31, 2017, and December 31, 2016, the balances
	were $921,828 and $213,184, respectively.


	 


	CONCENTRATION OF CREDIT
	RISK

	-

	Financial instruments, which potentially subject the Company to concentrations of credit
	risk, consist principally of trade receivables and cash and cash equivalents.


	 


	Concentration of credit
	risk with respect to trade receivables is generally diversified due to the large number of entities comprising the Company's customer
	base and their dispersion across geographic areas principally within the United States. The Company routinely addresses the financial
	strength of its customers and, as a consequence, believes that its receivable credit risk exposure is limited.


	 


	The Company places
	its temporary cash investments with high credit quality financial institutions. At times, the Company maintains bank account balances,
	which exceed FDIC limits. As of March 31, 2017, and December 31, 2016, the Company exceeded FDIC limits by $632,031 and $0, respectively.


	 


	REVENUE RECOGNITION
	— The Company recognizes revenue, for all revenue streams, when it is realized or realizable and estimable in accordance
	with ASC 605,

	"Revenue Recognition".

	The Company will recognize revenue only when all of the following criteria
	have been met:


	 




	 



	·




	Persuasive evidence for an agreement exists;





	 



	·




	Service has been provided;





	 



	·




	The fee is fixed or determinable; and,





	 



	·




	Collection is reasonably assured.





	 


	ACE MARKETING —
	Ace Marketing's revenue is recognized when title and risk of loss transfers to the customer and the earnings process is complete.
	In general, title passes to our customers upon the customer's receipt of the merchandise. Revenue is recognized on a gross basis
	since Ace Marketing has the risks and rewards of ownership, latitude in selection of vendors and pricing, and bears all credit
	risk. Advance payments made by customers are included in customer deposits. Ace Marketing records all shipping and handling fees
	billed to customers as revenues and related costs as cost of goods sold, when incurred. Additional source of revenue, derived from
	emails/texts directly to consumers are recognized under contractual arrangements. Revenue from this advertising method is recognized
	at the time of service provided.


	 


	MOBIQUITY NETWORKS – Revenue is recognized
	with the billing of an advertising contract or data sale. The customer signs a contract directly with us for an advertising campaign
	with mutually agreed upon term and is billed on the start date of the advertising campaign, which are normally in short duration
	periods. The second type of revenue is through the licensing of our data. Revenue from data can occur in two ways; the first is
	a direct feed, which is billed at the end of each month. The second way is through the purchasing of audience segments. When an
	audience segment is purchased, we bill the buyer upon delivery, which is usually 1-2 days for the order date.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	8



	 







	 




	 


	ALLOWANCE FOR DOUBTFUL
	ACCOUNTS - Management must make estimates of the collectability of accounts receivable. Management specifically analyzes accounts
	receivable and analyzes historical bad debts, customer concentrations, customer credit-worthiness, current economic trends and
	changes in customer payment terms when evaluating the adequacy of the allowance for doubtful accounts. As of March 31, 2017, and
	December 31, 2016, allowance for doubtful accounts were $104,611 and $104,611, respectively.


	 


	INVENTORY - Inventory
	is recorded at cost (First In, First Out) and is comprised of finished goods. The Company maintains an inventory on hand for its
	largest customer's frequent order items. All items held are branded for the customer, therefore are not available for public distribution.
	The Company has an agreement with this customer, for cost recovery, if vendor relationship is terminated. There have been minimal
	reserves placed on inventory, based on this arrangement. As of March 31, 2017, and December 31, 2016, the Company has reserved
	against $31,676 and $31,676, respectively.


	 


	PROPERTY AND EQUIPMENT
	- Property and equipment are stated at cost. Depreciation is expensed using the straight-line method over the estimated useful
	lives of the related assets. Leasehold improvements are being amortized using the straight-line method over the estimated useful
	lives of the related assets or the remaining term of the lease. The costs of additions and improvements, which substantially extend
	the useful life of a particular asset, are capitalized. Repair and maintenance costs are charged to expense. When assets are sold
	or otherwise disposed of, the cost and related accumulated depreciation are removed from the account and the gain or loss on disposition
	is reflected in operating income.


	 


	LONG LIVED ASSETS -
	Long-lived assets such as property, equipment and identifiable intangibles are reviewed for impairment whenever facts and circumstances
	indicate that the carrying value may not be recoverable. When required impairment losses on assets to be held and used are recognized
	based on the fair value of the asset. The fair value is determined based on estimates of future cash flows, market value of similar
	assets, if available, or independent appraisals, if required. If the carrying amount of the long-lived asset is not recoverable
	from its undiscounted cash flows, an impairment loss is recognized for the difference between the carrying amount and fair value
	of the asset. When fair values are not available, the Company estimates fair value using the expected future cash flows discounted
	at a rate commensurate with the risk associated with the recovery of the assets. The company recognized $223,487 impairment losses
	for the period ended December 31, 2016 and $12,127 for the period ended March 31, 2017.


	 


	WEBSITE TECHNOLOGY
	- Website technology developed during the prior years were capitalized for the period of development and testing. Expenditures
	during the planning stage and after implementation have been expensed in accordance with ASC 985.


	 


	ADVERTISING COSTS

	-

	Advertising costs are expensed as incurred. For the three months ended March 31, 2017 and March 31, 2016, there were advertising
	costs of $0 and $0, respectively.


	 


	ACCOUNTING FOR STOCK
	BASED COMPENSATION. Stock based compensation cost is measured at the grant date fair value of the award and is recognized as expense
	over the requisite service period. The Company uses the Black-Sholes option-pricing model to determine fair value of the awards,
	which involves certain subjective assumptions. These assumptions include estimating the length of time employees will retain their
	vested stock options before exercising them ("expected term"), the estimated volatility of the Company's common stock
	price over the expected term ("volatility") and the number of options for which vesting requirements will not be completed
	("forfeitures"). Changes in the subjective assumptions can materially affect estimates of fair value stock-based compensation,
	and the related amount recognized on the consolidated statements of operations. Refer to Note 6 "Stock Option Plans"
	in the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements

	in

	this report for a more detailed discussion.


	 


	BENEFICIAL CONVERSIONS
	- Debt instruments that contain a beneficial conversion feature are recorded as deemed interest to the holders of the convertible
	debt instruments. The beneficial conversion is calculated as the difference between the fair values of the underlying common stock
	less the proceeds that have been received for the debt instrument limited to the value received.


	 


	FOREIGN CURRENCY TRANSLATIONS
	- The Company's functional and reporting currency is the U.S. dollar. We own a subsidiary in Europe. Our subsidiary's functional
	currency is the EURO. All transactions initiated in EUROs are translated into U.S. dollars in accordance with ASC 830-30,

	"Translation
	of Financial Statements,"

	as follows:


	 




	 



	(i)




	Monetary assets and liabilities at the rate of exchange in effect at the balance sheet date.





	 


	 


	 




	 



	(ii)




	Fixed assets and equity transactions at historical rates.





	 


	 


	 




	 



	(iii)




	Revenue and expense items at the average rate of exchange prevailing during the period.





	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	9



	 







	 




	 


	Adjustments arising
	from such translations are deferred until realization and are included as a separate component of stockholders' equity as a component
	of comprehensive income or loss. Therefore, translation adjustments are not included in determining net income (loss) but reported
	as other comprehensive income.


	 


	INCOME TAXES - Deferred
	income taxes are recognized for temporary differences between financial statement and income tax basis of assets and liabilities
	for which income tax or tax benefits are expected to be realized in future years. A valuation allowance is established to reduce
	deferred tax assets, if it is more likely than not, that all or some portion of such deferred tax assets will not be realized.
	The effect on deferred taxes of a change in tax rates is recognized in income in the period that includes the enactment date.


	 


	RECENTLY ISSUED ACCOUNTING PRONOUNCEMENTS


	 


	We have reviewed the
	FASB issued Accounting Standards Update ("ASU") accounting pronouncements and interpretations thereof that have effectiveness
	dates during the periods reported and in future periods. The Company has carefully considered the new pronouncements that alter
	previous generally accepted accounting principles and does not believe that any new or modified principles will have a material
	impact on the corporation's reported financial position or operations in the near term. The applicability of any standard is subject
	to the formal review of our financial management and certain standards are under consideration.


	 



	NOTE 2: LOSS PER SHARE




	 



	Basic loss per
	common share is computed by dividing net loss by the weighted average number of shares of common stock outstanding during the
	period. Dilutive loss per share gives effect to stock options and warrants, which are considered to be dilutive common stock
	equivalents. Basic loss per common share was computed by dividing net loss by the weighted average number of shares of common
	stock outstanding. The number of common shares potentially issuable upon the exercise of certain options and warrants that
	were excluded from the diluted loss per common share calculation was approximately 66,183,884 because they are anti-dilutive
	as a result of a net loss for the three months ended March 31, 2017.


	 





	NOTE 3: CONVERTIBLE PROMISSORY NOTE




	 







	Summary of Convertible
	Promissory Notes:


	 




	 


	 




	March 31,




	2017




	 


	 




	December 31,




	2016




	 




	Arnost Note


	 


	$


	–


	 


	 


	$


	322,000


	 




	Cavu Notes net of $0 for 2017 and $23,292 for 2016


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	241,621


	 




	Berg Notes (a)


	 


	 


	50,000


	 


	 


	 


	3,722,000


	 




	Investor Note, net of discounts


	 


	 


	212,258


	 


	 


	 


	6,546,654


	 




	   Total Debt


	 


	 


	362,258


	 


	 


	 


	10,832,275


	 




	Current portion of debt


	 


	 


	362,258


	 


	 


	 


	10,832,275


	 




	Long-term portion of debt


	 


	$


	–


	 


	 


	$


	–


	 





	 




	 



	(a)




	Between August and December 2015, the Company borrowed $3,675,000 from accredited investors. These loans are due and payable the earlier of December 31, 2016 or the completion of an equity financing of at least $2,500,000. Upon the sale of the unsecured promissory notes, the Company issued $1 of principal, one share of common stock and a warrant to purchase one share of common stock at an exercise price of $0.40 per share through August 31, 2017. Accordingly, an aggregate of 3,675,000 shares of common stock and warrants to purchase a like amount were issued in the last six months of 2015. Each noteholder has the right to convert the principal of their note and accrued interest thereon at a conversion price of $0.30 per share or at the noteholder’s option, into equity securities of the Company on the same terms as the last equity transaction completed by the Company prior to each respective conversion date.





	 





	The
	Company has financial instruments that are considered derivatives or contain embedded features subject to
	derivative accounting

	related to four convertible notes issued totaling $1,200,000 which included a ratchet provision
	in the conversion price of $.05 or $.30 or a price equal to the last equity transaction completed by the Company as part of
	a subscription agreement

	. The notes have maturity dates ranging from May 31,
	2017 – September 28, 2017. Embedded derivatives are valued separately from the host instrument and are recognized as
	derivative liabilities in the Company’s balance sheet. The Company measures these instruments at their estimated fair
	value and recognizes changes in their estimated fair value in results of operations during the period of change. The Company
	has estimated the fair value of these embedded derivatives for convertible debentures and associated warrants using a
	multinomial lattice model as of March 31, 2017. The fair values of the derivative instruments are measured each quarter,
	which resulted in a gain of $462,193 and derivative expense of $1,038,439 during the year ended March 31, 2017. As of
	March 31, 2017, the fair market value of the derivatives aggregated $1,797,007, using the following assumptions: estimated
	0.1 to 0.5-year term, estimated volatility of 211.09% to 338.04%, and a discount rate of 0.00% to 0.92%.







	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	10



	 







	 




	 


	In April 2016 through
	the filing date of this Form 10-K, the Company issued and sold 12% unsecured promissory notes in the principal amount of $1,025,000,
	convertible at $0.20 per common share. Upon conversion, the note holders would receive 100% warrant coverage, exercisable at $0.20
	per common share over a period of five years with cashless exercise provisions. These notes automatically convert in the event
	at least $5 million is raised in an equity financing. Prior to the mandatory conversion date, note holders have the option to convert
	the principal and accrued interest also on the same terms as the mandatory conversion and the Company has the option to prepay.
	The fair values of the derivative instruments are measured each quarter, which resulted in a gain of $1,507,450 and initial derivative
	expense of $565,780. As of December 31, 2016, the fair market value of these derivatives aggregated $126,275, using the following
	assumptions: estimated 0.3 year term, estimated volatility of 279%, and a discount rate of 0.51%.


	 


	The Company raised
	$700,000 in the third quarter of 2016 from the sale of secured promissory notes in the principal amount of $700,000 from six accredited
	investors. Each Note was scheduled to be repaid on October 31, 2016, extended to December 15, 2016 but payment was not made. In
	lieu of interest on the Note, 4,900,000 restricted shares of common stock were issued to the Note Holders. At the option of the
	Note Holder, each Note shall be convertible at the lower of $.20 per common share or into securities on the same terms of the next
	completed equity offering of at least $10 million in gross proceeds. In the event the Note is converted into common stock, 100%
	warrant conversion shall be provided to the Note Holder for each share of common stock issued upon conversion. These warrants will
	have a term of three years and shall be exercisable at $.20 per common share. Prior to this offering, Thomas Arnost, Executive
	Chairman, has a secured interest in the amount of $322,000 in the assets of the Company and its subsidiaries. Mr. Arnost has agreed
	that the investors in this offering will have a pari passu first secured interest with Mr. Arnost in all assets of the Company
	and its subsidiaries. The fair values of the derivative instruments are measured each quarter, which resulted in a gain of $11,071.
	As of December 31, 2016, the fair market value of these derivatives aggregated $42,945, using the following assumptions: estimated
	volatility of 279.0%, and a discount rate of 0.51%.


	 


	In February 2017, The Company debt holders converted $3,672,000
	of notes being converted at 0.05 per share into 73,440,000 shares of common stock.


	 


	February 28, 2017, the Company entered
	into an agreement with two non-affiliated persons to provide $1.6 million of short term secured debt financing in three monthly
	tranches. The Company will issue in connection with each tranche, a six-month secured convertible promissory note. In connection
	with this transaction, the Company agreed to issue an origination fee of 3,200,000 warrants. Alexander Capital L.P. acted as Placement
	Agent and Advisor for this transaction.


	 


	In February 2017,
	the Company reported that all of its Series AA preferred stock and substantially all of its outstanding debt both secured and
	unsecured (approximately $12.1 million) have been converted into equity securities of the Company as outlined below. It
	should be noted that the capital transactions below were based on a premium to the average closing sale price of $0.045 per
	share during the 60 day period prior to February 08, 2017. The Company had outstanding 1,122,588 shares of newly designated
	Series AAA preferred stock and $1,350,000 of convertible notes. The convertible notes consist of $1,200,000 of secured notes
	and $150,000 of unsecured notes. Of the 1,122,588 shares of Series AAA preferred stock outstanding, 240,000 Series AA
	preferred stock with an original cost basis of $2.4 million were converted into Series AAA preferred stock. The remaining
	882,588 shares of Series AAA preferred stock were issued in exchange for the conversion of principal and accrued interest of
	approximately $11,854,038 of unsecured debt. This conversion resulted in a loss on extinguishment of debt of $2,706,197.
	The terms of the Series AAA preferred stock can be summarized as follows:


	 


	The price of
	each preferred share shall be, at the option of the holder, convertible into 100 shares of Common Stock. If the preferred shares are converted, the subscriber will then receive 100%
	warrant coverage, with each warrant exercisable at $.05 per share with a cash payment to the Company through the close of
	business on December 31, 2019. The preferred shares have no voting or other preferences except as required by law other than
	the right of conversion described above and a liquidation preference equal to $.01 per share.


	 


	Thomas
	Arnost, our Executive Vice Chairman, and another principal stockholder agreed to convert letters of credit in the principal
	amount of $2,700,000 and $322,000 of secured debt into shares of common stock at the then marketing price of $.05 per share.
	Accrued interest on these obligations were either previously converted into our common stock or were upon conversion of
	the principal, converted into common stock at the fair market value of our common stock at each interest accrual date.
	At conversion date the balance of the letters of credit of $456,503 was recorded as Subscription receivable to be paid in the
	second quarter of 2017.


	 



	NOTE 4: STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY (DEFICIT)




	 

	 


	In December 2015,
	the Company sold 200,000 shares of its Series AA Preferred Stock at a purchase price of $10 per share and raised $2 million.
	Each share of Preferred Stock is convertible into 50 shares of Common Stock at an effective conversion price of $.20 per
	share of Common Stock. The Preferred Stockholder has anti-dilution protection rights through December 31, 2016. In the first
	quarter of 2016, the Company sold an additional 40,000 shares of its Series AA Preferred Stock and raised $400,000. In 2017,
	the Company exchanged 240,000 shares of AA preferred stock for AAA preferred stock. Also in 2017, the Company issued
	an additional 882,588 shares of AAA preferred stock in exchange for outstanding debt and accrued interest. The AAA
	Preferred shares at a purchase price of $10 per share shall be, at the option of the holder, convertible into 100 shares of
	Common Stock. If the preferred shares are converted, the subscriber will then receive 100% warrant coverage, with each
	warrant is exercisable at $0.05 per share with an expiration date of December 31, 2019. The preferred shares have no voting
	or other preferences except as required by law other than the right of conversion described above and a liquidation
	preference equal to $.01 per share.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	11



	 







	 




	 



	Shares issued for services



	 


	During the quarter ended March
	31, 2017, the Company issued 3,800,000 common shares, at $0.06 to $0.13 per share, valued at $314,310.


	 



	Shares issued for accrued interest



	 


	During the
	quarter ended March 31, 2017, the Company issued 3,919,620 common shares, at $0.04 to $0.05 per share, valued at $194,790 and
	AAA preferred shares of 47,588, at $10.00 per share, valued at $475,841.


	 


	During the year
	entered December 31, 2016, the Company issued 1,000,000 common shares in satisfaction of back rent owed the landlord in the
	sum of $57,157. The shares were valued at $20,000 and a gain on settlement of debt was recorded of $36,177.


	 


	During the year
	ended December 31, 2016, the Company issued 11,908,335 common shares, at $0.05 per share, valued at $594,417 for the exercise
	of outstanding warrants. During the quarter ended March 31, 2017, the Company issued 1,916,667 shares, at $0.05 per share,
	valued at $95,834 for cash for the exercise of outstanding warrants.


	 


	See Note 3 above for a discussion of first
	quarter 2017 stock transactions.


	 



	NOTE 5: STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION




	 



	Compensation costs
	related to share-based payment transactions, including employee stock options, are recognized in the financial statements utilizing
	the straight line method for the cost of these awards.


	 


	The Company's results
	for the three month periods ended March 31, 2017 and 2016 include employee share-based compensation expense totaling $273,092 and
	$183,785, respectively. Such amounts have been included in the Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations within selling,
	general and administrative expenses. No income tax benefit has been recognized in the statement of operations for share-based compensation
	arrangements due to a history of operating losses.


	 


	The following table
	summarizes stock-based compensation expense for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016:


	 






	 


	 


	Three Months Ended

	March 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	Employee stock-based compensation - option grants


	 


	$


	150,592


	 


	 


	$


	151,785


	 




	Employee stock-based compensation - stock grants


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Non-Employee stock-based compensation - option grants


	 


	 


	11,500


	 


	 


	 


	32,000


	 




	Non-Employee stock-based compensation - stock grants


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Non-Employee stock-based compensation-stock warrant


	 


	 


	111,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Total


	 


	$


	273,092


	 


	 


	$


	183,785


	 






	 




	NOTE 6: STOCK OPTION PLAN




	 



	In the first quarter
	of 2016, the Board approved and stockholders ratified a 2016 Employee Benefit and Consulting Services Compensation Plan covering
	10,000,000 shares (the “2016 Plan”) and approving moving all options which exceeded the 2009 Plan limits to the 2016
	Plan.


	 


	All stock options under
	the Plans are granted at or above the fair market value of the common stock at the grant date. Employee and non-employee stock
	options vest over varying periods and generally expire either 5 or 10 years from the grant date. The fair value of options at the
	date of grant was estimated using the Black-Scholes option pricing model. For option grants, the Company will take into consideration
	payments subject to the provisions of ASC 718 "Stock Compensation", previously Revised SFAS No. 123 "Share-Based
	Payment" ( "SFAS 123 (R)"). The fair values of these restricted stock awards are equal to the market value of the
	Company's stock on the date of grant, after taking into certain discounts. The expected volatility is based upon historical volatility
	of our stock and other contributing factors. The expected term is based upon observation of actual time elapsed between date of
	grant and exercise of options for all employees. Previously, such assumptions were determined based on historical data.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	12



	 







	 




	 


	The weighted average
	assumptions made in calculating the fair values of options granted under the Plans during the three months ended March 31,
	2017 and 2016 are as follows:


	 






	 


	 


	Three Months Ended

	March 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	Expected volatility


	 


	 


	146.77%


	 


	 


	 


	133.46%


	 




	Expected dividend yield


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Risk-free interest rate


	 


	 


	1.89%


	 


	 


	 


	1.61%


	 




	Expected term (in years)


	 


	 


	5


	 


	 


	 


	5


	 




	  




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Weighted


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Weighted


	 


	 


	Average


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Average


	 


	 


	Remaining


	 


	 


	Aggregate


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Exercise


	 


	 


	Contractual


	 


	 


	Intrinsic


	 




	 


	 


	 


	Share


	 


	 


	Price


	 


	 


	Term


	 


	 


	Value


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 



	Outstanding, January 1, 2017



	 


	 


	 


	18,315,001


	 


	 


	 


	.41


	 


	 


	 


	5.14


	 


	 


	$


	5,625


	 




	 



	Granted



	 


	 


	 


	250,000


	 


	 


	 


	.05


	 


	 


	 


	5.00


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 



	Exercised



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 



	Cancelled



	 


	 


	 


	(750,000


	)


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 



	Outstanding, March 31, 2017



	 


	 


	 


	17,815,001


	 


	 


	 


	.37


	 


	 


	 


	7.94


	 


	 


	 


	37,375


	 




	 



	Options exercisable, March 31, 2017



	 


	 


	 


	15,412,917


	 


	 


	 


	.40


	 


	 


	 


	4.30


	 


	 


	$


	37,375


	 





	 


	The weighted-average
	grant-date fair value of options granted during the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016 was $0.03 and $0.18, respectively.


	 


	The aggregate intrinsic
	value of options outstanding and options exercisable at March 31, 2017 is calculated as the difference between the exercise price
	of the underlying options and the market price of the Company's common stock for the shares that had exercise prices, that were
	lower than the $33,375 closing price of the Company's common stock on March 31, 2017.


	 


	As of March 31, 2017,
	the fair value of unamortized compensation cost related to unvested stock option awards was $400,721.


	 


	 


	The weighted average
	assumptions made in calculating the fair value of warrants granted during the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016 are
	as follows:


	 






	 


	 


	Three Months Ended

	March 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	Expected volatility


	 


	 


	151.49%


	 


	 


	 


	–

	%



	 




	Expected dividend yield


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Risk-free interest rate


	 


	 


	151.49%


	 


	 


	 


	–%


	 




	Expected term (in years)


	 


	 


	5


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Weighted


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Weighted


	 


	 


	Average


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Average


	 


	 


	Remaining


	 


	 


	Aggregate


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Exercise


	 


	 


	Contractual


	 


	 


	Intrinsic


	 




	 


	 


	 


	Share


	 


	 


	Price


	 


	 


	Term


	 


	 


	Value


	 




	 



	Outstanding, January 1, 2017



	 


	 


	 


	21,252,734


	 


	 


	$


	.48


	 


	 


	 


	1.40


	 


	 


	$


	–


	 




	 



	Granted



	 


	 


	 


	3,200,000


	 


	 


	 


	.10


	 


	 


	 


	5.00


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 



	Exercised



	 


	 


	 


	(1,916,667


	)


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 



	Cancelled



	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 



	Outstanding, March 31, 2017



	 


	 


	 


	22,536,067


	 


	 


	$


	.42


	 


	 


	 


	4.45


	 


	 


	 


	131,000


	 




	 



	Options warrants exercisable, March 31, 2017



	 


	 


	 


	22,536,067


	 


	 


	$


	.43


	 


	 


	 


	.81


	 


	 


	$


	131,000


	 






	 




	 




	 




	 











	 



	13



	 







	 





	 




	NOTE 7: COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES




	 








	COMMITMENTS –




	 



	In April 2011, we
	entered into our agreement with Simon Property Group, which agreement was amended first in September 2013 and then in
	July 2014. This second amendment provides for us to expand our location-based mobile mall network footprint to about 195
	current Simon malls across the United States. Our agreement with Simon currently expires December 31, 2017. Simon is entitled
	to receive fees from us equal to the greater of a pre-set per mall fee or a percentage of revenues derived from within the
	Simon Mall network. The revenue share agreement in which Simon participates will exceed the minimum annual mall fees if the
	Company has generated revenues within the Simon network of about $15 million or more in a calendar year. Our agreement with
	Simon requires the company to maintain letters of credit for each calendar year under the agreement represented by the
	minimum amount of fees due for such calendar year. For 2015, the minimum fees of $2.7 million has been secured through two
	bank letters of credit, one of which was issued in the amount of $1,350,000 utilizing the funds of a non-affiliated
	stockholder and the second letter of credit was obtained in the same amount through the funds of Thomas Arnost, our Executive
	Chairman. In the event Simon draws down upon either letter of credit, we have until the next minimum payment due date
	(approximately 90 days) after the draw down to obtain replacement letters of credit. Each person who secured our letters of
	credit has the opportunity to notify us that they wish to turn the cash funds securing the letters of credit over to us and
	to convert such funds into Common Stock currently at a conversion price of $.20 per share. Also, each person who issued the
	letter of credit is receiving quarterly, while the letters of credit are outstanding, options to purchase 125,000 shares of
	Common Stock, exercisable at the prevailing market price per share on the date of grant and interest at the rate of 8% per
	annum on the monies that they have had to set aside in their bank accounts and are unable to have access to such monies. In
	April, July, October, 2016 and January 2017, Simon drew down on each bank letter of credit for an aggregate of $1,121,748
	owed to each letter of credit provider. During the first quarter of 2017, the Letter of Credit holders converted the entire
	$2,700,000 into 54,000,000 shares of Common Stock.


	 


	Pursuant to a master
	agreement effective August, 2015, we entered into an agreement with PREIT pursuant to which we have the right to install our Mobi-Beacons
	and to send information across the air space of the common areas of our PREIT mall network, which will include approximately 27
	malls in select states in the United States. Our right to install our Mobi-Beacons to market and sell third party paid advertising
	in the interior common areas of these malls is exclusive. Under our agreement between us and PREIT, PREIT is entitled to an agreed
	upon revenue share over the four-year term of the agreement. In the event the net revenue share as defined in the agreement is
	not attained for any measurement period, also as defined in the agreement, either party may terminate the agreement upon 90 days
	prior written notice. PREIT may also terminate the agreement if it determines that Mobiquity’s installed equipment is not
	adequate and/or provides a negative user experience for the visitors to the PREIT malls. The agreement also provides for PREIT
	to adjust the number of malls subject to the agreement from time-to-time based upon changes in its beneficial ownership in the
	malls.



	 



	Pursuant to a master agreement entered
	into in 2015, we entered into an agreement with Rouse pursuant to which we have the right to install our Mobi-Beacons to send information
	across the air space of the common areas of our Rouse mall network, which will include approximately 30 malls in select states
	in the United States. Our right to install our Mobi-Beacons to market and sell third party paid advertising in the interior common
	areas of these malls is exclusive. Under our agreement between us and Rouse, Rouse is entitled to an agreed upon revenue share
	over the four-year term of the agreement. In the event the net revenue share as defined in the agreement is not attained for any
	measurement period, also as defined in the agreement, either party may terminate the agreement upon 90 days prior written notice.
	Either party may also terminate the agreement due to a material breach which is not cured within 30 days of written notice. Also,
	Rouse upon at least 60 days written notice to us prior to the end of the second contract year, may terminate the agreement with
	respect to any participating property for any reason at the end of the second contract year. The agreement also provides for Rouse
	to adjust the number of malls subject to the agreement from time-to-time based upon changes in its beneficial ownership in the
	malls.


	 


	In February 2012, the Company entered into
	a lease agreement for new executive office space of approximately 4,200 square feet located at 600 Old Country Road, Suite 541,
	Garden City, NY 11530. The lease agreement is for 63 months, commencing April 2012 and expiring June 2017. The annual rent under
	this office facility for the first year is estimated at $127,000, including electricity, subject to an annual increase of 3%. In
	the event of a default in which the Company is evicted from the office space, Mobiquity would be responsible to the landlord for
	an additional payment of rent of $160,000 in the first year of the lease, an additional payment of $106,667 in the second year
	of the lease and an additional payment of rent of $53,333 in the third year of the lease. Such additional rent would be payable
	at the discretion of the Company in cash or in Common Stock of the Company.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	14



	 







	 




	 


	Our lease for approximately 2,000 square
	feet of space at an annual cost of approximately $30,100 (inclusive of taxes) at 1105 Portion Road, Farmingville, NY 11738 expired
	in November 2013. We currently lease this property on a month to month basis for approximately $2,500 per month beginning December
	2014, with a 5% increase in rent each month.


	 


	In March 2013, we entered into a two-year
	lease for an approximately 1,200 square foot facility of office and warehouse space in Barcelona, Spain, at monthly cost of approximately
	$2,200. This lease on a month-to-month basis. We have closed this facility and consolidated our efforts moving our activities back
	to the United States.


	 


	In March of 2014, we entered into a month-to-month
	lease agreement for approximately 400 square feet of office space located in Manhattan, NY at a monthly cost of $3,700. In May
	of 2015 we moved to a larger location with the same landlord on a month to month basis for $6,000 each month.


	 


	Minimum future rentals under non-cancelable
	lease commitments are as follows:


	 






	YEARS ENDING DECEMBER 31,


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	2017


	 


	 


	 


	2,168,653


	 




	 


	2018


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 



	2019 and thereafter



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	2,168,653


	 





	 


	Rent and real estate tax expense was approximately
	$482,500 and $858,900 for the three months ended March 31, 2017 and 2016, respectively.


	 



	EMPLOYMENT CONTRACTS –




	 




	Michael D. Trepeta and Dean L. Julia



	 


	On March 1, 2005, the Company entered into
	employment contracts with two of its officers, namely, Dean L. Julia and Michael D. Trepeta. The employment agreements provide
	for minimum annual salaries plus bonuses equal to 5% of pre-tax earnings (as defined) and other perquisites commonly found in such
	agreements. In addition, pursuant to the employment contracts, the Company granted the officers options to purchase up to an aggregate
	of 400,000 shares of common stock.


	 


	On August 22, 2007, the Company approved
	a three-year extension of the employment contracts with two of its officers expiring on February 28, 2011. The employment agreements
	provided for minimum annual salaries with scheduled increases per annum to occur on every anniversary date of the contract and
	extension commencing on March 1, 2008. A signing bonus of options to purchase 150,000 shares granted to each executive were fully
	vested at the date of the grant and exercisable at $1.20 per share through August 22, 2017. Ten year options to purchase 50,000
	shares of common stock are to be granted at fair market value on each anniversary date of the contract and extension commencing
	March 1, 2008. Termination pay of one year base salary based upon the scheduled annual salary of each executive officer for the
	next contract year, plus the amount of bonuses paid (or entitle to be paid) to the executive for the current fiscal year of the
	preceding fiscal year, whichever is higher.


	 


	On April 7, 2010,
	the Board of Directors approved a five-year extension of the employment contract of Dean L. Julia and Michael D. Trepeta to
	expire on March 1, 2015. The Board approved the continuation of each officer’s current salary and scheduled salary
	increases on March 1

	st

	of each year. The Board also approved a signing bonus of stock options to purchase 200,000
	shares granted to each officer which is fully vested at the date of grant and exercisable at $.50 per share through April 7,
	2020; ten-year stock options to purchase 100,000 shares of Common Stock to be granted to each officer at fair market value on
	each anniversary date of the contract and extension thereof commencing March 1, 2011; and termination pay of one year base
	salary based upon the scheduled annual salary of each executive officer for the next contract year plus the amount of bonuses
	paid or entitled to be paid to the executive for the current fiscal year or the preceding fiscal year, whichever is higher.
	In the event of termination, the executives will continue to receive all benefits included in the employment agreement
	through the scheduled expiration date of said employment agreement prior to the acceleration of the termination date
	thereof.


	 


	In July 2012, the Company approved and
	in January 2013 the Company implemented amending the employment agreements of Messrs. Julia and M. Trepeta to expire on February
	28, 2017, subject to an automatic one year renewal on March 1, 2013 and on each March 1

	st

	thereafter, unless the Employment
	Agreement is terminated in accordance with its terms on or before December 30

	th

	of the prior calendar year. In the event
	of termination without cause, the executives will continue to receive all salary and benefits included in the employment agreement
	through the scheduled expiration date of said employment agreement prior to the acceleration of the termination date thereof, plus
	one year termination pay.


	 


	On May 28, 2013, the Company approved amending
	the employment agreements of Messrs. Julia and Trepeta to provide that each officer may choose an annual bonus equal to 5% of pre-tax
	earnings for the most recently completed year before deduction of annual bonuses paid to officers or, in the event majority control
	of the Company is acquired by a person or a group of persons during the prior fiscal year, the officer may choose to receive the
	aforementioned bonus or 1% of the control consideration paid by acquirer(s) to acquire majority control of the Company.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	15



	 







	 




	 



	Separation Agreement



	 


	In April 2017, Michael
	Trepeta entered into a separation agreement with the Company pursuant to which he resigned as an executive officer and director.
	There is currently a vacancy in the Board of Directors of the Company. After his resignation, the Board changed Dean Julia’s
	title from Co-Chief Executive Officer to Chief Executive Officer.


	 


	Pursuant to Michael
	Trepeta’s separation agreement, Mr. Trepeta is entitled to the following benefits:


	 




	 



	·




	Six months’ coverage under the Company’s existing director/officer insurance policy;





	 



	·




	Indemnification per existing employment agreement;





	 



	·




	Expense reimbursement through May 31, 2017;





	 



	·




	All options vested shall continue until their normal expiration date; and





	 



	·




	Mutual releases.





	 



	Thomas Arnost



	 


	In December 2014, we entered into a three-year
	employment agreement with Thomas Arnost serving as Executive Chairman of the board. Mr. Arnost receives a monthly salary of
	$10,000 plus an annual grant of options for serving on the board of directors. In the event of his termination, by Mr. Arnost or
	by the company for cause, Mr. Arnost will receive his pay through the termination date. In the event that Mr. Arnost is terminated
	without cause, he shall be entitled to receive his salary paid through the end of the term of his agreement. Mr. Arnost may terminate
	the agreement at any time by giving three months’ prior written notice to our board of directors. Mr. Arnost will also be
	entitled to indemnification against all claims, judgments, damages, liabilities, costs and expenses (including reasonably legal
	fees) arising out of, based upon or related to his performance of services to us, to the maximum extent permitted by law.


	 



	Sean Trepeta



	 


	In December 2014, Mobiquity Networks entered
	into an employment agreement with Sean Trepeta, to serve as President of Mobiquity Networks as an employee at will. Mr. Trepeta,
	as a full-time employee, is to be paid a salary at the rate of $20,000 per month. Upon the execution of the agreement, he received
	10-year options to purchase 1,500,000 shares of our common stock vesting quarterly over a period of three years. For calendar 2015,
	he will be entitled to a bonus of $125,000 upon revenues of Mobiquity Networks achieving a minimum of $6 million in revenues and
	a further bonus of $125,000 for a total of $250,000 at such time as Mobiquity Network’s revenues achieve a minimum of $12
	million, it being understood that any revenues which do not have a 30% margin shall not count toward these totals. All options
	granted to Mr. Trepeta will become immediately vested in the event of a change in control of our Company or sale of substantially
	all of our assets. In the event we terminate Mr. Trepeta without cause, after six months of continued employment under the
	employment agreement, Mr. Trepeta is entitled to receive three months’ severance pay.


	  



	Paul Bauersfeld



	 


	In December 2014, we entered into an employment
	agreement with Paul Bauersfeld, our Chief Technology Officer, who is an employee at will. Mr. Bauersfeld, as a full-time employee,
	is to be paid a salary at the rate of $25,000 per month. Upon the execution of the agreement, he received 10-year options to purchase
	1,000,000 shares of our common stock vesting quarterly over a period of three years. For calendar 2015, he will be entitled to
	a bonus of $125,000 upon revenues of Mobiquity Networks achieving a minimum of $6 million in revenues and a further bonus of $125,000
	for a total of $250,000 at such time as Mobiquity Network’s revenues achieve a minimum of $12 million, it being understood
	that any revenues which do not have a 30% margin shall not count toward these totals. The foregoing compensatory arrangements with
	Mr. Bauersfeld is in addition to the non-statutory stock options to purchase 2,600,000 shares of our common stock previously granted
	to Mr. Bauersfeld. All options granted to Mr. Bauersfeld will become immediately vested in the event of a change of control
	of our company or sale of substantially all of our assets. In the event we terminate Mr. Bauersfeld without cause. Mr. Bauersfeld
	is entitled to receive six months’ severance pay.


	 



	Sean McDonnell



	 


	Sean McDonnell, our Chief Financial Officer,
	is an employee at will and is currently receiving a salary of $132,000 per annum.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	16



	 







	 







	TRANSACTIONS WITH MAJOR CUSTOMERS —



	 


	The Company sells its
	branded merchandise to a geographically diverse group of customers, performs ongoing credit evaluations of its customers and generally
	does not require collateral. During the three months ended March 31, 2017 a customer accounted for approximately 23% of net revenues
	and for the three months ended March 31, 2016 a customer accounted for approximately 47% of net revenues. The Company holds
	on hand certain items that are ordered on a regular basis.


	 



	NOTE 8: SEGMENT INFORMATION




	 



	Reportable operating
	segment is determined based on Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.'s management approach. The management approach, as defined by accounting
	standards which have been codified into FASB ASC 280, "Segment Reporting," is based on the way that the chief operating
	decision-maker organizes the segments within an enterprise for making decisions about resources to be allocated and assessing their
	performance. Our chief operating decision-maker is our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer.


	 


	While our results of
	operations are primarily reviewed on a consolidated basis, the chief operating decision-maker also manages the enterprise in two
	operating segments: (i) Ace Marketing and Promotions, Inc. captures Branding & Branded Merchandise (ii) Mobiquity Networks
	represent our Mobile Marketing.


	 


	Corporate management
	defines and reviews segment profitability based on the same allocation methodology as presented in the segment data tables below:


	 




	First Quarter of Fiscal 2016


	 




	 


	 


	Quarter Ended March 31, 2016


	 




	 


	 


	Ace Marketing

	& Promotions,

	Inc.


	 


	 


	Mobiquity

	Networks, Inc.


	 


	 


	Total


	 




	Revenues, net


	 


	$


	458,050


	 


	 


	 


	59,182


	 


	 


	$


	517,232


	 




	Operating (loss), before interest amortization, depreciation and taxes


	 


	 


	(699,493


	)


	 


	 


	(1,609,056


	)


	 


	 


	(2,308,549


	)




	Derivative expense


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Loss on settlement of debt


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Interest income


	 


	 


	1


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	1


	 




	Interest (expense)


	 


	 


	(630,027


	)


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	(630,027


	)




	Depreciation and amortization


	 


	 


	(4,941


	)


	 


	 


	(32,837


	)


	 


	 


	(37,778


	)




	Net Loss


	 


	 


	(1,334,460


	)


	 


	 


	(1,641,893


	)


	 


	 


	(2,976,353


	)




	Assets at March 31, 2016


	 


	 


	1,272,616


	 


	 


	 


	108,047


	 


	 


	 


	1,380,663


	 





	 




	First Quarter of Fiscal 2017


	 




	 


	 


	Quarter Ended March 31, 2017


	 




	 


	 


	Ace Marketing

	& Promotions,

	Inc.


	 


	 


	Mobiquity

	Networks, Inc.


	 


	 


	Total


	 




	Revenues, net


	 


	 


	352,332


	 


	 


	 


	81,787


	 


	 


	 


	434,119


	 




	Operating (loss), before interest amortization, depreciation and taxes


	 


	 


	(172,784


	)


	 


	 


	(1,226,362


	)


	 


	 


	(1,399,146


	)




	Derivative expense


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	(1,038,439


	)


	 


	 


	(1,038,439


	)




	Loss on settlement of debt


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	(2,706,197


	)


	 


	 


	(2,706,197


	)




	Interest income


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Interest (expense)


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	(1,133,933


	)


	 


	 


	(1,133,933


	)




	Depreciation and amortization


	 


	 


	(2,532


	)


	 


	 


	(4,900


	)


	 


	 


	(7,432


	)




	Net Loss


	 


	 


	(175,316


	)


	 


	 


	(6,109,831


	)


	 


	 


	(6,285,147


	)




	Assets at March 31, 2017


	 


	 


	601,551


	 


	 


	 


	718,782


	 


	 


	 


	1,320,333


	 





	 


	All intersegment sales
	and expenses have been eliminated from the table above.


	 







	NOTE 9: SUBSEQUENT EVENTS




	 



	There are no subsequent
	events required to be disclosed in the Notes to Financial Statements through the date of the report, except as follows:


	 









	·



	In April 2017, the Company received the third portion of the short term secured debt financing.






	 








	 



	17



	 









	 




	 







	ITEM 2. MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND
	ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS




	 




	FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS




	 



	The information contained
	in this Form 10-Q and documents incorporated herein by reference are intended to update the information contained in the Company's
	Form 10-K for its fiscal year ended December 31, 2016 which includes our audited financial statements for the year ended December
	31, 2016 and such information presumes that readers have access to, and will have read, the "Management's Discussion and Analysis
	of Financial Condition and Results of Operations," "Risk Factors" and other information contained in such Form 10-K
	and other Company filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC").


	 


	This Quarterly Report
	on Form 10-Q contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the
	"Securities Act"), and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. These forward-looking statements
	involve risks and uncertainties, and actual results could be significantly different than those discussed in this Form 10-Q. Certain
	statements contained in Management's Discussion and Analysis, particularly in "Liquidity and Capital Resources," and
	elsewhere in this Form 10-Q are forward-looking statements. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, future
	revenues and future performance. Although we believe the expectations expressed in such forward-looking statements are based on
	reasonable assumptions within the bounds of our knowledge of our business, a number of factors could cause actual results to differ
	materially from those expressed in any forward-looking statements, whether oral or written, made by us or on our behalf. The forward-looking
	statements are subject to risks and uncertainties including, without limitation, the following: (a) changes in levels of competition
	from current competitors and potential new competition, (b) possible loss of customers, and (c) the company's ability to attract
	and retain key personnel, (d) The Company's ability to manage other risks, uncertainties and factors inherent in the business and
	otherwise discussed in this 10-Q and in the Company's other filings with the SEC. The foregoing should not be construed as an exhaustive
	list of all factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed in forward-looking statements made
	by us. All forward-looking statements included in this document are made as of the date hereof, based on information available
	to the Company on the date thereof, and the Company assumes no obligation to update any forward-looking statements.


	 



	Company Overview




	 



	Mobiquity Technologies,
	Inc., a New York corporation (the “Company”), is the parent company of two operating subsidiaries; Mobiquity Networks,
	Inc.(“Mobiquity Networks”) and Ace Marketing & Promotions, Inc. (“Ace Marketing”). The Company’s
	wholly-owned subsidiary, Mobiquity Networks has evolved and grown from a mobile advertising technology company focused on Driving
	Awareness and Foot-traffic throughout its indoor mall-based beacon network, into a next generation mobile location data and marketing
	company. Mobiquity Networks provides precise unique, at-scale location-based data and insights on consumer’s real world behavior
	and trends for use in marketing and research. With our combined data sets of shopping malls, premium outlets and cinemas beacon
	data, and first party location data via our advanced Software Development Kit (“SDK”) utilizing multiple geo-location
	technologies, Mobiquity Networks provides one of the most accurate and scaled solution for mobile data collection and analysis.
	Mobiquity Networks is seeking to create several new revenue streams from the mobile data collection and analysis, including, but
	not limited to; Push Notification Campaigns, Mobile Audiences & Segments, real-time

	Data
	Provision,

	Attribution Reporting and Custom Research. The Company is also attempting to reduce expenses by renegotiating
	certain Mall Developer Agreements.


	 


	Ace Marketing is our
	legacy marketing and promotions business which provides integrated marketing services to our commercial customers. While Ace Marketing
	currently represents substantially all of our revenue, we anticipate that activity from Ace Marketing will represent a diminishing
	portion of corporate revenue as our attention is now principally focused on developing and executing on opportunities in our Mobiquity
	Networks business. We believe that our Mobiquity Networks business represents our greatest growth opportunity going forward.


	 



	Critical Accounting Policies




	 



	Our discussion and
	analysis of our financial condition and results of operations are based upon our financial statements, which have been prepared
	in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.  The preparation of financial statements
	requires management to make estimates and disclosures on the date of the financial statements. On an on-going basis, we evaluate
	our estimates including, but not limited to, those related to revenue recognition. We use authoritative pronouncements, historical
	experience and other assumptions as the basis for making judgments. Actual results could differ from those estimates. We believe
	that the following critical accounting policies affect our more significant judgments and estimates in the preparation of our financial
	statements.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	18



	 







	 




	 



	Revenue Recognition
	-

	Ace Marketing’s revenue is recognized when title and risk of loss transfers to the customer and the earnings process
	is complete. In general, title passes to our customers upon shipment of the merchandise. Revenue is recognized on a gross basis
	since Ace Marketing has the risks and rewards of ownership, latitude in selection of vendors and pricing, and bears all credit
	risk. Advance payments made by customers are included in customer deposits. Ace Marketing records all shipping and handling fees
	billed to customers as revenues and related costs as cost of goods sold, when incurred. Additional source of revenue, derived from
	emails/texts directly to consumers are recognized under contractual arrangements. Revenue from this advertising method is recognized
	at the time of service provided.


	 



	Revenue Recognition

	– Mobiquity Networks. Revenue is recognized with the billing of an advertising contract or data sale. The customer signs
	a contract directly with us for an advertising campaign with mutually agreed upon term and is billed on the start date of the advertising
	campaign, which are normally in short duration periods. The second type of revenue is through the licensing of our data. Revenue
	from data can occur in two ways; the first is a direct feed, which is billed at the end of each month. The second way is through
	the purchasing of audience segments. When an audience segment is purchased, we bill the buyer upon delivery, which is usually 1-2
	days for the order date.


	  



	Allowance For Doubtful
	Accounts

	. We are required to make judgments based on historical experience and future expectations, as to the realizability
	of our accounts receivable. We make these assessments based on the following factors: (a) historical experience, (b) customer concentrations,
	customer credit worthiness, (d) current economic conditions, and (e) changes in customer payment terms.


	 



	Accounting For Stock
	Based Compensation

	. Stock based compensation cost is measured at the grant date fair value of the award and is recognized as
	expense over the requisite service period. The company uses the Black-Sholes option-pricing model to determine fair value of the
	awards, which involves certain subjective assumptions. These assumptions include estimating the length of time employees will retain
	their vested stock options before exercising them (“expected term”), the estimated volatility of the company’s
	common stock price over the expected term (“volatility”) and the number of options for which vesting requirements will
	not be completed (“forfeitures”). Changes in the subjective assumptions can materially affect estimates of fair value
	stock-based compensation, and the related amount recognized on the consolidated statements of operations.


	 



	Plan of Operation




	 



	Mobiquity Networks
	derives its revenue utilizing the revenue streams mentioned above. All of the products used to derive revenue for the Company are
	reliant on the collection of data. To achieve management’s revenue goals moving forward, we have developed a strategy to
	increase the two main driving forces behind our data collection. One strategy is to increase the total number of users we see on
	a monthly basis (“MAU”), and the second strategy is to increase the total number of locations (Places) available to
	see our MAU’s visit over the same time period. We are currently seeing approximately 13,000,000 unique mobile devices by
	the MAU on a monthly basis and roughly 20,000,000 unique devices for the first 100 days of 2017. The ability to see and collect
	the data required from these unique devices comes from the installation of our proprietary Software Development Kit (SDK) into
	third party mobile applications (Apps). To continue to grow the total number of unique devices we can see on a monthly basis, we
	need to have our SDK installed in more third party Apps. We believe our unique offering to potential App partners gives us a competitive
	advantage over others in the industry. The task of partnering with third party Apps for installation of our SDK is handled internally
	by our business development team.


	 


	As of March 31, 2017,
	we had approximately 200,000 Places in our proprietary Places database, and that number should increase to over 4,000,000 Places
	by the end of the second quarter 2017, thus exponentially increasing the amount of data we collect. We have been able to steadily
	increase the number of locations available in our Places database through the use of both open source and proprietary technologies.
	The task of growing our Places database is handled by our internal technology team. The Company currently utilizes both internal
	and outsourced resources to market and sell its product offerings. Management intends to hire additional sales personnel in the
	last three quarters of 2017 as working capital permits.


	 



	RESULTS OF OPERATIONS




	 



	The following table
	sets forth certain selected unaudited condensed statement of operations data for the periods indicated in dollars and as a percentage
	of total net revenues. The following discussion relates to our results of operations for the periods noted and is not necessarily
	indicative of the results expected for any other interim period or any future fiscal year. In addition, we note that the period-to-period
	comparison may not be indicative of future performance.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	19



	 







	 




	 






	 


	 


	Three Months Ended

	March 31


	 




	 


	 


	2017


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	Revenue


	 


	$


	434,119


	 


	 


	$


	517,232


	 




	Cost of Revenues


	 


	$


	430,568


	 


	 


	$


	561,589


	 




	Gross Profit (Loss)


	 


	$


	3,551


	 


	 


	$


	(44,357


	)




	Selling, General and Administrative Expenses


	 


	$


	1,860,195


	 


	 


	$


	2,521,308


	 




	(Loss) from Operations


	 


	$


	(1,856,644


	)


	 


	$


	(2,565,665


	)





	  


	We generated revenues
	of $434,119 in the first quarter of 2017 compared to $517,232 in the same period of the prior year. As our Mobiquity revenue streams
	from collection of data and analysis is fairly new, at the current time, revenues Mobiquity Networks are $81,787 of our consolidated
	revenues. In 2017, we anticipate our revenues increasing in our Mobiquity Networks subsidiary due to the implementation of our
	new revenue business model.


	  


	Cost of revenues was
	$430,568 or 99% of revenues in the first quarter of 2017 compared to $561,589 or 109% of revenues in the same fiscal period of
	the prior year. Cost of revenues includes purchases and freight costs associated with the shipping of merchandise to our customers.
	The change in cost of revenues of $131,021 in 2017 is related to volume and product mix of the products our customers purchased
	along with the establishment of our Mobiquity devices.


	 


	Gross profit was $3,551
	for the first quarter of 2017 or 1% of net revenues compared to $(44,357) in the same fiscal period of the prior year or (109)%
	of revenues. Gross profits will vary period-to-period depending upon a number of factors including the mix of items sold and the
	volume of product sold. Also, it is our practice to pass freight costs on to our customers with low to no profit margin. As advertising
	revenue from the use of our Mobiquity devices increases, it is expected that our margins will increase significantly. As our mall
	network has only recently been constructed and is currently being expanded, at the current time, revenues from the use of our Mobiquity
	devices are not a material portion of our consolidated revenues.


	 


	Selling, general, and
	administrative expenses were $1,860,195 for the first quarter of 2017 compared to $2,521,308 in the comparable period of the prior
	year, a decrease of approximately $661,113. Such operating costs include payroll and related expenses, commissions, insurance,
	rents, fee payments to Simon Property Group, Macerich malls and GGP malls professional (consulting) and public awareness fees.


	 


	The net operating loss
	for the first quarter of 2017 was $1,856,644 as compared to $2,565,665 for the comparable period of the prior year. The change
	in operating loss is attributable to reductions in salaries, rents commissions and non-cash stock based compensation.


	 


	No benefit for income
	taxes is provided for in the reported periods due to the full valuation allowance on the net deferred tax assets. Our ability to
	be profitable in the future is dependent upon the successful introduction and usage of our proximity marketing services.


	 




	Liquidity and Capital Resources






	 


	The Company had
	cash and cash equivalents of $921,828 at March 31, 2017. Cash used in operating activities for the three months ended March
	31, 2017 was $995,300. This resulted primarily from a net loss of $6,285,148, offset by stock based payments of $273,092 a
	decrease in accounts receivable of $80,927 and a decrease in prepaid expenses and other assets of $20,033 and an decrease of
	accounts payable and accrued expenses of $249,097 and the non-cash items of the change in fair value of derivative
	liabilities of $462,193, derivative expense of $1,038,439 and the loss on settlement of debt of $2,706,197 and amortization
	of debt discount of $643,363. Net cash was provided by financing activities of $1,703,944 from the sale of the Company's
	Common Stock for the quarter ended March 31, 2017 of $311,250, proceeds from the exercise of warrants of $95,834 and net
	proceeds from the issuance and extinguishment of notes of $1,300,000.


	 


	The Company had cash
	and cash equivalents of $178,466 at March 31, 2016. Cash used in operating activities for the three months ended March 31, 2016
	was $2,241,724. This resulted primarily from a net loss of $2,976,353, offset by stock based payments of $183,785 a decrease in
	accounts receivable of $37,908 and a decrease in prepaid expenses and other assets of $13,055 and an increase of accounts payable
	and accrued expenses of $58,363 and a gain on the change in fair value of derivative liabilities. The Company had an increase in
	investing activities of $4,430 with the purchase of equipment. Net cash was provided by financing activities of $400,000 from the
	sale of the Company's Preferred Stock for the quarter ended March 31, 2016.


	 


	Our Company commenced
	operations in 1998 and was initially funded by our three founders, each of whom has made demand loans to our Company that have
	been repaid. Since 1999, we have relied primarily on equity financing from outside investors to supplement our cash flow from operations.


	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	20



	 







	 




	 


	We anticipate
	that our future liquidity requirements will arise from the need to finance our accounts receivable and inventories, hire additional
	sales persons, capital expenditures and possible acquisitions. The primary sources of funding for such requirements will be cash
	generated from operations, raising additional capital from the sale of equity or other securities and borrowings under debt facilities
	which currently do not exist. We believe that we can generate sufficient cash flow from these sources to fund our operations for
	at least the next twelve months. In the event we should need additional financing, we can provide no assurances that we will be
	able to obtain financing on terms satisfactory to us, if at all.


	 






	Recent Financings




	 


	In 2015
	and 2016, we have completed the various financing summarized below.


	 




	Date


	 


	Dollar Amount


	 


	 


	# of Securities Sold




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	January 2015


	 


	$


	500,000


	 


	 


	Issued two-year promissory note in the principal amount of $500,000




	February 2015


	 


	$


	850,000


	 


	 


	Issued two-year promissory note in the principal amount of $850,000




	March 2015


	 


	$


	500,000


	 


	 


	Issued 1,666,667 common shares and a like number of warrants




	April 2015


	 


	$


	1,710,000


	 


	 


	Issued 5,700,000 common shares and a like number of warrants




	May 2015


	 


	$


	510,000


	 


	 


	Issued 1,700,000 common shares and a like number of warrants




	August/October 2015


	 


	$


	3,675,000


	 


	 


	Issued promissory notes in the principal amount of $3,675,000 and 3,675,000 shares of restricted common stock and warrants to purchase an additional 3,675,000 shares of restricted common stock




	December 2015-

	March 2016


	 


	$


	2,400,000


	 


	 


	Issued 240,000 shares of preferred stock convertible into 12,000,000 shares of common stock with anti-dilution protection for 2016




	April – May 2016


	 


	$


	1,025,000


	 


	 


	Issued convertible promissory notes in the principal amount of $1,025,000, convertible at $.20 per share with 100% warrant coverage.




	Third Quarter

	2016


	 


	$


	700,000


	 


	 


	Issued short term convertible promissory notes in the principal amount oif $700,000 and prepaid interest of 4,900,000 common shares.




	Fourth Quarter

	2016


	 


	$


	595,417


	 


	 


	Exercise of outstanding warrants/options at $.05 per share and issuance of approximately 11,908,335 shares of common stock.






	 




	First Quarter 2017 Loan Agreements and Certain Transactions




	 



	Prior to the February
	28, 2017 sale of secured debt, the Company’s holders of all of its Series AA preferred stock and substantially all of its
	outstanding debt both secured and unsecured (approximately $14.5 million) have been converted into equity securities of the Company
	as outlined below. It should be noted that the capital transactions below were based on a premium to the average closing sale price
	of $0.045 per share during the 60 day period prior to February 08, 2017.


	 


	On February 28, 2017,
	the Company entered into an agreement with a two non-affiliated persons to provide $1.6 million of short term secured debt financing
	in three monthly tranches, with the first monthly tranche in the amount of $600,000. The Company will issue in connection with
	each tranche, six-month secured convertible promissory note(s). Each note is initially convertible at $.05 per share. Any prepayment
	of the note requires the payment of a 25% premium and guaranteed interest for the entire six-month note. In the case of default,
	the amount owed by the Company will become 130% of the outstanding principal and accrued interest thereon. The Conversion Price
	will rest in the event that the note is unpaid and in default on the sixth month anniversary date of the issuance of the note.
	In connection with this transaction, the Company agreed to issue an origination fee of 1,600,000 shares of restricted common stock.
	Alexander Capital L.P. acted as Placement Agent and Advisor for this transaction.


	 


	As of April 5, 2017,
	the Company has outstanding 191,421,390 shares of common stock, 1,122,588 shares of newly designated Series AAA preferred stock
	and $1,350,000 of convertible notes. The convertible notes consist of $1,200,000 of secured notes and $150,000 of unsecured notes.
	Of the 1,122,588 shares of Series AAA preferred stock outstanding, 240,000 Series AA preferred stock with an original cost basis
	of $2.4 million were converted into Series AAA preferred stock. The remaining 882,588 shares of Series AAA preferred stock were
	issued in exchange for the conversion of principal and accrued interest of approximately $11,854,038 of unsecured debt. The terms
	of the Series AAA preferred stock can be summarized as follows:


	 


	The price of each preferred
	share may be convertible into common stock with an equivalent purchase price of $.10 per common share. If the preferred shares
	are converted, the subscriber will then receive 100% warrant coverage, with each warrant exercisable at $.05 per share with a cash
	payment to the Company through the close of business on December 31, 2019. The preferred shares have no voting or other preferences
	except as required by law other than the right of conversion described above and a liquidation preference equal to $.01 per share.


	 


	Thomas Arnost, our
	Executive Vice Chairman, and another principal stockholder agreed to convert letters of credit in the principal amount of $2,700,000
	and $322,000 of secured debt into shares of common stock at the then marketing price of $.05 per share. Accrued interest on these
	obligations were either previously converted into our common stock or were upon conversion of the principal, converted into common
	stock at the fair market value of our common stock at each interest accrual date.


	 


	The Company also raised
	an additional $407,084 from the exercise of outstanding warrants and new subscriptions. For these transactions, the Company issued
	8,141,667 shares of common stock.


	 








	 



	21



	 







	 




	 



	Transactions with Thomas Arnost, Executive Chairman




	 



	In December 2013, Thomas
	Arnost, a director of Mobiquity, purchased from TCA Global Credit Master Fund, the Company’s outstanding convertible promissory
	note in the amount of $350,000. Subsequently Mr. Arnost and the Company agreed to fix the conversion price of the note at $.30
	per share, extend the due date of the Note to June 12, 2014, which was subsequently extended to December 22, 2014 and again extended
	to December 31, 2015, subject to Mr. Arnost’s right to call the note at any time in his sole discretion, and increase the
	interest rate to 15% per annum. In December 2015, Mr. Arnost extended the due date of the note to December 31, 2016 and the Company
	agreed to lower the conversion price to $.20 per share.


	 


	Our agreement
	with Simon Properties requires us to maintain letters of credit for each calendar year under the agreement represented by the
	minimum amount of fees due for such calendar year. For 2015 and 2016, the minimum fees of $2.7 million has been secured
	through two bank letters of credit, one of which was issued in the amount of $1,350,000 utilizing the funds and the second
	letter of credit was obtained in the same amount through the funds of Thomas Arnost, our Executive Chairman. In the event
	Simon draws down upon either letter of credit, we have until the next minimum payment date (about 90 days) after the draw
	down to obtain replacement letters of credit. Each person who secured our letters of credit has the opportunity to notify us
	that they wish to turn the cash funds securing the letters of credit over to us and to convert such funds into our common
	stock. In February 2017, Thomas Arnost agreed to convert his $322,000 of secured debt and both Mr. Arnost and SNW JR
	Properties agreed to convert their letters of credit and any accrued interest at a conversion price of $.05 per share as to
	the principal amount and at market price for interest accrued at each respective interest accrual date. A total of 36,541,960
	shares were issued to Mr. Arnost and 27,738,260 shares were issued to SNW JB Properties.



	 







	ITEM 3. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT
	MARKET RISK




	 



	Market risk is
	the risk of loss arising from adverse changes in market rates and prices, such as interest rates, foreign currency exchange rates
	and commodity prices. Our primary exposure to market risk is interest rate risk associated with our short term money market investments.
	The Company does not have any financial instruments held for trading or other speculative purposes and does not invest in derivative
	financial instruments, interest rate swaps or other investments that alter interest rate exposure. The Company does not have any
	credit facilities with variable interest rates.



	 







	ITEM 4. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES




	 



	We maintain disclosure
	controls and procedures, which are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed in the reports we file or submit
	under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods
	specified in the Securities and Exchange Commission's rules and forms, and that such information is accumulated and communicated
	to our management, including our CEO and CFO, as appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.


	 


	Under the supervision
	and with the participation of our management, including our CEO and CFO, an evaluation was performed on the effectiveness of the
	design and operation of our disclosure controls and procedures as of the end of the period covered by this quarterly report. Based
	on that evaluation, our management, including our CEO and CFO, concluded that our disclosure controls and procedures were not effective
	as of the end of the period covered by this report.


	 


	There were no
	changes in the Company's internal controls over financial reporting during the most recently completed fiscal quarter that have
	materially affected or are reasonably likely to materially affect the Company's internal control over financial reporting.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	22



	 









	 




	 





	PART II. OTHER INFORMATION




	 








	ITEM 1. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS.




	 



	As
	of the filing date of this Form 10-Q, we are not a party to any pending legal proceedings.



	 







	ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS




	 



	As a Smaller Reporting
	Company as defined Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act and in item 10(f)(1) of Regulation S-K, we are electing scaled disclosure reporting
	obligations and therefore are not required to provide the information requested by this Item 1A.



	 


	  







	ITEM 2. CHANGES IN SECURITIES.




	 







	(a) The
	Company filed a Form 8-K – date of earliest event February 28, 2017 to report various sales of unregistered securities. The
	aforementioned form 8-K filed with the SEC on March 1, 2017 is incorporated by reference. It should be noted that the number of
	Series AAA preferred shares reported in the Form 8-K of 1,142,538 should be corrected to 1,122,588 shares which agrees with the
	information provided in Note 3 of this Form 10-Q. From January 1, 2017 through March 31, 2017, we had no sales or issuances of
	unregistered capital stock, except as referenced above and in the table below:


	 






	Date of Sale


	 


	Title of Security


	 


	Number Sold


	 


	Consideration Received and Description of Underwriting or Other Discounts to Market

	Price or Convertible

	Security, Afforded to

	Purchasers


	 


	Exemption

	from

	Registration

	Claimed


	 


	If Option, Warrant or Convertible

	Security, terms

	of exercise or

	conversion




	Jan. – March 2017


	 


	Common Stock and

	Warrants to

	Purchase

	Common

	Stock


	 


	3,800,000 shares and 1,000,000 warrants


	 


	Services rendered; no commissions paid


	 


	Section 4(2)


	 


	Each warrant is exercisable at $.10 per share through March 6, 2022




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	March 2017


	 


	Common Stock Purchase

	Warrants


	 


	2,200,000 shares


	 


	These warrants were issued to a FINRA licensed broker/dealer as compensation in connection with raising $1.6 million from the issuance of secured debt securities described in the aforementioned Form 8-K.


	 


	Section 4(2)


	 


	Each warrant is exercisable at $.06 per share through March 1, 2022





	  


	(b)
	Rule 463 of the Securities Act is not applicable to the Company.


	 


	(c)
	In the three months ended March 31, 2017, there were no repurchases by the Company of its Common Stock.



	 







	ITEM 3. DEFAULTS UPON SENIOR SECURITIES.




	 



	Not
	applicable.



	 







	ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES.




	 



	Not
	applicable.



	 







	ITEM 5. OTHER INFORMATION.




	 



	Not
	applicable.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	23



	 








	 




	 







	ITEM 6. EXHIBITS.



	   






	Exhibit


	 


	 


	 




	Number


	 


	 


	Exhibit Title




	 


	3.1


	 


	 


	Certificate of Incorporation filed March 26, 1998 (1)




	 


	3.2


	 


	 


	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation filed June 10, 1999 (1)




	 


	3.3


	 


	 


	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation approved by stockholders in 2005(1)




	 


	3.4


	 


	 


	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation dated September 11, 2008 (11)




	 


	3.5


	 


	 


	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation dated October 7, 2009 (11)




	 


	3.6


	 


	 


	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation dated May 18, 2012 (11)




	 


	3.7


	 


	 


	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation dated September 10, 2013 (17)




	 


	3.8


	 


	 


	Amended By-Laws (1)




	 


	3.9


	 


	 


	2014 Amendment to By-Laws (19)




	 


	3.10


	 


	 


	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation filed December 22, 2015 (23)




	 


	3.11


	 


	 


	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation dated March 24, 2016 (21)




	 


	3.12


	 


	 


	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation(22)




	 


	4.1


	 


	 


	Registration Rights Agreement (18)




	 


	10.1


	 


	 


	Employment Agreement - Michael Trepeta (2)




	 


	10.2


	 


	 


	Employment Agreement - Dean Julia (2)




	 


	10.3


	 


	 


	Amendments to Employment Agreement - Michael Trepeta (5)(7)




	 


	10.4


	 


	 


	Amendments to Employment Agreement - Dean L. Julia (5)(7)




	 


	10.5


	 


	 


	Joint Venture Agreement with Atrium Enterprises Ltd. (6)




	 


	10.6


	 


	 


	Agreement with Aon Consulting (6)




	 


	10.7


	 


	 


	Amendment to Exhibits 10.3 and 10.4 dated April 7, 2010 (10)




	 


	10.8


	 


	 


	Office Lease for Garden City, NY (11)




	 


	10.9


	 


	 


	Amendment to Employment Agreement – Dean L. Julia (11)




	 


	10.10


	 


	 


	Amendment to Employment Agreement – Michael D. Trepeta (11)




	 


	10.11


	 


	 


	Convertible Promissory Note (12)




	 


	10.12


	 


	 


	Registration Rights Agreement dated June 12, 2012 by and between the company and TCA (13)




	 


	10.13


	 


	 


	Equity Agreement dated June 12, 2012 by and between the company and TCA (13)




	 


	10.14


	 


	 


	Amendment to Dean L. Julia’s Employment Agreement (16)




	 


	10.15


	 


	 


	Amendment to Michael D. Trepeta’s Employment Agreement (16)




	 


	10.16


	 


	 


	Common Stock Purchase Agreement with Aspire Capital (18)




	 


	10.17


	 


	 


	Termination of TCA Registration Rights Agreement and Equity Agreement (18)




	 


	10.18


	 


	 


	Employment Agreement – Sean Trepeta (19)




	 


	10.19


	 


	 


	Employment Agreement – Paul Bauersfeld (19)




	 


	10.20


	 


	 


	Employment Agreement – Thomas Arnost (20)





	 


	 


	 








	 



	24



	 







	 




	 




	 


	10.21


	 


	 


	December 2013 Agreement with Thomas Arnost modifying secured debt purchased by Arnost from TCA (19)




	 


	10.22


	 


	 


	Letter Agreement dated December 9, 2014 with Thomas Arnost to extend expiration date of secured note to December 31, 2015 (19)




	 


	10.23


	 


	 


	Letter Agreement dated July 8, 2013 with Thomas Arnost to provide letter of credit for $1,350,000(19)






	 


	10.24


	 


	 


	Letter Agreement dated July 8, 2013 with SNW Properties to provide letter of credit for $1,350,000(19)




	 


	10.25


	 


	 


	Letter Agreement dated December 15, 2014 with Carl E. Berg (19)




	 


	10.26


	 


	 


	Separation Agreement with Michael D. Trepeta (24)




	 


	10.27


	 


	 


	Form of convertible promissory note. (22)




	 


	11.1


	 


	 


	Statement re: Computation of per share earnings. See Statement of Operations and Notes to Financial Statements




	 


	14.1


	 


	 


	Code of Ethics/Code of Conduct (Incorporated by reference to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014)




	 


	21.1


	 


	 


	Subsidiaries of the Issuer (15)




	 


	31.1


	 


	 



	Rule 13a-14(a) Certification in accordance with Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (*)





	 


	31.2


	 


	 



	Rule 13a-14(a) Certification in accordance with Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (*)





	 


	32.1


	 


	 



	Certification pursuant to 18. U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (*)





	 


	32.2


	 


	 



	Certification pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (*)





	 


	99.1


	 


	 


	2005 Employee Benefit and Consulting Services Compensation Plan (2)




	 


	99.2


	 


	 


	Form of Class A Warrant (2)




	 


	99.3


	 


	 


	Form of Class B Warrant (2)




	 


	99.4


	 


	 


	Amendment to 2005 Plan (4)




	 


	99.5


	 


	 


	Form of Class C Warrant (8)




	 


	99.6


	 


	 


	2009 Employee Benefit and Consulting Services Compensation Plan (3)




	 


	99.7


	 


	 


	Form of Class D Warrant (3)




	 


	99.8


	 


	 


	Form or Class E Warrant(9)




	 


	99.9


	 


	 


	Form of Class F Warrant (9)




	 


	99.10


	 


	 


	Form of Class G Warrant (9)




	 


	99.11


	 


	 


	Form of Class H Warrant (9)




	 


	99.12


	 


	 


	Form of Class AA Warrant (11)




	 


	99.13


	 


	 


	Form of Class BB Warrant (11)




	 


	99.14


	 


	 


	Form of Class CC Warrant (19)




	 


	101.INS


	 


	 


	XBRL Instance Document (*)




	 


	101.SCH


	 


	 


	Document, XBRL Taxonomy Extension (*)




	 


	101.CAL


	 


	 


	Calculation Linkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition (*)




	 


	101.DEF


	 


	 


	Linkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension Labels (*)




	 


	101.LAB


	 


	 


	Linkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension (*)




	 


	101.PRE


	 


	 


	Presentation Linkbase (*)





	________________


	 


	 


	 








	 



	25



	 







	 




	_____


	* Filed herewith.





	(1)




	Incorporated by reference to Registrant's Registration Statement on Form 10-SB as filed with the Commission on February 10, 2005.






	(2)




	Incorporated by reference to Registrant’s Registration Statement on Form 10-SB/A filed with the Commission March 18, 2005.






	(3)




	Incorporated by reference to Form 10-K filed for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009.






	(4)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant's Form 10-QSB/A filed with the Commission on August 18, 2005.






	(5)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant's Form 10-KSB for its fiscal year ended December 31, 2005.






	(6)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant's Form 10-KSB for its fiscal year ended December 31, 2006.






	(7)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant's Form 8-K dated September 21, 2007.






	(8)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant's Form 10-QSB for its quarter ended September 30, 2006.






	(9)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant's Form 10-K for its fiscal year ended December 31, 2010.






	(10)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant’s Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2011.








	(11)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant's Form 10-K for its fiscal year ended December 31, 2012.






	(12)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant’s Form 8-K dated June 14, 2012.






	(13)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant’s Form 8-K dated June 15, 2012.






	(14)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant’s Form 8-K dated June 6, 2013.






	(15)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant's Form 10-K for its fiscal year ended December 31, 2013.






	(16)




	Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K filed June 6, 2013.






	(17)




	Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K filed September 11, 2013.






	(18)




	Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K filed April 1, 2014.






	(19)




	Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K filed with the SEC on December 19, 2014.






	(20)


	(21)




	Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K dated December 2, 2014.


	Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K dated March 24, 2016.






	(22)




	Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K dated February 28, 2017.






	(23)


	(24)




	Incorporated by reference to Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended
	December 31, 2015.


	Incorporated by reference to Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended
	December 31, 2016.






	 




	 




	 




	 











	 



	26



	 









	 





	 








	SIGNATURES




	 



	Pursuant to the requirements of Section
	13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the
	undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.


	 




	 



	MOBIQUITY TECHNOLOGIES, INC.





	 


	 


	 





	Date: May 16, 2017




	By:




	/s/ Dean L. Julia





	 


	 



	Dean L. Julia,





	 


	 



	Co-Principal Executive Officer





	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 





	Date: May 16, 2017




	By:




	/s/ Sean McDonnell





	 


	 



	Sean McDonnell,





	 


	 



	Principal Financial Officer





	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	27



	 


















	EXHIBIT 31.1




	 






	CERTIFICATION OF PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE
	OFFICER



	 


	I, Dean L. Julia, certify that:


	 


	1. I have reviewed this Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q of Mobiquity
	Technologies, Inc.;


	 


	2. Based on my knowledge, this report does not contain any untrue
	statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances
	under which such statements were made, not misleading with respect to the period covered by this report;


	 


	3. Based on my knowledge, the financial statements, and other
	financial information included in this report, fairly present in all material respects the financial condition, results of operations
	and cash flows of the registrant as of, and for, the periods presented in this report;


	 


	4. The registrant’s other certifying officer and
	I are responsible for establishing and maintaining disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e)
	and 15d-15(e)) and internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) for the
	registrant and have:


	 


	      a) Designed
	such disclosure controls and procedures, or caused such disclosure controls and procedures to be designed under our supervision,
	to ensure that material information relating to the registrant, including its consolidated subsidiaries, is made known to us by
	others within those entities, particularly during the period in which this report is being prepared;


	 


	      b) Designed
	such internal control over financial reporting, or caused such internal control over financial reporting to be designed under our
	supervision, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial
	statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;


	 


	      c) Evaluated
	the effectiveness of the registrant's disclosure controls and procedures and presented in this report our conclusions about the
	effectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures, as of the end of the period covered by this report based on such evaluation;
	and


	 


	      d) Disclosed
	in this report any change in the registrant's internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the registrant's most
	recent fiscal quarter that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the registrant's internal control
	over financial reporting; and


	 


	5. The registrant's other certifying officer and I have disclosed,
	based on our most recent evaluation of internal control over financial reporting, to the registrant's auditors and the audit committee
	of the registrant's board of directors (or persons performing the equivalent functions):


	 


	      a) All
	significant deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal control over financial reporting which
	are reasonably likely to adversely affect the registrant's ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information;
	and


	 


	      b) Any
	fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the registrant's internal
	control over financial reporting.


	 





	Date: May 16, 2017




	/s/ DEAN L. JULIA





	 



	DEAN L. JULIA,





	 



	CO-PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE OFFICER






	 


	 











	EXHIBIT 31.2




	 






	CERTIFICATION OF PRINCIPAL FINANCIAL
	OFFICER



	 


	I, Sean McDonnell, certify that:


	 


	1. I have reviewed this Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q of Mobiquity
	Technologies, Inc.;


	 


	2. Based on my knowledge, this report does not contain any untrue
	statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances
	under which such statements were made, not misleading with respect to the period covered by this report;


	 


	3. Based on my knowledge, the financial statements, and other
	financial information included in this report, fairly present in all material respects the financial condition, results of operations
	and cash flows of the registrant as of, and for, the periods presented in this report;


	 


	4. The registrant’s other certifying officer and I are
	responsible for establishing and maintaining disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and
	15d-15(e)) and internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) for the registrant
	and have:


	 


	      a) Designed
	such disclosure controls and procedures, or caused such disclosure controls and procedures to be designed under our supervision,
	to ensure that material information relating to the registrant, including its consolidated subsidiaries, is made known to us by
	others within those entities, particularly during the period in which this report is being prepared;


	 


	      b) Designed
	such internal control over financial reporting, or caused such internal control over financial reporting to be designed under our
	supervision, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial
	statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;


	 


	      c) Evaluated
	the effectiveness of the registrant's disclosure controls and procedures and presented in this report our conclusions about the
	effectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures, as of the end of the period covered by this report based on such evaluation;
	and


	 


	      d) Disclosed
	in this report any change in the registrant's internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the registrant's most
	recent fiscal quarter that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the registrant's internal control
	over financial reporting; and


	 


	5. The registrant's other certifying officer and I have disclosed,
	based on our most recent evaluation of internal control over financial reporting, to the registrant's auditors and the audit committee
	of the registrant's board of directors (or persons performing the equivalent functions):


	 


	      a) All
	significant deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal control over financial reporting which
	are reasonably likely to adversely affect the registrant's ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information;
	and


	 


	      b) Any
	fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the registrant's internal
	control over financial reporting.


	 






	Date: May 16, 2017





	/s/ SEAN MCDONNELL                  





	 



	SEAN MCDONNELL, PRINCIPAL FINANCIAL OFFICER






	 













	EXHIBIT 32.1




	 






	CERTIFICATION OF PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE
	OFFICER




	PURSUANT TO 18U.S.C. SECTION 1350



	 


	 


	In connection with the Quarterly
	Report of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (the “Company”) on Form 10-Q for the period ending March 31, 2017 as
	filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on the date hereof (the "Report"), I, Dean L. Julia, Co-Principal
	Executive Officer of the Company, certify, pursuant to 18 U.S.C. ss.1350, as adopted pursuant to ss.906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley
	Act, that:


	 


	(1) The Report fully complies with the requirements of Section
	13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; and


	 


	(2) The information contained in the Report fairly presents,
	in all material respects, the financial condition and result of operations of the Company.


	 




	 



	/s/ DEAN L. JULIA    





	 



	DEAN L. JULIA





	 



	CO-PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE OFFICER





	Date: May 16, 2017











	 


	 













	EXHIBIT 32.2




	 






	CERTIFICATION OF PRINCIPAL FINANCIAL
	OFFICER




	PURSUANT TO 18U.S.C. SECTION 1350



	 


	In connection with the Quarterly
	Report of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (the “Company”) on Form 10-Q for the period ending March 31, 2017 as filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on the date hereof (the "Report"), I, Sean McDonnell,
	Principal Financial Officer of the Company, certify, pursuant to 18 U.S.C. ss.1350, as adopted pursuant to ss.906 of the
	Sarbanes-Oxley Act, that:


	 


	(1) The Report fully complies with the requirements of Section
	13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; and


	 


	(2) The information contained in the Report fairly presents,
	in all material respects, the financial condition and result of operations of the Company.


	 




	 



	/s/ SEAN MCDONNELL





	 



	SEAN MCDONNELL





	 



	PRINCIPAL FINANCIAL OFFICER





	Date: May 16, 2017



	 






	 















About Us



















































































About
Services
Careers
Contact











Alexa
AWS
Case Studies
Blog








































ABOUT US

        Mobiquity is a digital engagement provider for the world’s leading brands. We create compelling digital experiences to help you show you care to the people who matter most.
    




Every business has an engagement opportunity.And it's not about technology alone.






Services
We offer end-to-end services to help our clients envision, deliver, and continuously improve digital experiences that show their users they really care.




Strategy
Define your strategy and design your business
Experience Design
Envision multi-channel experiences through research and design
Product Engineering
Develop innovative software products leveraging Agile processes
Cloud Services
Gain scalability and flexibility with the power of AWS
Analytics
Use data to drive better experiences and inform future decisions








Our Approach
At Mobiquity, our approach is focused on achieving a segment of one. We drive personalization down to the individual user with seamless experiences across channels because your customers are empowered. They expect to be engaged when, where, and how they want. And we make that possible to drive breakthrough results for your business.







Get to know your users and learn what matters to them


Determine the right combination of channels and endpoints to meet their needs


Define the exact details of the experience including content, features, and use cases


Deliver your omnichannel experience through a digital engagement platform built on the AWS Cloud 








Channels We Serve







Mobile



Web



Internet of Things



Chat/Voice



Call Center








We Transform







RETAIL


 
HEALTHCARE



INSURANCE



FINANCIAL SERVICES







MEDIA



HOSPITALITY


 
LIFE SCIENCES



RESTAURANTS













Leadership Team









John Castleman
Chief Executive Officer








Andy Norman
Chief Operating Officer








Tom Sheehan
Chief Financial Officer








Liz Smith
SVP, Human Resources








Paul Piebinga
General Manager, Europe








Ty Rollin
Chief Innovation Officer








Mike Welsh
Chief Creative Officer







Our Partners
We join forces with leading technology providers to deliver world-class innovation to our clients.





























About
Mobiquity is a digital engagement provider for the world’s leading brands. We create compelling digital experiences to help you show you care to the people who matter most.
Read More



Blog















A New Way To Eat Fresh? Subway Introduces Self-Serve Kiosks
Read More



















Mobiquity’s Joel Evans To Talk Voice At Innovation Congress 2017
Read More



















Mobiquity Team Receives Second Place in Global AI Hackathon
Read More







Latest Tweets


Tweets by @mobiquityinc

Follow Us On Twitter








© 2017 Mobiquity Inc., all rights reserved. | Privacy Policy





































Mobiquity Technologies Inc MOBQ Profile-Financials-Revenues-Growth-Market-Description                         Please wait while the search results are loading...     Plunkett Research,® Ltd.Our Market Research = Your Smart Decisions  What are you looking for?    Information Marketing & Research PROS   Information for Students & Professors   Subscribers Log In     Home >  Industries  >  Advertising, Branding & Marketing  > Mobiquity Technologies Inc   Plunkett Research Online: Mobiquity Technologies Inc    MOBIQUITY TECHNOLOGIES INC (MOBQ:PINX) Company Profile, Corporate Revenues, Growth, Market Size, Analysis, Business Forecasts, Market Share, Metrics, SWOTMobiquity Technologies Inc is an advertising technology company which through its subsidiaries provides brand marketing, marketing platforms, mobile marketing, social networks, website development and digital media solutions...... Mobiquity Technologies Inc  Ticker: MOBQExchange: PINXParent Company: Year Established: Employees: Fiscal Year Ends in  Phone: 516 256-7766Fax: Address: 600 Old Country RoadSuite 541Garden City, NY 11530 United States MapTypes Of Business Industry Ranks  Total RevenueMarket CapEmployee CountNet IncomeRevenue 3Y GrowthIncome 3Y GrowthReturn on Assets (%)Return on Equity (%)Return on Invested Capital (%) Industry NAICS code:  Advertising Material Distribution Services Refreshing... Contacts Excel TextDescription Sean McDonnellCFOThomas ArnostChairman of the Board/Director See More Mobiquity Technologies Inc is an advertising technology company which through its subsidiaries provides brand marketing, marketing platforms, mobile marketing, social networks, website development and digital media solutions......See More See More Auditor: Sadler,Gibb and Associates, LLC Legal Advisor:    Financial Details  Compare to Industry Averages  Build Custom Table  Compare Companies $USD, In whole numbers,  except marked * or %201620152014201320122011Financials    Revenue    Cost of Revenue    Gross  Margin %    R&D Expense    Operating  Income    Operating  Margin %    SGA Expense    Net  Income    Earnings Per Share    Dividends    Book Value Per Share    Operating  Cash  Flow    Capital  Expenditure    Free  Cash  FlowProfitability    EBITDA    Return on Assets %    Return on Equity %    Net  Margin %    Assets  Turnover    Financial  LeverageBrands, Divisions and AffiliatesTop Salaries  NameTitleSalary (US$)Bonus (US$)Other ThoughtsCorporate CultureApparent Female Officers or Directors:     Javascript is disabled.    Request Free Trial Subscriptions Plans & Pricing500 Industries Analyzed for Market Size, Profits and Forecasts25,000 Companies Profiled, Ranked100,000 Industry Statistics150,000 Industry Executives Profiled1,000,000 Words of Trends Analysis Printed Almanacs and Ebooks Custom Research ProjectsA REPRESENTATIVE LIST OF ORGANIZATIONS THAT HAVE USED OUR RESEARCH PRODUCTS:         Take a TourHow to Use Plunkett Research Online-8 MinutesPlunkett Online AccessPlunkett Research BooksContactPhone: 713.932.0000Alternate Phone: 713.961.3282Fax: 713.932.7080E-Mail UsAsk a Product QuestionMedia Interviews, Get a SpeakerCustom ResearchInternational Distributors ListNews & RSSTestimonials  Your tool is very comprehensive and immensely useful. The vertical marketing tool is very helpful, for it assists us in that venue, as well as targeting customers’ competition for new sales…The comprehensive material is absolutely fabulous. I am very impressed, I have to say! Tammy Dalton, National Account Manager, MCI, Tammy Dalton  We are especially trying to push Plunkett since all of our students have to do so much industry research and your interface is so easy to use.  St. John’s College, Library Services  I’m amazed at how much information is available and the various ways to access it. This will be a major resource for our serious job seekers.  Penn State University, Career Services  I really appreciate the depth you were able to get to so quickly (for our project). The team has looked through the material and are very happy with the data you pulled together.  Marketing Manager, Hilton Worldwide  Plunkett Research Online is an excellent resource…the database contains a wealth of useful data on sectors and companies, which is easy to search and well presented.   Help and advice on how to conduct, export and save searches is available at all stages. Penny Crossland, Editor, VIP Magazine  The more I get into the database, the happier I am that we’ll have it–REALLY happy!!!  Between the quality and affordability of your product, its appeal to and value for our users, and the inestimably ethical and loyalty-guaranteeing conduct of your business, I will always have more than sufficient praises to sing for Plunkett Research. Michael Oppenheim, Collections & Reference Services, UCLA  Plunkett Research Online provides a great ‘one stop shop’ for us to quickly come up to speed on major industries. It provides us with an overall analysis of the market, key statistics, and overviews of the major players in the industry in an online service that is fast, easy to navigate, and reliable. Wendy Stotts, Manager, Carlson Companies-Information Center  We are especially trying to push Plunkett’s since all of our students have to do so much industry research and your interface is so easy to use. Gary White, Business Materials Selector, Penn State University     Sign up for Free Research Reports   Subscribe                                 



About - Mobiquity Networks Mobiquity Networks
















































Products
Unique Data
App Publishers
About

Investor Relations
Press & News


Contact








Blog
Support
Login







Products
Unique Data
App Publishers
About

Investor Relations


Press & News
FAQs
Contact









Home  > About






The Future of Mobile Marketing & Research
Mobiquity Networks is a next generation mobile location data and marketing company. The company provides precise, unique, at-scale location based data and insights on consumer’s real world behavior and trends for use in marketing and research. With our combined exclusive data sets of mall and premium outlet beacon data, and first party location data via our advanced SDK; Mobiquity Networks provides the most accurate and scaled solution for mobile data collection and analysis.








Clients & Partners


































Our Team


Dean Julia
CEO
A Hofstra University grad, Dean has deep experience in early-stage funding of technology & life sciences businesses. Dean co-founded Mobiquity after a successful career in the finance industry, where he was involved in the funding of numerous startup ventures.




Paul Bauersfeld
CTO
Paul brings over 20 years of executive IT experience spanning venture capital and Fortune 100 companies. An engineering graduate from RIT, Paul has participated as either founder or advisor in a number of IT startups that realized successful exits.




Sean McDonnell
CFO
Sean has been a CPA for nearly 25 years following graduation from Dowling University. As a private practitioner, he helped numerous companies manage growth and acquire financing, and has been guiding Mobiquity since 2005.




Sean Trepeta
President
Sean’s dynamic telecommunications career began in sales leadership, and ultimately led to co-founding a major telecom reseller organization culminating a successful exit via acquisition in 2006. A SUNY Cortland grad, Sean has co-founded and advised a number of technology-based startups.




Jed Weissberg
SVP Product and Strategy
Jed Weissberg has more than a fifteen years of experience building successful consumer-facing online services. He’s created and held senior-level positions in successful startups and has worked within and with large media organizations, including Nickelodeon, Scholastic and The New York Times.




Tom M. Arnost
Chairman
Mr. Thomas M. Arnost is Executive Chairman at Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. and President & CEO-Broadcasting Station Group at Equity Media Holdings Corp.
Mr. Arnost was previously employed as Co-President by Univision Communications, Inc., Co-President by Univision Television Group, Inc., a Sales Associate by KTLA-TV, and a Principal by Royal Palm Capital Partners, Inc.








We are constantly seeking ways to enhance the Simon shopping experience through relevant, leading edge technology. We are pleased to help facilitate the growing adoption of iBeacon technology and believe it is an important new initiative that will provide Simon, its retailers and brands with interesting, new ways to reach and communication with shoppers who choose to opt in to the program.
Mikael Thygesen, Chief Marketing Officer, Simon






Company News



July 11th, 2017Mobiquity Networks Expands Its Development Team with the Hiring Of Data Scientist






June 22nd, 2017BAROMETRIC® ANNOUNCES DATA PARTNERSHIPS WITH MOBIQUITY NETWORKS, ALPHONSO AND COMMERCE SIGNALS






June 19th, 2017MOBIQUITY NETWORKS LAUNCHES NEW “PASSAGE PLATFORM” PROVIDING MARKETERS DEEPER INSIGHTS AND BUSINESS INTELLIGENCE INTO CONSUMERS GEO-BEHAVORIAL ACTIONS ON MOBILE DEVICES






June 7th, 2017Mobiquity Networks Partners with Intellectsoft Group to Grow App Publisher Network



View more


Latest Tweets
Tweets by @MobiquityNet








     

 -->








We'd love to hear from you, give us a call: 516-246-9422
or send us an email: info@mobiquitynetworks.com










SDK License Agreement
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
Opt-Out








Copyright Mobiquity Networks, Inc 2017
           All Rights Reserved


SDK License Agreement
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
Opt-Out















Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. 10-K Apr. 14, 2017  5:13 PM | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (MOBQ)FORM 10-K | Annual ReportApr. 14, 2017  5:13 PM|About: Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (MOBQ)View as PDF

 Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (Form: 10-K, Received: 04/14/2017 17:16:20) 











	MOBIQUITY TECHNOLOGIES, INC.


	SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION


	Washington, D.C. 20549


	 


	FORM 10-K



	x

	ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(D) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934


	 




	FOR THE FISCAL YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31,
	2016


	COMMISSION FILE NUMBER: 000-51160


	 


	MOBIQUITY TECHNOLOGIES, INC.


	(Exact name of Registrant as specified in
	its charter)


	 





	New York




	11-3427886






	(State of jurisdiction of


	incorporation or organization)




	(I.R.S. Employee


	Identification Number)





	 


	 





	600 Old Country Road, STE 541, Garden City, NY




	11530






	(Address of principal executive offices)




	(Zip Code)





	 


	 





	Registrant's telephone number, including area code:




	(516) 256-7766





	 


	 





	Securities registered pursuant to Section 12 (b) of the Act:




	None






	Securities registered pursuant to Section 12 (g) of the Act:




	Common Stock, $.0001 Par Value





	 


	Indicate by check mark if the registrant
	is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes 

	o

	 No

	x



	 


	Check whether the Registrant is not required
	to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act.

	o



	 


	Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant
	(1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding
	12 months (or for such shorter period that the Registrant was required to file such reports) and (2) has been subject to such filing
	requirements for the past 90 days. Yes 

	x

	 No

	o



	 


	Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant
	has submitted electronically and posted on its corporate Web site, if any, every Interactive data file required to be submitted
	and posted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter
	period that the registrant was required to submit and post such files). Yes 

	x

	 No

	o



	 


	Indicate by check mark if disclosure of
	delinquent filers in response to Item 405 of Regulation S-K is not contained in this form, and no disclosure will be contained,
	to the best of Registrant's knowledge, in definitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference in part III of this
	Form 10-K or any amendment to this Form 10-K 

	o

	.


	 


	Indicate by check mark whether the registrant
	is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, or a smaller reporting company as defined by Rule
	12b-2 of the Exchange Act: smaller reporting company

	x

	.


	 


	Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant
	is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes 

	o

	 No

	x



	 


	As of June 30, 2016 the number of shares
	of Common Stock held by non-affiliates was approximately 71,175,872 shares based upon 80,176,434 shares of Common Stock outstanding.
	The approximate market value based on the last sale (i.e. $.10 per share as of June 30, 2016) of the Company’s Common Stock
	was approximately $7,117,587.


	 


	The number of shares outstanding of the Registrant’s Common
	Stock, as of April 5,2017, was 185,201,768.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	 



	 







	 




	 


	 


	 


	FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS


	 


	We believe this annual
	report contains "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.
	These statements are subject to risks and uncertainties and are based on the beliefs and assumptions of our management, based on
	information currently available to our management. When we use words such as "believes," "expects," "anticipates,"
	"intends," "plans," "estimates," "should," "likely" or similar expressions, we
	are making forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements include information concerning our possible or assumed future
	results of operations set forth under "Business" and/or "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition
	and Results of Operations." Forward-looking statements are not guarantees of performance. They involve risks, uncertainties
	and assumptions. Our future results and stockholder values may differ materially from those expressed in the forward-looking statements.
	Many of the factors that will determine these results and values are beyond our ability to control or predict. Stockholders are
	cautioned not to put undue reliance on any forward-looking statements. For those statements, we claim the protection of the safe
	harbor for forward-looking statements contained in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. For a discussion of some
	of the factors that may cause actual results to differ materially from those suggested by the forward-looking statements, please
	read carefully the information under "Risk Factors." In addition to the Risk Factors and other important factors discussed
	elsewhere in this annual report, you should understand that other risks and uncertainties and our public announcements and filings
	under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended could affect our future results and could cause results to differ materially
	from those suggested by the forward-looking statements.


	 



	As used in this Form 10-K, the terms
	“we,” “our,” “us,” “Mobiquity Technologies” or “the company” refer
	to Mobiquity Technologies and its subsidiaries, taken as a whole, unless the context otherwise requires it.



	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	 



	 







	 




	 


	 



	TABLE OF CONTENTS




	 





	 



	PAGE





	 


	 






	Item 1 Business




	1






	Item 1A Risk Factors




	11






	Item 1B Unresolved Staff Comments




	21






	Item 2 Properties




	21






	Item 3 Legal Proceedings




	21






	Item 4 Mine Safety Disclosures




	21






	Item 5 Market for Common Equity, related Stockholders Matters, and Issuer




	22






	Item 6 Selected Financial Data




	24






	Item 7 Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations




	24






	Item 7A Qualitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk




	29






	Item 8 Financial Statements




	29






	Item 9 Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure




	30






	Item 9A Controls and Procedures




	30






	Item 9B Other Information




	31






	Item 10 Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance




	32






	Item 11 Executive Compensation




	37






	Item 12 Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters




	45






	Item 13 Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence




	46






	Item 14 Principal Accountant Fees and Services




	50






	Item 15 Exhibits and Financial  Statement Schedules




	51




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	i



	 







	 




	 









	Item 1. Business



	 



	Introduction



	 



	Mobiquity
	Technologies, Inc., a New York corporation (the “Company”), is the parent company of two operating subsidiaries; Mobiquity
	Networks, Inc.(“Mobiquity Networks”) and Ace Marketing & Promotions, Inc. (“Ace Marketing”). The Company’s
	wholly-owned subsidiary, Mobiquity Networks has evolved and grown from a mobile advertising technology company focused on Driving
	Awareness and Foot-traffic throughout its indoor mall-based beacon network, into a next generation mobile location data and marketing
	company. Mobiquity Networks provides precise unique, at-scale location-based data and insights on consumer’s real world
	behavior and trends for use in marketing and research. With our combined data sets of shopping malls, premium outlets and cinemas
	beacon data, and first party location data via our advanced Software Development Kit (“SDK”) utilizing multiple geo-location
	technologies, Mobiquity Networks provides one of the most accurate and scaled solution for mobile data collection and analysis.
	Mobiquity Networks is seeking to create several new revenue streams from the mobile data collection and analysis, including, but
	not limited to; Push Notification Campaigns, Mobile Audiences & Segments, real-time

	Data
	Provision,

	Attribution Reporting and Custom Research. The Company is also attempting to reduce expenses by renegotiating
	certain Mall Developer Agreements.



	 


	Ace Marketing is our
	legacy marketing and promotions business which provides integrated marketing services to our commercial customers. While Ace Marketing
	currently represents substantially all of our revenue, we anticipate that activity from Ace Marketing will represent a diminishing
	portion of corporate revenue as our attention is now principally focused on developing and executing on opportunities in our Mobiquity
	Networks business. We believe that our Mobiquity Networks business represents our greatest growth opportunity going forward.


	 


	 


	 




	Mobiquity
	Networks






	 








	Mobiquity
	Revenue Streams





	 



	Mobiquity Networks
	is seeking to create several new revenue streams from the mobile data collection and analysis, including, but not limited to; Push
	Notification Campaigns, Mobile Audiences and Segments, real-time

	Data Provision,

	Attribution
	Reporting and Custom Research as described below.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	1



	 







	 




	 








	 





	 





	Push
	Notification Campaigns





	 




Click to enlarge
	 



	 


	 


	 


	 


	Push notification
	campaigns are ideal for drive in-store traffic by reaching consumers before they decide where to shop and what to buy in malls
	and shopping center common areas.


	 


	Data collected with
	push notifications can:


	 







	·



	Increase your client’s revenue potential by driving in-store traffic;




	 







	·



	Enable real time, location based in-app engagement; and




	 







	·



	Enhance interaction by providing localized, relevant content.




	 






	 





	 





	Mobile
	Audiences






	 






Click to enlarge
	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	Mobiquity’s
	Mobile Audiences enables advertisers to create specific audience segments based on user’s real world behaviors. With tracking
	of over 500 plus brands to understand consumer behavior and affinity, the platform provides unparalleled accuracy and precision
	due to the volume of user data points and our understanding of dwell time at locations.


	 


	Mobiquity Mobile Audiences:


	 







	·



	Retrieve over 600 existing geo-behavioral segments based on visitation to specific locations, chain and merchants;




	 







	·



	Include event attendance, home/work locations and motion into your audiences;




	 







	·



	Create custom or use standard audiences like: frequent store visitors, in-market auto buyers, consumers with homes in specific
	zips/DMAs; and




	 







	·



	Are provided directly to client systems or via standard services.




	 


	 


	 






	 




	 








	 



	2



	 







	 




	 






	 




	 




	Location
	Data Feeds






	 






Click to enlarge
	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	Looking to substantially increase
	the number of unique devices on your own location data platform? Mobiquity’s Location Data Feed will provide clients with
	millions of first party unique devices and associated meta data to use with clients own places database.


	 


	With location data
	feeds, clients have access to:


	 







	·



	Location data from millions of devices;




	 







	·



	Updates on client’s schedule which can be real-time, daily, monthly; and




	 







	·



	Includes data on operating system, timestamp, latitude, longitude and more relevant data.




	 






	 




	 




	Campaign
	Attribution





	 



Click to enlarge

	 



	 


	 


	 


	 


	Mobiquity clients can now determine
	impact of its advertising campaigns on its in-store visits and store traffic patterns by leveraging our platform to collect and
	analyze location data for a clear view of how effectively client campaigns are in driving consumers to its stores.



	 



	With Mobiquity Mobile
	Audiences, clients can have real time information on:


	 







	·



	Footfall attribution;




	 







	·



	Insights of daily conversion;




	 







	·



	Insights on visit time and dwell time; and




	 







	·




	Geographical and Audience analysis.





	 


	 


	 






	 




	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	3



	 







	 





	 









	 





	 





	Footfall,
	Audience & Path Reporting






	 






Click to enlarge
	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	Customized reports provide our clients
	with a deeper understanding of consumer behaviors, store location performance, new store site selection and marketing strategy.


	 


	Reports include:


	 







	·



	Visit analysis by time & trends by time of day, week and month;




	 







	·



	Distance from home/work of store locations;




	 







	·



	Performance, trends, and comparisons of store locations;




	 







	·



	Dwell time and frequency comparisons by store locations;




	 







	·



	Competitive analysis;




	 







	·



	Locations visited before and after the desired points of interest(“POI”); and




	 







	·



	Correlation between POIs visited and distance from key locations




	 








	 






	 






	What Mobiquity
	Networks is about






	 






	 





	Mobiquity
	Networks is a location data marketing and insights company. We provide accurate and precise location on millions of mobile devices
	to help marketers and researchers better find and understand their audiences. All of our data is first party supplied by our SDK
	installed within dozens of class "A" app partner's apps. First party data is considered the most valuable and accurate
	that can be collected from an SDK. All data provided by Mobiquity Networks is deterministic with a high degree of accuracy and
	precision.




	 




	Mobiquity Networks’
	data is unique for the following reasons:




	 





	·

	     Massive Scale: 15 million
	plus unique devices;




	·


	     Unique
	(exclusive) data from our owned & operated network of beacons in class “A” malls, shopping outlets and cinemas.
	In the united states, indoor locations represent approximately 30% of major retail locations;





	·

	     Data Density: 100 plus data
	points collected per user/day;





	·

	     Spatial Precision: 85% accurate
	within less than 30 feet;





	·

	     Verified Visits: frequency
	and dwell time in store utilized to determine real consumer visits;





	·

	     Diverse Data:found in dozens
	of mobile apps that utilize precise location; and





	·

	     Privacy Compliant: all user
	privacy is one hundred percent compliant and transparent.




	 




	Mobiquity
	Networks determines a location visit by utilizing all the location sensors built into a mobile device: GPS, Bluetooth, Wi-Fi and
	motion sensors. To be considered a verified visit a device must have triggered an enter location event (GPS, Wi-Fi, Bluetooth),
	had a set amount of accuracy to the location event and dwelled at the location for a set amount of time. A typical definition
	of a verified visit would be a device that was seen at a location in the last 30 days, dwelled at the location for a minimum of
	10 minutes and had a high degree of accuracy.




	 




	 



	 








	 



	4



	 







	 




	 




	Strategy






	 





	Mobiquity
	Networks derives its revenue utilizing the revenue streams mentioned above. All of the products used to derive revenue for the
	Company are reliant on the collection of data. To achieve management’s revenue goals moving forward, we have developed a
	strategy to increase the two main driving forces behind our data collection. One strategy is to increase the total number of users
	we see on a monthly basis (“MAU”), and the second strategy is to increase the total number of locations (Places) available
	to see our MAU’s visit over the same time period. We are currently seeing approximately 13,000,000 unique mobile devices
	by the MAU on a monthly basis and roughly 20,000,000 unique devices for the first 100 days of 2017. The ability to see and collect
	the data required from these unique devices comes from the installation of our proprietary Software Development Kit (SDK) into
	third party mobile applications (Apps). To continue to grow the total number of unique devices we can see on a monthly basis,
	we need to have our SDK installed in more third party Apps. We believe our unique offering to potential App partners gives us
	a competitive advantage over others in the industry. The task of partnering with third party Apps for installation of our SDK
	is handled internally by our business development team.




	 




	As
	of March 31, 2017, we had approximately 200,000 Places in our proprietary Places database, and that number should increase to
	over 4,000,000 Places by the end of the second quarter 2017, thus exponentially increasing the amount of data we collect. We have
	been able to steadily increase the number of locations available in our Places database through the use of both open source and
	proprietary technologies. The task of growing our Places database is handled by our internal technology team. The Company currently
	utilizes both internal and outsourced resources to market and sell its product offerings. Management intends to hire additional
	sales personnel in the last three quarters of 2017 as working capital permits


	.




	 





	Agreements






	 





	Due
	to the evolution of the Mobiquity Network’s business model, our agreements with the Mall developers are no longer considered
	essential to our business ope

	rations as our Places data base has grown to approximately 4 million locations making malls
	a subset within our retail category. This is the major reason why we have allowed many of our mall developer contracts to be terminated
	by the other parties. We continue to have active agreements with Preit and Rousse malls on a revenue sharing basis covering an
	aggregate of 55 malls and an agreement with Simon Property malls covering about 195 malls, which agreement will expire no later
	than December 31, 2017. Since April 2016, this agreement is being financed through lines of credit totaling $2.7 million which
	lines of credit have been assigned to us by two stockholders in exchange for our common stock. See “Item 13.” This
	agreement is anticipated to be in default if the lines of credit are not reissued by us by the beginning of June 2017, unless
	a new agreement is entered into prior to that time. For a description of our prior mall agreements, reference is made to “Item
	1” of our Form 10-k for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2015.


	 



	We
	have entered into agreements with many third party app partners such as LiveRamp. LiveRamp is an Acxiom company, located in the
	technology hub of San Francisco, delivering privacy-safe solutions to market and honoring the best practices of leading associations,
	including the Digital Advertising Alliance’s (DAA) ICON and App Choices programs, the Interactive Advertising Bureau, the
	Data & Marketing Association, and the Advertising Research Foundation.

	Through our agreement with LiveRamp, we have
	the ability to make our Mobile Audiences Product available to nearly all buyers interested in such data.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	5



	 







	 




	 





	Our Proprietary Technology Platform




	 



	Mobiquity Networks has developed a highly
	accurate and scalable proprietary cloud based mobile

	location platform to allow millions of connected
	mobile devices to easily and securely log billions of events per day and receive timely user notifications in real-time.




	 




	The Mobiquity
	Networks’ platform analyzes a combination of raw GPS, Wi-Fi and iBeacon radio signals when collecting mobile data to identify
	user patterns in densely populated urban areas, and even inside stores or desired points of interest. This data is additionally
	analyzed and enriched with how often users visit specific locations, and how much time they spend at each location. The resulting
	combined contextual data ensures clients receive highly accurate insights into consumers’

	offline behavior and purchase
	intent.


	 


	 


Click to enlarge
	 


	 


	The Mobiquity Networks platform is
	hosted and managed on Amazon Web Service (AWS) and takes full advantage of open standards for processing, storage, security and
	big data technology. Specifically, the Mobiquity Networks platform uses the following AWS services: EC2, Lambda, Kafka, Kinesis,
	S3, Storm, Spark, Machine Learning, RDS, Redshift, Elastic Map Reduction, CloudWatch, and Elastic Search Service with built-in
	Kibana integration.


	 


	Mobiquity Networks’ unique approach
	to validating mobile device location visits produces extremely precise and accurate location data with its publisher application
	SDK.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	6



	 







	 




	 


	The Mobiquity Networks’ SDK
	for iOS and Android is a proprietary intelligent replacement for iOS CLLocationManager and the Android Location Manager technology.
	It provides all the existing location manager functionality plus adds the following benefits:


	 







	·



	advanced location technology capabilities (such as always-on location services, enhanced accuracy,
	lower battery drain, and others),




	 







	·



	automatic venue recognition,




	 







	·



	access to storefront and venue map database, and




	 







	·



	a detailed location analytics




	 


	Mobiquity Networks’ SDK enables
	partner publishers to add enhanced location capabilities, and therefore personalized experiences, to their mobile applications
	without the need for location expertise.


	 


	Mobiquity Networks has assembled a comprehensive
	location database to convert geographical coordinates to a physical address in the real world. Mobiquity Networks built its own
	database because existing location databases did not have good enough data to resolve accurate places for user visits. This database
	includes the street level venue storefronts and entrance for businesses in the U.S., addresses, building polygons, venue polygons,
	and other related points of interest information. Currently this database has over 4 million locations and continues to be populated
	thereby improving the platforms’ algorithm for user visit accuracy.


	 


	Utilizing massively parallel cluster computing
	and machine learning algorithms and technology, Mobiquity Networks processes user dwell-time and frequency of visit
	data within iBeacons, Wi-Fi and GPS signals to segment highly targetable audiences for mobile marketing.
	This data processing provides valuable, actionable geo-behavioral data for advertisers and application publishers and
	made available through an automated platform.


	 


	 
Click to enlarge




	 


	Figure 2 – Data Collection,
	Processing and Development


	 


	The Mobiquity Networks platform automatically
	synchronizes audience data to various Data Management Providers (DMP), Demand Side Providers (DSP), trading desks and other partners
	using its marketplace connection application programmer interfaces (API).


	 


	 


	 








	 



	7



	 







	 




	 


	Publishing partners are given access to
	a comprehensive dashboard to view mobile device traffic and audience segment information of their application user base. This information
	can be both viewed and access via API to incorporate into internal client systems.


	 


Click to enlarge
	 


	 



	Intellectual Property




	 



	In March 2013, we formed
	Mobiquity Networks and Mobiquity Wireless in Spain. Mobiquity Wireless then acquired the assets of our then licensor, FuturLink.
	These assets include, without limitation, the FuturLink technology which consists of patent applications, source codes and trademark(s).
	The patent applications acquired related to the hardware and associated process for identifying and acquiring connections to mobile
	devices and the process for delivering select content to users on an opt-in basis. Additionally, significant “know how”
	was acquired with respect to managing remote hardware across a large physical network. As the technology owner, we will leverage
	the hardware and software included in our purchase to expand our mall-based footprint in the United States. We believe our acquisition
	of FuturLink’s technology and corresponding patent applications provided us with the flexibility and autonomy to improve,
	upgrade and integrate new ideas and cutting edge technologies into our then existing platform. This has allowed us to evolve as
	new technologies emerge. To date, we have published for four patents and two have been approved. We believe that our intellectual
	property is a valuable asset to us as we move forward with our technology platform.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	8



	 







	 




	 



	Governmental Regulations




	 



	Federal, state and
	international laws and regulations govern the collection, use, retention, sharing and security of data that we collect. We strive
	to comply with all applicable laws, regulations, self-regulatory requirements and legal obligations relating to privacy, data protection
	and consumer protection, including those relating to the use of data for marketing purposes. As we develop and provide solutions
	that address new market segments, we may become subject to additional laws and regulations, which could create unexpected liabilities
	for us, cause us to incur additional costs or restrict our operations. From time to time, we may be notified of or otherwise become
	aware of additional laws and regulations that governmental organizations or others may claim should be applicable to our business.
	Our failure to anticipate the application of these laws and regulations accurately, or other failure to comply, could create liability
	for us, result in adverse publicity or cause us to alter our business practices, which could cause our net revenues to decrease,
	our costs to increase or our business otherwise to be harmed. See “Risk Factors.”


	 


	We are subject to general
	business regulations and laws as well as regulations and laws specifically governing the Internet, e-commerce and m-commerce in
	a number of jurisdictions around the world. Existing and future regulations and laws could impede the growth of the Internet, e-commerce,
	m-commerce or other online services. These regulations and laws may involve taxation, tariffs, privacy and data security, anti-spam,
	data protection, content, copyrights, distribution, electronic contracts, electronic communications and consumer protection. It
	is not clear how existing laws and regulations governing issues such as property ownership, sales and other taxes, libel and personal
	privacy apply to the Internet as the vast majority of these laws and regulations were adopted prior to the advent of the Internet
	and do not contemplate or address the unique issues raised by the Internet, e-commerce or m-commerce. It is possible that general
	business regulations and laws, or those specifically governing the Internet, e-commerce or m-commerce may be interpreted and applied
	in a manner that is inconsistent from one jurisdiction to another and may conflict with other rules or our practices. See “Risk
	Factors. “


	 



	Integrated Marketing
	Company




	 



	Our subsidiary, Ace
	Marketing & Promotions, Inc. (or Ace Marketing), has historically represented substantially all of our operating revenues.
	Ace Marketing is an integrated marketing company focused on working with clients to grow their business. Ace Marketing’s
	core business is to provide a wide range of quality promotional products to a wide range of corporate, non-profit and educational
	clients. In addition, Ace Marketing offers brand analysis and development, website analysis and development, database analysis
	and building, and integrated marketing campaigns using: direct mail, email marketing, mobile marketing, promotional products and
	other mediums that help our clients connect with their customers and acquire new business.


	 


	Although the majority
	of Ace Marketing’s revenue is derived from the sale of promotional products, it is through the use of our four-step process
	supported by marketing technology platforms that allows us to attract and retain clients. The sale of promotional products alone
	can be considered a commodity business, so by offering our value-added services, we believe we have created a competitive advantage.
	We believe a client will be less likely to leave if we created their logo, built their website and/or appended their customer database.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	9



	 







	 




	 


	Ace Marketing derives
	revenues from each of the following resources:


	 




	 



	☐




	Brand analysis and development.





	 


	 


	 




	 



	☐




	Website analysis and development.





	 


	 


	 




	 



	☐




	Database analysis and building.





	 


	 


	 




	 



	☐




	Integrated marketing solutions.





	 


	Substantially all of
	our resources and marketing efforts are dedicated toward deriving revenues from the operations of Mobiquity Networks.


	  



	Competition




	 



	We compete in the
	location-based mobile data, marketing and research business and in all other facets of our business against small, medium and
	large companies throughout the United States. Some examples include companies such as Placed, PlaceIQ, Factual, xAd and Foursquare.
	Although we can give no assurance that our business will be able to compete against other companies with greater experience and
	resources, we believe we have a competitive advantage with our proprietary Places Database, software and technology platform.
	As previously mentioned, we have the exclusive rights to provide Bluetooth marketing services in the common area for various shopping
	malls. This gives us the ability to compete with these other companies to provide indoor data based upon the exclusive rights
	in such malls.


	 


	With respect to our
	integrated marketing subsidiary, while our competition in this business vertical is extensive, we believe that this industry is
	extremely fragmented and that there are no companies that dominate the market in which we operate. We compete within the industry
	on the basis of service, competitive prices, personal relationships and competitive commissions to our sales representatives to
	sell promotional products for us rather than our competitors. Competitors’ advantages over us may include better financing,
	greater experience, lower margins and better personal relationships than us.


	  



	Employees




	 



	We have approximately
	16 full time employees, including executive management, technical personnel, salespeople, and support staff employees. We also
	utilize several additional firms/persons who provide services to us on a non-exclusive basis as independent consultants.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	10



	 








	 




	 


	 


	 







	Item 1A. Risk Factors




	 




	Investing in our
	common stock involves a high degree of risk. Before deciding to invest in our company or deciding to maintain or increase your
	investment, you should consider carefully the risks and uncertainties described below, together with all information in this Form
	10-K, including our consolidated financial statements and related notes. If one or more of the following risks are realized, our
	business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects could be materially and adversely affected. In that event, the
	market price for our common stock could decline and you may lose your investment.




	 








	Risks Relating To Our Business




	 




	We are dependent
	upon the immediate receipt of substantial additional financing to carry out our plan of operations and to meet our anticipated
	financial commitments over the next one year. Our auditors have expressed a substantial doubt of our ability to continue as a going
	concern.

	We are dependent upon the immediate receipt of substantial additional financing to carry out our plan of operations
	and to meet our anticipated financial commitments over the next one year, including, without limitation, maintaining the current
	technology and supporting staff, making minimum payments to our mall managers as required and making timely payments to our debt
	holders. The accompanying consolidated financial statements have been prepared assuming our company will continue as a going concern.
	Our continued existence is dependent upon our ability to obtain additional debt and/or equity financing to advance our mall network
	system and to develop a revenue stream resulting therefrom. We have incurred net losses for the years ending December 31, 2016,
	2015 and 2014 of $10,701,503, $10,459,724 and $10,506,099, respectively. As of December 31, 2016, we had an accumulated deficit
	of $51,182,093. For the year ended December 31, 2016, we have had negative cash flows from operating activities of $5,929,852.
	These factors raise substantial doubt concerning our ability to continue as a going concern. We can provide no assurances that
	we will be successful in raising additional equity and/or debt financing on terms satisfactory to us, if at all, to remain a going
	concern.


	 



	We have a history
	of operating losses and may not in the future generate consistent revenues or profits.

	Since our inception, we have experienced
	a continued history of operating losses and an accumulated deficit of $51,182,093 at December 31, 2016. We have incurred net losses
	for the years ending December 31, 2016, 2015 and 2014 of $10,710,503, $10,459,724 and $10,506,099, respectively. Our operating
	losses for the past several years are primarily attributable to the transformation of our company into an advertising technology
	corporation. Our Mobiquity Network subsidiary has $65,932 in revenues from its operations for the year ended December 31, 2016.
	We can provide no assurances that our operations will generate consistent or predictable revenue or be profitable in the future.
	This is particularly the case as we are shifting our business emphasis to focus on our Mobiquity Network business.


	 



	We entered into
	convertible promissory notes in the aggregate amount of $1,600,000 which are secured by all of our assets. These notes have a current
	maturity dates beginning on August of 2017, but the noteholder has the right to call the note at any time, which could adversely
	affect our liquidity and capital resources.

	On March 31, 2017, we issued secured promissory notes in the aggregate amount
	of $1,100,000 to two non-affiliated investors and an additional $500,000 is expected to be issued in late April 2017. The maturity
	date of the notes is August through October 2017. The payment of these notes at maturity could come at a time when it would not
	be advantageous to us and could materially adversely affect our liquidity and capital resources. We can provide no assurances that
	we will be able to meet our obligations under these notes as they become due and payable.


	 




	We
	are focusing the majority of our attention on our Mobiquity Networks data collection and analysis business.

	We operate through
	our wholly-owned subsidiaries, Ace Marketing & Promotions, Inc. and Mobiquity Networks, Inc. Ace Marketing is our legacy marketing
	and promotions business which provides integrated marketing services to our commercial customers. While Ace Marketing currently
	represents substantially all of our revenue, we anticipate that activity from Ace Marketing will represent a diminishing portion
	of corporate revenue as our attention is now principally focused on developing and executing on opportunities in our Mobiquity
	Networks business.

	We believe that our Mobiquity Networks business represents our growth opportunity going forward. We expect
	that Mobiquity Networks will generate the majority of our revenue by the end of 2017, although no assurances can be given in this
	regard. Further, we can provide no assurances that the implementation of our Mobiquity Networks’ business will meet our expectations
	in terms of generating a certain amount of revenue by a certain year.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	11



	 







	 




	 


	 


	 



	We did not receive
	any significant revenues from our new Mobiquity business in 2016 and we cannot accurately predict the volume or timing of any future
	revenues.

	We may be unable to capture revenue from our new Mobiquity business and product offerings in the manner in which
	we anticipate. As such, we cannot accurately predict the volume or timing of any future revenues.


	 



	Our Mobiquity Network business is dependent
	upon our successful integration of our SDK into various third party applications (or apps) publishers to collect and analyze data
	and create product offerings from the data collected.

	For us to create and expand our business model, we are dependent upon
	entering into agreements with mobile application third party publishers. The greater the number of publisher apps into which our
	SDK is embedded, the greater number of original data we can collect and analyze. We currently have entered into agreements with
	a limited number of third party app publishers. There is a risk that we will be unable to expand our third party publisher network
	on terms satisfactory to us, or at all, and if we are unable to do so, our results of operations and overall business prospects
	would suffer.


	  



	The location-based
	mobile marketing industry is relatively new and our competition may become extensive.

	Currently, we have not generated significant
	revenue from this new and unproven segment of our business. While we intend to market our Mobiquity products and services, there
	is a risk that our location-based mobile data collection and analysis will be unable to compete with large, medium and small competitors
	that are in (or may enter) the industry with substantially larger resources and management experience.


	  



	We expect to derive
	substantially all of our future revenues from our principal technology, which leaves us subject to the risk of reliance on such
	technology. Further, our principal technology is subject to pending patent applications which could be rejected by the United States
	Patent and Trademark Office.

	We expect to derive substantially all of our future revenues from Mobiquity Networks. As such,
	any factor adversely affecting our ability to offer and implement our solution to new customers, including regulatory issues, market
	acceptance, competition, performance and reliability, reputation, price competition and economic and market conditions, would likely
	harm our operating results.


	 



	If our Mobiquity
	technology fails to satisfy current or future customer requirements, we may be required to make significant expenditures to redesign
	the technology, and we may have insufficient resources to do so.

	Our Mobiquity Networks solution is designed to address an
	evolving marketplace and must comply with current and evolving customer requirements in order to gain market acceptance. There
	is a risk that we will not meet anticipated customer requirements or desires. If we are required to redesign our technologies to
	address customer demands or otherwise modify our business model, we may incur significant unanticipated expenses and losses, and
	we may be left with insufficient resources to engage in such activities. If we are unable to redesign our technology, develop new
	technology or modify our business model to meet customer desires or any other customer requirements that may emerge, our operating
	results would be materially and adversely affected.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	12



	 







	 




	 


	 


	 



	If we fail to respond
	quickly to technological developments, our service may become uncompetitive and obsolete.

	The data collection and analysis
	market in which we plan to compete is expected to experience rapid technology developments, changes in industry standards, changes
	in customer requirements and frequent new improvements. If we are unable to respond quickly to these developments, we may lose
	competitive position, and our technologies may become uncompetitive or obsolete, causing revenues and operating results to suffer.
	In order to compete, we may be required to develop or acquire new technology and improve our existing technology and processes
	on a schedule that keeps pace with technological developments. We must also be able to support a range of changing customer preferences.
	We cannot guarantee that we will be successful in any manner in these efforts.


	 



	We cannot predict
	our future capital needs and we may not be able to secure additional financing.

	Between January 2013 and December 2016, we
	raised over $21 million in private equity and debt financing to support our transformation from an integrated marketing company
	to a technology company. Since we might be unable to generate recurring or predictable revenue or cash flow to fund our operations,
	we will likely need to seek additional (perhaps substantial) equity or debt financing even following this offering to provide the
	capital required to maintain or expand our operations. We may also need additional funding for developing products and services,
	increasing our sales and marketing capabilities and acquiring complementary companies, technologies and assets, as well as for
	working capital requirements and other operating and general corporate purposes. We cannot predict our future capital needs with
	precision, and we may not be able to secure additional financing on terms satisfactory to us, if at all, which could lead to termination
	of our business.


	 


	When we elect to raise
	additional funds or additional funds are required, we may raise such funds from time to time through public or private equity offerings,
	debt financings or other financing alternatives. Additional equity or debt financing may not be available on acceptable terms,
	if at all. If we are unable to raise additional capital in sufficient amounts or on terms acceptable to us, we will be prevented
	from pursuing operational development and commercialization efforts and our ability to generate revenues and achieve or sustain
	profitability will be substantially harmed.


	 


	If we raise additional
	funds by issuing equity securities, our stockholders will experience dilution. Debt financing, if available, would result in increased
	fixed payment obligations and may involve agreements that include covenants limiting or restricting our ability to take specific
	actions, such as incurring additional debt, making capital expenditures or declaring dividends. Any debt financing or additional
	equity that we raise may contain terms, such as liquidation and other preferences, which are not favorable to us or our stockholders.
	If we raise additional funds through collaboration and licensing arrangements with third parties, it may be necessary to relinquish
	valuable rights to our technologies, future revenue streams or product candidates or to grant licenses on terms that may not be
	favorable to us. Should the financing we require to sustain our working capital needs be unavailable or prohibitively expensive
	when we require it, our business, operating results, financial condition and prospects could be materially and adversely affected
	and we may be unable to continue our operations. Failure to secure additional financing on favorable terms could have severe adverse
	consequences to us.


	  



	Our future performance
	is materially dependent upon our management and their ability to manage our growth.

	Our future performance is substantially
	dependent upon the efforts and abilities of members of our existing management. This is particularly the case as we seek to ramp
	up our newer location-based mobile business in 2017 and beyond. The loss of the services of our management personnel could have
	a material adverse effect on our business. We currently lack “key man” life insurance policies on any of our officers
	or employees. Competition for additional qualified management is intense, and we may be unable to attract and retain additional
	key personnel. The number of management personnel is currently limited and they may be unable to manage our expansion successfully
	and the failure to do so could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations and financial condition.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	13



	 







	 




	 



	If our management
	team does not remain with us in the future, our business, operating results and financial condition could be adversely affected.

	Our future success depends in large part on our current senior management team and our ability to attract and retain additional
	high-quality management and operating personnel. Our senior management team’s in-depth knowledge of and deep relationships
	with the participants in our industry are extremely valuable to us. Our business also requires skilled technical and marketing
	personnel, who are in high demand and are often subject to competing offers. Competition for qualified employees is intense in
	our industry, and the loss of even a few qualified employees, or an inability to attract, retain and motivate additional highly
	skilled employees required for the planned expansion of our business, could harm our operating results and impair our ability to
	grow. To attract and retain key personnel, we use various measures, including an equity incentive program and incentive bonuses
	for executive officers and other employees. These measures may not be enough to attract and retain the personnel we require to
	operate our business effectively. We also have a number of employees who were granted stock options over the past few years that
	have an exercise price per share that is lower than the current fair market value. If we are successful as a public company, of
	which there can be no assurances, these employees may choose to exercise their options and sell the shares, recognizing a substantial
	gain. As a result, it may be difficult for us to retain such employees.


	 



	If we are unable
	to attract additional management and sales representatives, or if a significant number of our manager or sales representatives
	leave us, our ability to increase our net revenues could be negatively impacted.

	Our ability to expand our business will depend,
	in part, on our ability to attract additional management and sales representatives. Competition for qualified managers and sales
	representatives can be intense, and we may be unable to hire additional team members when we need them or at all. Any difficulties
	we experience in attracting additional managers or sales representatives could have a negative impact on our ability to expand
	our retailer base, increase net revenues and continue our growth. In addition, we must retain our current management and sales
	representatives and properly incentivize them to obtain new relationships. If a significant number of our managers and sales representatives
	were to leave us, our net revenues could be negatively impacted. In certain circumstances, we have entered into agreements with
	our managers and sales representatives that contain non-compete provisions to mitigate this risk, but we may need to litigate to
	enforce our rights under these agreements, which could be time-consuming, expensive and ineffective. A significant increase in
	the turnover rate among our current managers or sales representatives could also increase our recruiting costs and decrease our
	operating efficiency, which could lead to a decline in our net revenues and profitability.


	 



	Our Mobiquity solution
	contains and is dependent upon open source software, which may pose particular risks to our proprietary software and solutions.

	We use open source software in our solutions and will use open source software in the future. Some licenses governing our use
	of open source software contain requirements that we make available source code for modifications or derivative works we create
	based upon the open source software, and that we license such modifications or derivative works under the terms of a particular
	open source license or other license granting third parties certain rights of further use. By the terms of certain open source
	licenses, we could be required to release the source code of our proprietary software, and to make our proprietary software available
	under open source licenses, if we combine our proprietary software with open source software in certain manners. Although we monitor
	our use of open source software, we cannot assure you that all open source software is reviewed prior to use in our solutions,
	that our programmers have not incorporated open source software into our solutions, or that they will not do so in the future.
	Additionally, the terms of many open source licenses to which we are subject have not been interpreted by U.S. or foreign courts.
	There is a risk that open source software licenses could be construed in a manner that imposes unanticipated conditions or restrictions
	on our ability to market or provide our solutions. In addition, the terms of open source software licenses may require us to provide
	software that we develop using such open source software to others on unfavorable license terms. As a result of our current or
	future use of open source software, we may face claims or litigation, be required to release our proprietary source code, pay damages
	for breach of contract, re-engineer our solutions, discontinue making our solutions available in the event re-engineering cannot
	be accomplished on a timely basis or take other remedial action. Any such re-engineering or other remedial efforts could require
	significant additional research and development resources, and we may not be able to successfully complete any such re-engineering
	or other remedial efforts. Further, in addition to risks related to license requirements, use of certain open source software can
	lead to greater risks than use of third-party commercial software, as open source licensors generally do not provide warranties
	or controls on the origin of software. Any of these risks could be difficult to eliminate or manage, and, if not addressed, could
	have a negative effect on our business, financial condition and operating results.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	14



	 







	 




	 


	 


	 



	We
	rely on information technology to operate our business and maintain competitiveness, and any failure to adapt to technological
	developments or industry trends could harm our business.

	We depend on the use of information technologies and systems. As our
	operations grow in size and scope, we will be required to continuously improve and upgrade our systems and infrastructure while
	maintaining or improving the reliability and integrity of our infrastructure. Our future success also depends on our ability to
	adapt our systems and infrastructure to meet rapidly evolving consumer trends and demands while continuing to improve the performance,
	features and reliability of our solutions in response to competitive services and product offerings. The emergence of alternative
	platforms will require new investment in technology. New developments in other areas, such as cloud computing, could also make
	it easier for competition to enter our markets due to lower up-front technology costs. In addition, we may not be able to maintain
	our existing systems or replace or introduce new technologies and systems as quickly as we would like or in a cost-effective manner.


	 



	If we fail to respond
	quickly to technological developments, our technology may become uncompetitive and obsolete.

	The mobile data market is expected
	to experience rapid technology developments, changes in industry standards, changes in customer requirements and frequent new product
	introductions and improvements. If we are unable to respond quickly to these developments, we may lose competitive position, and
	our solutions or technologies may become uncompetitive or obsolete, causing revenues and operating results to suffer. In order
	to compete, we may be required to develop or acquire new technologies and improve our existing technologies and processes on a
	schedule that keeps pace with technological developments and the requirements for our industry. We must also be able to support
	a range of changing customer preferences. We cannot guarantee that we will be successful in any manner in these efforts, and our
	inability to do so could cause our business to suffer.


	 



	Our technology and
	associated business processes may contain undetected errors, which could limit our ability to provide our services and diminish
	the attractiveness of our offerings.

	Our Mobiquity technology may contain undetected errors, defects or bugs. As a result,
	our customers or end users may discover errors or defects in our technology or the systems incorporating our technology may not
	operate as expected. We may discover significant errors or defects in the future that we may not be able to fix. Our inability
	to fix any of those errors could limit our ability to provide our solution, impair the reputation of our brand and diminish the
	attractiveness of our product offerings to our customers.  In addition, we may utilize third party technology or components
	in our products and we rely on those third parties to provide support services to us. Failure of those third parties to provide
	necessary support services could materially adversely impact our business.


	  



	Because we do not
	manufacture the promotional products we distribute, we are dependent upon third parties for the manufacture and supply of our promotional
	products.

	Our Ace Marketing subsidiary obtains all of our promotional products from third-party suppliers, both domestically
	and overseas primarily in China. We submit purchase orders to our suppliers who are not committed to supply products to us. Therefore,
	suppliers may be unable to provide the products we need in the quantities we request.  Because we lack control of the
	actual production of the promotional products we sell, we may be subject to delays caused by interruption in production based on
	conditions outside of our control. In the event that any of our third-party suppliers were to become unable or unwilling to continue
	to provide the products in required volumes, we would need to identify and obtain acceptable replacement sources on a timely cost
	effective basis. There is no guarantee that we will be able to obtain such alternative sources of supply on a timely basis, if
	at all. An extended interruption in the supply of our products would have an adverse effect on our results of operations, which
	most likely would adversely affect the value of our common stock.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	15



	 







	 




	 


	 


	 



	Changes in consumer
	sentiment or laws, rules or regulations regarding tracking technologies and other privacy matters could have a material adverse
	effect on our ability to generate net revenues and could adversely affect our ability to collect data on consumer shopping behavior.

	The collection and use of electronic information about user is an important element of our Mobiquity technology and solutions.
	However, consumers may become increasingly resistant to the collection, use and sharing of information, including information used
	to deliver advertising and to attribute credit to publishers in performance marketing programs, and take steps to prevent such
	collection, use and sharing of information. For example, consumer complaints and/or lawsuits regarding advertising or other tracking
	technologies in general and our practices specifically could adversely impact our business. In addition to this change in consumer
	preferences, if retailers or brands perceive significant negative consumer reaction to targeted advertising or the tracking of
	consumers’ activities, they may determine that such advertising or tracking has the potential to negatively impact their
	brand. In that case, advertisers may limit or stop the use of our solutions, and our operating results and financial condition
	would be adversely affected.


	  



	Our business practices
	with respect to data and consumer protection could give rise to liabilities or reputational harm as a result of governmental regulation,
	legal requirements or industry standards relating to consumer privacy, data protection and consumer protection.

	Federal, state
	and international laws and regulations govern the collection, use, retention, sharing and security of data that we collect. We
	strive to comply with all applicable laws, regulations, self-regulatory requirements and legal obligations relating to privacy,
	data protection and consumer protection, including those relating to the use of data for marketing purposes. It is possible, however,
	that these requirements may be interpreted and applied in a manner that is inconsistent from one jurisdiction to another and may
	conflict with other rules or our practices. We cannot assure you that our practices have complied, comply, or will comply fully
	with all such laws, regulations, requirements and obligations. Any failure, or perceived failure, by us to comply with federal,
	state or international laws or regulations, including laws and regulations regulating privacy, data security, marketing communications
	or consumer protection, or other policies, self-regulatory requirements or legal obligations could result in harm to our reputation,
	a loss in business, and proceedings or actions against us by governmental entities, consumers, retailers or others. We may also
	be contractually liable to indemnify and hold harmless performance marketing networks or other third parties from the costs or
	consequences of noncompliance with any laws, regulations, self-regulatory requirements or other legal obligations relating to privacy,
	data protection and consumer protection or any inadvertent or unauthorized use or disclosure of data that we store or handle as
	part of operating our business. Any such proceeding or action, and any related indemnification obligation, could hurt our reputation,
	force us to incur significant expenses in defense of these proceedings, distract our management, increase our costs of doing business
	and cause consumers and retailers to decrease their use of our marketplace, and may result in the imposition of monetary liability.


	  



	As we develop and
	provide solutions, we may be subject to additional and unexpected regulations, which could increase our costs or otherwise harm
	our business.

	As we develop and provide solutions that address new market segments, we may become subject to additional laws
	and regulations, which could create unexpected liabilities for us, cause us to incur additional costs or restrict our operations.
	From time to time, we may be notified of or otherwise become aware of additional laws and regulations that governmental organizations
	or others may claim should be applicable to our business. Our failure to anticipate the application of these laws and regulations
	accurately, or other failure to comply, could create liability for us, result in adverse publicity or cause us to alter our business
	practices, which could cause our net revenues to decrease, our costs to increase or our business otherwise to be harmed.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	16



	 







	 




	 


	 


	 



	We rely on information
	technology to operate our business and maintain competitiveness, and any failure to adapt to technological developments or industry
	trends could harm our business.

	We depend on the use of information technologies and systems. As our operations grow in size
	and scope, we must continuously improve and upgrade our systems and infrastructure while maintaining or improving the reliability
	and integrity of our infrastructure. Our future success also depends on our ability to adapt our systems and infrastructure to
	meet rapidly evolving consumer trends and demands while continuing to improve the performance, features and reliability of our
	solutions in response to competitive services and product offerings. In addition, we may not be able to maintain our existing systems
	or replace or introduce new technologies and systems as quickly as we would like or in a cost-effective manner.


	 



	Government
	regulation of the Internet, e-commerce and m-commerce is evolving, and unfavorable changes or failure by us to comply with these
	laws and regulations could substantially harm our business and results of operations.

	We are subject to general business regulations
	and laws as well as regulations and laws specifically governing the Internet, e-commerce and m-commerce in a number of jurisdictions
	around the world. Existing and future regulations and laws could impede the growth of the Internet, e-commerce, m-commerce or other
	online services. These regulations and laws may involve taxation, tariffs, privacy and data security, anti-spam, data protection,
	content, copyrights, distribution, electronic contracts, electronic communications and consumer protection. It is not clear how
	existing laws and regulations governing issues such as property ownership, sales and other taxes, libel and personal privacy apply
	to the Internet as the vast majority of these laws and regulations were adopted prior to the advent of the Internet and do not
	contemplate or address the unique issues raised by the Internet, e-commerce or m-commerce. It is possible that general business
	regulations and laws, or those specifically governing the Internet, e-commerce or m-commerce may be interpreted and applied in
	a manner that is inconsistent from one jurisdiction to another and may conflict with other rules or our practices. We cannot assure
	you that our practices have complied, comply or will comply fully with all such laws and regulations. Any failure, or perceived
	failure, by us to comply with any of these laws or regulations could result in damage to our reputation, a loss in business, and
	proceedings or actions against us by governmental entities or others. Any such proceeding or action could hurt our reputation,
	force us to spend significant resources in defense of these proceedings, distract our management, increase our costs of doing business,
	and cause consumers and retailers to decrease their use of our marketplace, and may result in the imposition of monetary liability.
	We may also be contractually liable to indemnify and hold harmless third parties from the costs or consequences of noncompliance
	with any such laws or regulations. In addition, it is possible that governments of one or more countries may seek to censor content
	available on our websites and mobile applications or may even attempt to completely block access to our marketplace. Adverse legal
	or regulatory developments could substantially harm our business. In particular, in the event that we are restricted, in whole
	or in part, from operating in one or more countries, our ability to retain or increase our customer base may be adversely affected
	and we may not be able to maintain or grow our net revenues as anticipated.


	  



	There may be limitations
	on the effectiveness of our internal controls, and a failure of our control systems to prevent error or fraud may materially harm
	our company.

	Proper systems of internal controls over financial accounting and disclosure are critical to the operation of
	a public company. We have a limited accounting and finance staff, and such staff has relatively limited experience in operating
	the accounting function of a growing public company. As such, we may be unable to effectively establish, implement and update our
	internal control systems. This would leave us without the ability to reliably assimilate and compile financial information about
	our company and significantly impair our ability to prevent error and detect fraud, all of which would have a negative impact on
	our company from many perspectives.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	17



	 







	 




	 


	 


	 


	Moreover, we do not
	expect that disclosure controls or internal control over financial reporting, even if properly in place, will prevent all error
	and all fraud. A control system, no matter how well designed and operated, can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance
	that the control system’s objectives will be met. Further, the design of a control system must reflect the fact that there
	are resource constraints and the benefits of controls must be considered relative to their costs. Because of the inherent limitations
	in all control systems, no evaluation of controls can provide absolute assurance that all control issues and instances of fraud,
	if any, have been detected. Failure of our control systems to prevent error or fraud could materially and adversely affect our
	business, reputation, stock price and results of operations.


	 



	Our subsidiary which
	operates our legacy business sells its branded merchandise to a diverse group of customers, which includes a principal customer.

	For the year ended December 31, 2016, one customer accounted for approximately 35% of net revenues for our branded merchandise
	as compared to a customer accounting for approximately 38% of net revenues for the comparable period of the prior year. A loss
	of a principal customer in our legacy business could substantially affect our results of operations.


	 



	Risks Relating To An Investment In Our
	Securities




	 




	Our future sales
	of common stock by management and other stockholders may have an adverse effect on the then prevailing market price of our common
	stock.

	In the event a public market for our common stock is sustained in the future, sales of our common stock may be made
	by holders of our public float or by holders of restricted securities in compliance with the provisions of Rule 144 of the Securities
	Act of 1933. In general, under Rule 144, a non-affiliated person who has satisfied a six-month holding period in a fully reporting
	company under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, may, sell their restricted common stock without volume limitation,
	so long as the issuer is current with all reports under the Exchange Act in order for there to be adequate common public information.
	Affiliated persons may also sell their common shares held for at least six months, but affiliated persons will be required to meet
	certain other requirements, including manner of sale, notice requirements and volume limitations. Non-affiliated persons who hold
	their common shares for at least one year will be able to sell their common stock without the need for there to be current public
	information in the hands of the public. Future sales of shares of our public float or by restricted common stock made in compliance
	with Rule 144 may have an adverse effect on the then prevailing market price, if any, of our common stock.


	 



	A significant portion
	of our total outstanding shares are eligible to be sold into the market in the near future, which could cause the market price
	of our common shares to drop significantly, even if our business is doing well.

	A significant portion of our total outstanding
	shares are eligible to be sold into the market in the near future, which could cause the market price of our common shares to drop
	significantly, even if our business is doing well. Sales of a substantial number of our common shares in the public market, or
	the perception in the market that the holders of a large number of shareholders intend to sell shares could reduce the market price
	of our common shares.


	 



	We do not intend
	to pay dividends.

	We do not anticipate paying cash dividends on our common stock in the foreseeable future. We may not have
	sufficient funds to legally pay dividends. Even if funds are legally available to pay dividends, we may nevertheless decide in
	our sole discretion not to pay dividends. The declaration, payment and amount of any future dividends will be made at the discretion
	of our board of directors, and will depend upon, among other things, the results of our operations, cash flows and financial condition,
	operating and capital requirements, and other factors our board of directors may consider relevant. There is no assurance that
	we will pay any dividends in the future, and, if dividends are paid, there is no assurance with respect to the amount of any such
	dividend.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	18



	 







	 




	 



	We lack an established
	trading market for our common stock, and you may be unable to sell your common stock at attractive prices or at all.

	There
	is currently a limited trading market for our common stock on the OTCQB under the symbol “MOBQ.” There can be no assurances
	given that an established public market will be obtained for our common stock or that any public market will last. As a result,
	we cannot assure you that you will be able to sell your common stock at attractive prices or at all.


	 



	The market
	price for our securities may be highly volatile.

	The market price for our securities may be highly volatile. A variety of factors
	may have a significant impact on the market price of our common stock, including:


	 




	 



	·




	the publication of earnings estimates or other research reports and speculation in the press or investment community;





	 


	 


	 




	 




	·





	changes in our industry and competitors;





	 


	 


	 




	 




	·





	our financial condition, results of operations and prospects;





	 


	 


	 




	 




	·





	any future issuances of our common stock, which may include primary offerings for cash, and the grant or exercise of stock options from time to time;





	 


	 


	 




	 




	·





	general market and economic conditions; and





	 


	 


	 




	 




	·





	any outbreak or escalation of hostilities, which could cause a recession or downturn in the U.S. economy.





	 


	 


	 




	 


	In addition,
	the markets in general can experience extreme price and volume fluctuations that can be unrelated or disproportionate to the operating
	performance of the companies listed or quoted. Broad market and industry factors may negatively affect the market price of our
	common stock, regardless of actual operating performance. In the past, following periods of volatility in the market price of a
	company’s securities, securities class action litigation has often been instituted against companies. This type of litigation,
	if instituted, could result in substantial costs and a diversion of management’s attention and resources, which would harm
	our business.


	  



	Our principal stockholders,
	directors and executive officers have a material level of control over us, which could delay or prevent a change in our corporate
	control favored by our other stockholders.

	As of the date of this Form 10-K, our principal stockholders, directors and executive
	officers beneficially own, in the aggregate, approximately 31% of our outstanding common stock. These figures include potential future
	exercises of outstanding options or warrants into shares of common stock. The interests of our current directors and executive
	officers may differ from the interests of other stockholders. As a result, these current directors and officers could have the
	ability to exercise material influence over all corporate actions requiring stockholder approval, irrespective of how our other
	stockholders may vote, including the following actions:


	 




	 



	·




	approval of certain mergers and other significant corporate transactions, including a sale of substantially all of our assets and material financing transactions;





	 


	 


	 




	 




	·





	election of directors;





	 




	 



	·




	adoption of or amendments to stock option plans;





	 




	 



	·




	amendment of charter documents; or





	 




	 



	·




	issuance of “blank check” preferred stock.





	 


	 


	 








	 



	19



	 







	 




	 



	Our certificate
	of incorporation grants our board of directors the authority to issue a new series of preferred stock without further approval
	by our shareholders, which could adversely affect the rights of the holders of our common shares.

	Our board of directors has
	the power to fix and determine the relative rights and preferences of preferred stock. Our board of directors also has the power
	to issue preferred stock without further shareholder approval, subject to applicable listing regulations. As a result, our board
	of directors could authorize the issuance of new series of preferred stock that would grant to holders thereof certain preferred
	rights to (i) our assets upon liquidation: (ii) receive dividend payments ahead of holders of common shares; (iii) and the redemption
	of the shares, together with a premium, prior to the redemption of our common shares. In addition, our board of directors could
	authorize the issuance of new series of preferred stock that is convertible into our common shares, which could decrease the relative
	voting power of our common shares or result in dilution to our existing shareholders.




	   





	Research analysts
	do not currently publish research about our business, limiting information available to shareholders, and if this continues to
	be the case or if analysts do publish unfavorable commentary or downgrade our common shares it could adversely affect our stock
	price and trading volume.

	The trading market for our common shares will depend, in part, on the research and reports that research
	analysts publish about us and our business and industry. The price of our common shares could decline if one or more research analysts
	downgrade our stock or if those analysts issue other unfavorable commentary or cease publishing reports about us or our business.
	If one or more of the research analysts ceases coverage of our company or fails to publish reports on us regularly, demand for
	our common shares could decrease, which could cause our stock price or trading volume to decline.


	 



	As a public company,
	we are subject to complex legal and accounting requirements that will require us to incur significant expenses and will expose
	us to risk of non-compliance.

	As a public company, we are subject to numerous legal and accounting requirements that do not
	apply to private companies. The cost of compliance with many of these requirements is material, not only in absolute terms but,
	more importantly, in relation to the overall scope of the operations of a small company. Our management team is relatively inexperienced
	in complying with these requirements, which may lead to errors in our accounting and financial statements and which may impair
	our operations. This inexperience may also increase the cost of compliance and may also increase the risk that we will fail to
	comply. Failure to comply with these requirements can have numerous adverse consequences including, but not limited to, our inability
	to file required periodic reports on a timely basis, loss of market confidence and/or governmental or private actions against us.
	We cannot assure you that we will be able to comply with all of these requirements or that the cost of such compliance will not
	prove to be a substantial competitive disadvantage vis-à-vis our privately held and larger public competitors.


	 



	We may be subject
	to shareholder litigation, thereby diverting our resources that may have a material effect on our profitability and results of
	operations.

	The market for our common shares may be characterized by significant price volatility when compared to seasoned
	issuers, and we expect that our share price may continue to be more volatile than a seasoned issuer for the indefinite future.
	 In the past, plaintiffs have often initiated securities class action litigation against a company following periods of volatility
	in the market price of its securities.  We may become the target of similar litigation. Securities litigation will result
	in substantial costs and liabilities and will divert management’s attention and resources.


	   



	Compliance with
	changing regulation of corporate governance and public disclosure will result in additional expenses and pose challenges for our
	management.

	Changing laws, regulations and standards relating to corporate governance and public disclosure, including the
	Sarbanes-Oxley Act and SEC regulations, have created uncertainty for public companies and significantly increased the costs and
	risks associated with accessing the U.S. public markets. Our management team will need to devote significant time and financial
	resources to comply with both existing and evolving standards for public companies, which will lead to increased general and administrative
	expenses and a diversion of management time and attention from revenue generating activities to compliance activities.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	20



	 







	 




	 



	Our common stock
	may be considered “penny stock” and may be difficult to trade

	. The SEC has adopted regulations that generally define
	“penny stock” to be an equity security that has a market or exercise price of less than $5.00 per share, subject to
	specific exemptions.  The market price of our common stock may be less than $5.00 per share and, therefore, may be designated
	as a “penny stock” according to SEC rules, unless our common shares are trading on a national exchange. This designation
	requires any broker or dealer selling these securities to disclose certain information concerning the transaction, obtain a written
	agreement from the purchaser and determine that the purchaser is reasonably suitable to purchase the securities. These rules
	may restrict the ability of brokers or dealers to sell our common stock and may affect the ability of investors to sell their common
	shares.



	 







	Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments



	 


	None.



	 







	Item 2. Properties



	  


	In February 2012, we
	entered into a 63-month lease agreement for new executive office space of approximately 4,200 square feet located at 600 Old Country
	Road, Suite 541, Garden City, NY 11530. The annual rent under this office facility for the first year is estimated at $127,000,
	including electricity, subject to an annual increase of 3%. In the event of a default in which the company is evicted from the
	office space, Mobiquity would be responsible to the landlord for an additional payment of rent of $160,000 in the first year of
	the lease, an additional payment of $106,667 in the second year of the lease and an additional payment of rent of $53,333 in the
	third year of the lease. Such additional rent would be payable at the discretion of the company in cash or in shares of common
	stock of our company.


	 


	Our lease for approximately
	2,000 square feet of space at an annual cost of approximately $30,150 (inclusive of taxes) at 1105 Portion Road, Farmingville,
	NY 11738 expired in November 2013. We currently lease this property on a month to month basis for approximately $2,500 per month
	beginning December 2014, with a 5% increase in rent each year.


	 


	In March 2013, we entered
	into a two-year lease for an approximately 1,200 square foot facility of office and warehouse space in Barcelona, Spain, at monthly
	cost of approximately $2,200. We have closed this facility and consolidated our efforts moving our activities back to the United
	States.


	 


	In March of 2014, we
	entered into a month-to-month lease agreement for approximately 400 square feet of office space located in Manhattan, NY at a monthly
	cost of $3,700. In May of 2015 we moved to a larger location with the same landlord on a month to month basis for $4,700 each month.



	 







	Item 3. Legal Proceedings



	 


	We are not a party
	to any pending legal proceedings.



	 







	Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures



	 


	Not applicable.


	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	21



	 









	 




	 




	PART II


	 







	Item 5. Market for Common Equity,
	Related Stockholder Matters, and Issuer



	 



	Purchases of Equity Securities.



	 


	Our Common Stock trades
	on the OTCQB under the symbol "MOBQ" (formerly “AMKT”) on a limited basis. The OTCQB marketplace has effectively
	replaced the FINRA operated OTC Bulletin Board (OTCBB) as the primary market for SEC reporting securities that trade off exchanges.
	The following table sets forth the range of high and low sales prices of our Common Stock for the last two fiscal years.


	 






	Quarters Ended


	 


	 


	High


	 


	 


	Low


	 




	 



	March 31, 2016



	 


	 


	$


	.23


	 


	 


	$


	.08


	 




	 



	June 30, 2016



	 


	 


	 


	.16


	 


	 


	 


	.07


	 




	 



	September 30, 2016



	 


	 


	 


	.11


	 


	 


	 


	.02


	 




	 



	December 31, 2016



	 


	 


	 


	.06


	 


	 


	 


	.01


	 




	 



	March 31, 2015



	 


	 


	 


	.38


	 


	 


	 


	.18


	 




	 



	June 30, 2015



	 


	 


	 


	.39


	 


	 


	 


	.20


	 




	 



	September 30, 2015



	 


	 


	 


	.37


	 


	 


	 


	.10


	 




	 



	December 31, 2015



	 


	 


	 


	.31


	 


	 


	 


	.13


	 





	 


	The closing sales price
	on December 31, 2016 was $.06 per share. All quotations provided herein reflect inter-dealer prices, without retail mark-up, markdown
	or commissions.


	 


	In the event a public
	market for our common stock is sustained in the future, sales of our common stock may be made by holders of our public float or
	by holders of restricted securities in compliance with the provisions of Rule 144 of the Securities Act of 1933. In general, under
	Rule 144, a non-affiliated person who has satisfied a six-month holding period in a fully reporting company under the Securities
	Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, may, sell their restricted Common Stock without volume limitation, so long as the issuer is current
	with all reports under the Exchange Act in order for there to be adequate common public information. Affiliated persons may also
	sell their common shares held for at least six months, but affiliated persons will be required to meet certain other requirements,
	including manner of sale, notice requirements and volume limitations. Non-affiliated persons who hold their common shares for at
	least one year will be able to sell their common stock without the need for there to be current public information in the hands
	of the public. Future sales of shares of our public float or by restricted common stock made in compliance with Rule 144 may have
	an adverse effect on the then prevailing market price, if any, of our common stock. See "Risk Factors."


	 


	As of January 4, 2017,
	there were 149 holders of record of our common stock and approximately 627 additional beneficial holders of our common stock. Our
	transfer agent is Continental Stock Transfer & Trust company, 17 Battery Place, 8th Floor, New York, NY 10004.


	 



	DIVIDEND POLICY



	 


	We have never paid
	any cash dividends and intend, for the foreseeable future, to retain any future earnings for the development of our business. Our
	Board of Directors will determine our future dividend policy on the basis of various factors, including our results of operations,
	financial condition, capital requirements and investment opportunities.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	22



	 







	 




	 





	RECENT SALES OF UNREGISTERED SECURITIES



	 


	(a) In fiscal 2016,
	we had no sales or issuances of unregistered common stock, except we made sales or issuances of unregistered securities listed
	in the table below:


	 




	Date of Sale


	 


	Title of Security


	 


	Number Sold


	 


	Consideration Received and Description of Underwriting or Other Discounts to Market

	Price or Convertible

	Security, Afforded to

	Purchasers


	 


	Exemption

	from

	Registration

	Claimed


	 


	If Option, Warrant or Convertible

	Security, terms

	of exercise or

	conversion




	Jan. – March 2016


	 


	Preferred Stock


	 


	40,000 shares


	 


	$400,000; no commissions paid


	 


	Section 4(2);

	Rule 506


	 


	Each Preferred Share is convertible into 50 shares of Common
	Stock and subject to anti-dilution protection for 2016




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Jan. – June 2016


	 


	Common Stock


	 


	940,000 shares


	 


	Services rendered;

	no commissions paid


	 


	Section 4(2)


	 


	Not applicable




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Third Quarter

	2016


	 


	Convertible

	Promissory

	Notes


	 


	$700,000 in

	principal

	amount, also

	issued 4,900,000

	shares of common

	stock as pre-paid

	interest


	 


	$700,000; no

	commissions paid


	 


	Section 4(2);

	Rule 506


	 


	Convertible at the lower of $.20 per share or the next completed equity
	transaction of at least $10,000,000; in the event of conversion, there is 100% warrant coverage with a term of three years
	exercisable at $.20 per share




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Fourth Quarter 2016


	 


	Common

	Stock


	 


	Exercise of

	Warrants/options-

	11,908,335 common shares


	 


	$595,417


	 


	Section 3(a)(9)


	 


	Exercise of warrants/ options at $.05 per share





	 


	 


	 



	RECENT
	PURCHASES OF SECURITIES



	 


	In 2016, we have had no repurchases of our
	Common Stock.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	23



	 








	 




	 




	Item 6. 



	Selected Financial Data



	 


	Not Applicable.



	 




	Item 7. 



	Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial
	Condition and Results of Operations



	 


	The following discussion
	should be read in conjunction with our financial statements and the notes thereto appearing elsewhere in this Form 10-K. All statements
	contained herein that are not historical facts, including, but not limited to, statements regarding anticipated future capital
	requirements, our future plan of operations, our ability to obtain debt, equity or other financing, and our ability to generate
	cash from operations, are based on current expectations. These statements are forward-looking in nature and involve a number of
	risks and uncertainties that may cause the Company's actual results in future periods to differ materially from forecasted results.


	 




	Overview






	 




	Mobiquity Technologies,
	Inc., a New York corporation (the “Company”), is the parent company of two operating subsidiaries; Mobiquity Networks,
	Inc.(“Mobiquity Networks”) and Ace Marketing & Promotions, Inc. (“Ace Marketing”). The Company’s
	wholly-owned subsidiary, Mobiquity Networks has evolved and grown from a mobile advertising technology company focused on Driving
	Awareness and Foot-traffic throughout its indoor mall-based beacon network, into a next generation mobile location data and marketing
	company. Mobiquity Networks provides precise unique, at-scale location-based data and insights on consumer’s real world behavior
	and trends for use in marketing and research. With our combined data sets of shopping malls, premium outlets and cinemas beacon
	data, and first party location data via our advanced Software Development Kit (“SDK”) utilizing multiple geo-location
	technologies, Mobiquity Networks provides one of the most accurate and scaled solution for mobile data collection and analysis.
	Mobiquity Networks is seeking to create several new revenue streams from the mobile data collection and analysis, including, but
	not limited to; Push Notification Campaigns, Mobile Audiences & Segments, real-time

	Data
	Provision,

	Attribution Reporting and Custom Research. The Company is also attempting to reduce expenses by renegotiating
	certain Mall Developer Agreements.


	 


	Ace Marketing is our
	legacy marketing and promotions business which provides integrated marketing services to our commercial customers. While Ace Marketing
	currently represents substantially all of our revenue, we anticipate that activity from Ace Marketing will represent a diminishing
	portion of corporate revenue as our attention is now principally focused on developing and executing on opportunities in our Mobiquity
	Networks business. We believe that our Mobiquity Networks business represents our greatest growth opportunity going forward.


	 



	Critical Accounting Policies




	 



	Our discussion and
	analysis of our financial condition and results of operations are based upon our financial statements, which have been prepared
	in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States.  The preparation of financial statements
	requires management to make estimates and disclosures on the date of the financial statements. On an on-going basis, we evaluate
	our estimates including, but not limited to, those related to revenue recognition. We use authoritative pronouncements, historical
	experience and other assumptions as the basis for making judgments. Actual results could differ from those estimates. We believe
	that the following critical accounting policies affect our more significant judgments and estimates in the preparation of our financial
	statements.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	24



	 







	 




	 



	Revenue Recognition
	-

	Ace Marketing’s revenue is recognized when title and risk of loss transfers to the customer and the earnings process
	is complete. In general, title passes to our customers upon shipment of the merchandise. Revenue is recognized on a gross basis
	since Ace Marketing has the risks and rewards of ownership, latitude in selection of vendors and pricing, and bears all credit
	risk. Advance payments made by customers are included in customer deposits. Ace Marketing records all shipping and handling fees
	billed to customers as revenues and related costs as cost of goods sold, when incurred. Additional source of revenue, derived from
	emails/texts directly to consumers are recognized under contractual arrangements. Revenue from this advertising method is recognized
	at the time of service provided.


	 



	Revenue Recognition

	– Mobiquity
	Networks. Revenue is recognized with the billing of an advertising contract or data sale. The customer signs a contract directly
	with us for an advertising campaign with mutually agreed upon term and is billed on the start date of the advertising campaign,
	which are normally in short duration periods. The second type of revenue is through the licensing of our data. Revenue from data
	can occur in two ways; the first is a direct feed, which is billed at the end of each month. The second way is through the purchasing
	of audience segments. When an audience segment is purchased, we bill the buyer upon delivery, which is usually 1-2 days for the
	order date.


	  



	Allowance For Doubtful
	Accounts

	. We are required to make judgments based on historical experience and future expectations, as to the realizability
	of our accounts receivable. We make these assessments based on the following factors: (a) historical experience, (b) customer concentrations,
	customer credit worthiness, (d) current economic conditions, and (e) changes in customer payment terms.


	 



	Accounting For Stock
	Based Compensation

	. Stock based compensation cost is measured at the grant date fair value of the award and is recognized as
	expense over the requisite service period. The company uses the Black-Sholes option-pricing model to determine fair value of the
	awards, which involves certain subjective assumptions. These assumptions include estimating the length of time employees will retain
	their vested stock options before exercising them (“expected term”), the estimated volatility of the company’s
	common stock price over the expected term (“volatility”) and the number of options for which vesting requirements will
	not be completed (“forfeitures”). Changes in the subjective assumptions can materially affect estimates of fair value
	stock-based compensation, and the related amount recognized on the consolidated statements of operations.


	 

	 




	Plan of Operation




	 



	Mobiquity Networks
	derives its revenue utilizing the revenue streams mentioned above. All of the products used to derive revenue for the Company are
	reliant on the collection of data. To achieve management’s revenue goals moving forward, we have developed a strategy to
	increase the two main driving forces behind our data collection. One strategy is to increase the total number of users we see on
	a monthly basis (“MAU”), and the second strategy is to increase the total number of locations (Places) available to
	see our MAU’s visit over the same time period. We are currently seeing approximately 13,000,000 unique mobile devices by
	the MAU on a monthly basis and roughly 20,000,000 unique devices for the first 100 days of 2017. The ability to see and collect
	the data required from these unique devices comes from the installation of our proprietary Software Development Kit (SDK) into
	third party mobile applications (Apps). To continue to grow the total number of unique devices we can see on a monthly basis, we
	need to have our SDK installed in more third party Apps. We believe our unique offering to potential App partners gives us a competitive
	advantage over others in the industry. The task of partnering with third party Apps for installation of our SDK is handled internally
	by our business development team.


	 



	As
	of March 31, 2017, we had approximately 200,000 Places in our proprietary Places database, and that number should increase to over
	4,000,000 Places by the end of the second quarter 2017, thus exponentially increasing the amount of data we collect. We have been
	able to steadily increase the number of locations available in our Places database through the use of both open source and proprietary
	technologies. The task of growing our Places database is handled by our internal technology team. The Company currently utilizes
	both internal and outsourced resources to market and sell its product offerings. Management intends to hire additional sales personnel
	in the last three quarters of 2017 as working capital permits

	.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	25



	 







	 




	 





	Results of Operations




	 




	Year Ended December 31, 2016 versus
	Year Ended December 31, 2015




	 



	The following table
	sets forth certain selected condensed statement of operations data for the periods indicated in dollars. In addition, we note that
	the period-to-period comparison may not be indicative of future performance.


	 






	 


	 


	Years Ended December 31


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Revenue


	 


	$


	2,268,523


	 


	 


	$


	2,491,875


	 




	Cost of Revenues


	 


	 


	1,603,500


	 


	 


	 


	1,627,851


	 




	Gross Profit


	 


	 


	665,023


	 


	 


	 


	864,024


	 




	Operating Expenses


	 


	 


	8,950,494


	 


	 


	 


	11,549,375


	 




	Loss from operations


	 


	 


	(8,285,471


	)


	 


	 


	(10,685,351


	)




	Net Loss


	 


	 


	(10,710,503


	)


	 


	 


	(10,459,724


	)




	Other comprehensive Income (Loss)


	 


	 


	(14,119


	)


	 


	 


	3,308






	Net comprehensive loss


	 


	 


	(10,724,622


	)


	 


	 


	(10,456,416


	)




	Net Loss per common Share


	 


	 


	(.13


	)


	 


	 


	(.14


	)




	Weighted average common Shares outstanding


	 


	 


	83,575,215


	 


	 


	 


	72,965,632


	 





	 


	We generated revenues
	of $2,268,523 in fiscal 2016 compared to $2,491,875 in the same period for fiscal 2015, a change in revenues of $223,352. We have
	expended a large portion of our resources and man power in expanding our mobi segment and less time in our branded merchandise.
	In 2017, we anticipate our future revenues increasing in our Mobiquity Networks subsidiary due to expanded efforts in the sales
	of big data.


	 


	Cost of revenues was
	$1,603,500 or 70.7% of revenues in fiscal 2016 compared to $1,627,851 or 65.3% of revenues in the same fiscal period of fiscal
	2015. Cost of revenues includes purchases and freight costs associated with the shipping of merchandise to our customers. The change
	in cost of revenues in 2016 is related to volume and product mix of the products our customers purchased.


	 


	Gross profit was $665,023
	for fiscal 2016 or 29.3% of net revenues compared to $864,024 in the same fiscal period of 2015 or 34.7% of revenues. Gross profits
	will vary period-to-period depending upon a number of factors including the mix of items sold and the volume of product sold. Also,
	it is our practice to pass freight costs on to our customers with low to no profit margin. As revenues from the use of our Mobiquity
	devices increases, it is expected that our margins will increase significantly.


	 


	Selling, general,
	and administrative expenses were $8,950,494 for fiscal 2016 compared to $11,549,375 in the comparable period of the prior
	year. Such operating cost reductions include payroll and related expenses, commissions, insurance, rents, fee payments to
	malls, professional (consulting) and public awareness fees. The corporation has been trimming expenses in order to shift its
	efforts in obtaining a new revenue stream.


	 


	The net loss for 2016
	was $10,710,503 as compared to $10,459,724 for the comparable period of the prior year. As a result of other comprehensive income
	(losses) totaling $(14,119) for 2016 and $3,308, for 2015, our net comprehensive loss for 2016 was $10,724,622 as compared to
	$10,456,416 for the comparable period of the prior year. The continuing operating loss is attributable to the focused effort in
	creating the infrastructure required to move forward with our Mobiquity network business.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	26



	 







	 




	 


	No benefit for income
	taxes is provided for in the reported periods due to the full valuation allowance on the net deferred tax assets. Our ability to
	be profitable in the future is dependent upon the successful introduction and usage of our proximity marketing services.



	 





	Liquidity and Capital Resources




	 



	We had cash and cash
	equivalents of $213,184 at December 31, 2016. Cash used by operating activities for the year ended December 31, 2016 was $5,929,852.
	This resulted from a net loss of $10,710,503, partially offset by non-cash expenses, including depreciation and amortization of
	$159,234, stock based compensation of $683,036, stock issued for services of $122,730, impairment of long-lived assets of $223,487.
	Cash used in investing activities amounted to $283,684, which funds were used to expand our intellectual platform. Cash provided
	by financing activities of $4,396,177 was the result of the sale of our company preferred stock in the amount of $400,000, proceeds
	from exercising warrants, and net of offering costs proceeds from loans in the amount of $3,400,760.


	 


	We had cash and cash
	equivalents of $2,044,662 at December 31, 2015. Cash used by operating activities for the year ended December 31, 2015 was $9,369,631.
	This resulted from a net loss of $10,459,724, partially offset by non-cash expenses, including depreciation and amortization of
	$192,955, stock based compensation of $1,452,248, stock issued for services of $209,088. Cash used in investing activities amounted
	to $5,221, which funds were used to acquire property and equipment. Cash provided by financing activities of $9,762,035 was
	the result of the sale of our company common and preferred stock in the amount of $4,720,000, net of offering costs and proceeds
	from loans in the amount of $5,042,035.


	 


	Our company commenced
	operations in 1998 and was initially funded by our three founders, each of whom has made demand loans to our company that have
	been repaid. Since 1999, we have relied on equity financing and borrowings from outside investors to supplement our cash flow from
	operations and expect this to continue in 2015 and beyond until cash flow from our proximity marketing operations become substantial.


	 





	Recent Financings



	 


	In 2015
	and 2016, we have completed the various financing summarized below.


	 




	Date


	 


	Dollar Amount


	 


	 


	# of Securities Sold




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	January 2015


	 


	$


	500,000


	 


	 


	Issued two-year promissory note in the principal amount of $500,000




	February 2015


	 


	$


	850,000


	 


	 


	Issued two-year promissory note in the principal amount of $850,000




	March 2015


	 


	$


	500,000


	 


	 


	Issued 1,666,667 common shares and a like number of warrants




	April 2015


	 


	$


	1,710,000


	 


	 


	Issued 5,700,000 common shares and a like number of warrants




	May 2015


	 


	$


	510,000


	 


	 


	Issued 1,700,000 common shares and a like number of warrants




	August/October 2015


	 


	$


	3,675,000


	 


	 


	Issued promissory notes in the principal amount of $3,675,000 and 3,675,000 shares of restricted common stock and warrants to purchase an additional 3,675,000 shares of restricted common stock




	December 2015-

	March 2016


	 


	$


	2,400,000


	 


	 


	Issued 240,000 shares of preferred stock convertible into 12,000,000 shares of common stock with anti-dilution protection for 2016




	April – May 2016


	 


	$


	1,025,000


	 


	 


	Issued convertible promissory notes in the principal amount of $1,025,000, convertible at $.20 per share with 100% warrant coverage.




	Third Quarter

	2016


	 


	$


	700,000


	 


	 


	Issued short term convertible promissory notes in the principal amount oif $700,000 and prepaid interest of 4,900,000 common shares.




	Fourth Quarter

	2016


	 


	$


	595,417


	 


	 


	Exercise of outstanding warrants/options at $.05 per share and issuance of approximately 11,908,335 shares of common stock.





	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	27



	 







	 





	 




	First Quarter 2017 Loan Agreements
	and Certain Transactions




	 



	Prior to the February
	28, 2017 sale of secured debt, the Company’s holders of all of its Series AA preferred stock and substantially all of its
	outstanding debt both secured and unsecured (approximately $12.1 million) have been converted into equity securities of the Company
	as outlined below. It should be noted that the capital transactions below were based on a premium to the average closing sale price
	of $0.045 per share during the 60 day period prior to February 08, 2017.


	 


	On February 28, 2017,
	the Company entered into an agreement with a two non-affiliated persons to provide $1.6 million of short term secured debt financing
	in three monthly tranches, with the first monthly tranche in the amount of $600,000. The Company will issue in connection with
	each tranche, six-month secured convertible promissory note(s). Each note is initially convertible at $.05 per share. Any prepayment
	of the note requires the payment of a 25% premium and guaranteed interest for the entire six-month note. In the case of default,
	the amount owed by the Company will become 130% of the outstanding principal and accrued interest thereon. The Conversion Price
	will rest in the event that the note is unpaid and in default on the sixth month anniversary date of the issuance of the note.
	In connection with this transaction, the Company agreed to issue an origination fee of 1,600,000 shares of restricted common stock.
	Alexander Capital L.P. acted as Placement Agent and Advisor for this transaction.


	 


	As of April 5, 2017,
	the Company has outstanding 185,201,768 shares of common stock, 1,118,538 shares of newly designated Series AAA preferred stock
	and $1,350,000 of convertible notes. The convertible notes consist of $1,200,000 of secured notes and $150,000 of unsecured notes.
	Of the 1,118,538 shares of Series AAA preferred stock outstanding, 240,000 Series AA preferred stock with an original cost basis
	of $2.4 million were converted into Series AAA preferred stock. The remaining 878,538 shares of Series AAA preferred stock were
	issued in exchange for the conversion of principal and accrued interest of approximately $8,785,380 of unsecured debt. The terms
	of the Series AAA preferred stock can be summarized as follows:


	 


	The price of each preferred
	share may be convertible into common stock with an equivalent purchase price of $.10 per common share. If the preferred shares
	are converted, the subscriber will then receive 100% warrant coverage, with each warrant exercisable at $.05 per share with a cash
	payment to the Company through the close of business on December 31, 2019. The preferred shares have no voting or other preferences
	except as required by law other than the right of conversion described above and a liquidation preference equal to $.01 per share.


	 


	Thomas Arnost, our
	Executive Vice Chairman, and another principal stockholder agreed to convert letters of credit in the principal amount of $2,700,000
	and $322,000 of secured debt into shares of common stock at the then marketing price of $.05 per share. Accrued interest on these
	obligations were either previously converted into our common stock or were upon conversion of the principal, converted into common
	stock at the fair market value of our common stock at each interest accrual date.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	28



	 









	 




	 




	Item 7A.



	Qualitative and Qualitative
	Disclosures about Market Risk



	 


	Market risk is the
	risk of loss arising from adverse changes in market rates and prices, such as interest rates, foreign currency exchange rates and
	commodity prices. Our primary exposure to market risk is interest rate risk associated with our short term money market investments.
	The Company does not have any financial instruments held for trading or other speculative purposes and does not invest in derivative
	financial instruments, interest rate swaps or other investments that alter interest rate exposure. The Company does not have any
	credit facilities with variable interest rates.



	 




	Item 8.



	Financial Statements



	 



	Financial Statements and Supplementary
	Data



	 


	The report of the Independent
	Registered Public Accounting Firm, Financial Statements and Schedules are set forth herein.


	 


	 


	 


	 






	 



	29



	 







	 






	 







	MOBIQUITY TECHNOLOGIES, INC.




	Index to Financial Statements




	 






	CONTENTS



	 




	 


	 






	YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2016 AND 2015





	PAGES





	 


	 





	CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS



	 




	 


	 






	Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firms





	F-1





	 


	 






	Consolidated Balance Sheets





	F-2





	 


	 






	Consolidated Statement of Operations





	F-3





	 


	 






	Consolidated Statement of Stockholders' Deficit





	F-4





	 


	 






	Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows





	F-5





	 


	 






	Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements





	F-6





	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	30



	 







	 




	 







Click to enlarge



	 






	 


	 










	REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC
	ACCOUNTING FIRM




	 


	To the Board of Directors and Shareholders
	of


	Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.


	 


	We have audited the accompanying consolidated
	balance sheets of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (“the Company”) as of December 31, 2016 and 2015, and the related consolidated
	statements of operations, stockholders’ deficit, and cash flows for each of the years in the two year period ended December
	31, 2016. These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to express
	an opinion on these consolidated financial statements based on our audits.


	 


	We conducted our audits in accordance with
	the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States). Those standards require that we plan and perform
	the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement.
	The company is not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of its internal control over financial reporting.
	Our audit included consideration of internal control over financial reporting as a basis for designing audit procedures that are
	appropriate in the circumstances, but not for the purpose of expressing an opinion on the effectiveness of the company’s
	internal control over financial reporting. Accordingly, we express no such opinion. An audit also includes examining, on a test
	basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial statements, assessing the accounting principles
	used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall financial statement presentation. We believe
	that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.


	 


	In our opinion, the consolidated financial
	statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. as
	of December 31, 2016 and 2015, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the years in the two year period
	ended December 31, 2016, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.


	 


	The accompanying consolidated financial
	statements have been prepared assuming that the Company will continue as a going concern. As discussed in Note 1 to the consolidated
	financial statements, the Company has experienced recurring losses from operations and has an accumulated deficit as of December
	31, 2016 which raises substantial doubt about its ability to continue as a going concern. Management’s plans concerning these
	matters are also described in Note 1. The consolidated financial statements do not include any adjustments that might result from
	the outcome of this uncertainty.


	 



	/s/ Sadler, Gibb & Associates, LLC




	 



	Salt Lake City, UT


	April 14, 2017




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


Click to enlarge


	 








	 


	F-

	1



	 








	 




	 








	MOBIQUITY






	TECHNOLOGIES,
	INC.




	 


	 






	Consolidated Balance Sheets


	 




	December 31,


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Assets


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Current Assets:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash and cash equivalents


	 


	$


	213,184


	 


	 


	$


	2,044,662


	 




	Accounts receivable, net


	 


	 


	298,928


	 


	 


	 


	323,313


	 




	Inventory, net


	 


	 


	79,291


	 


	 


	 


	117,893


	 




	Prepaid expenses and other current assets


	 


	 


	38,929


	 


	 


	 


	634,372


	 




	Total Current Assets


	 


	 


	630,332


	 


	 


	 


	3,120,240


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Property and equipment, net


	 


	 


	15,392


	 


	 


	 


	103,355


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Intangible assets, net


	 


	 


	37,117


	 


	 


	 


	65,717


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Other assets


	 


	 


	43,332


	 


	 


	 


	41,858


	 




	Total Assets


	 


	$


	726,173


	 


	 


	$


	3,331,170


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Liabilities and Stockholders' Deficit


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Current Liabilities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Accounts payable


	 


	$


	914,697


	 


	 


	$


	538,631


	 




	Accrued expenses


	 


	 


	1,161,628


	 


	 


	 


	474,000


	 




	Derivative liability


	 


	 


	350,700


	 


	 


	 


	576,557


	 




	Convertible promissory notes, net


	 


	 


	10,832,275


	 


	 


	 


	4,276,194


	 




	Total Current Liabilities


	 


	 


	13,259,300


	 


	 


	 


	5,865,382


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Long-term portion of convertible promissory notes, net


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	1,571,773


	 




	Total Liabilities


	 


	 


	13,259,300


	 


	 


	 


	7,437,155


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Stockholders' Deficit:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Preferred Stock, $.0001 par value; 5,000,000 shares authorized, 240,000 and 200,000 shares issued and outstanding at December 31, 2016 and December 31, 2015, respectively


	 


	 


	25


	 


	 


	 


	20


	 




	Common stock, $.0001 par value; 500,000,000 and 200,000,000 shares authorized; 99,020,103 and 78,781,757 shares issued and outstanding at December 31, 2016, and December 31, 2015, respectively


	 


	 


	9,913


	 


	 


	 


	7,887


	 




	Additional paid-in capital


	 


	 


	38,652,075


	 


	 


	 


	36,356,626


	 




	Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss)


	 


	 


	(13,047


	)


	 


	 


	1,072


	 




	Accumulated deficit


	 


	 


	(51,182,093


	)


	 


	 


	(40,471,590


	)




	Total Stockholders' Deficit


	 


	 


	(12,533,127


	)


	 


	 


	(4,105,985


	)




	Total Liabilities and Stockholders' Deficit


	 


	$


	726,173


	 


	 


	$


	3,331,170


	 





	 










	See notes to consolidated financial statements.




	 








	 


	F-

	2



	 







	 




	 






	MOBIQUITY






	TECHNOLOGIES,
	INC.




	 








	Consolidated Statements of Operations


	 




	Years Ended December 31,


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Revenues


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Product revenue


	 


	$


	2,202,591


	 


	 


	$


	2,491,875


	 




	Service revenue


	 


	 


	65,932


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	2,268,523


	 


	 


	 


	2,491,875


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cost of Revenues


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cost of product revenue


	 


	 


	1,435,244


	 


	 


	 


	1,627,851


	 




	Cost of service revenue


	 


	 


	168,256


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	1,603,500


	 


	 


	 


	1,627,851


	 




	Gross Profit


	 


	 


	665,023


	 


	 


	 


	864,024


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Operating Expenses:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Selling, general and administrative


	 


	 


	8,950,494


	 


	 


	 


	11,549,375


	 




	Total Operating Expenses


	 


	 


	8,950,494


	 


	 


	 


	11,549,375


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Loss from Operations


	 


	 


	(8,285,471


	)


	 


	 


	(10,685,351


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Other Income (Expense):


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Interest expense


	 


	 


	(3,525,072


	)


	 


	 


	(996,011


	)




	Interest income


	 


	 


	3


	 


	 


	 


	41


	 




	Change in derivatives


	 


	 


	1,304,873


	 


	 


	 


	1,221,597


	 




	Loss on disposition of assets


	 


	 


	(17,526


	)


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Impairment of long lived assets


	 


	 


	(223,487


	)


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Gain on settlement of debt


	 


	 


	36,177


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Total Other Income (Expense)


	 


	 


	(2,425,032


	)


	 


	 


	225,627


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net Loss


	 


	 


	(10,710,503


	)


	 


	$


	(10,459,724


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)


	 


	 


	(14,119


	)


	 


	 


	3,308


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net Comprehensive Loss


	 


	$


	(10,724,622


	)


	 


	$


	(10,456,416


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net Loss Per Common Share:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Basic and Diluted


	 


	$


	(0.13


	)


	 


	$


	(0.14


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Weighted Average Common Shares Outstanding:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Basic and Diluted


	 


	 


	83,575,215


	 


	 


	 


	72,965,632


	 






	 


	See notes to consolidated financial statements.




	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	3



	 







	 




	 






	MOBIQUITY






	TECHNOLOGIES,
	INC.




	 








	Consolidated Statement of Stockholders' Equity


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Accumulated


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Additional


	 


	 


	Other


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Total


	 




	 


	 


	Preferred Stock


	 


	 


	Common Stock


	 


	 


	Paid-in


	 


	 


	Comprehensive


	 


	 


	Accumulated


	 


	 


	Stockholders'


	 




	 


	 


	Shares


	 


	 


	Amount


	 


	 


	Shares


	 


	 


	Amount


	 


	 


	Capital


	 


	 


	Income (Loss)


	 


	 


	Deficit


	 


	 


	Deficit


	 




	Balance, at December 31, 2014


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$



	–



	 


	 


	 


	64,818,243


	 


	 


	$


	6,482


	 


	 


	$


	28,966,269


	 


	 


	$


	(2,236


	)


	 


	$


	(30,011,866


	)


	 


	$


	(1,041,351


	)




	Common stock issued for cash, net of offering costs


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	9,043,334


	 


	 


	 


	908


	 


	 


	 


	2,719,092


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	2,720,000


	 




	Common stock issued in exchange for interest


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	410,180


	 


	 


	 


	40


	 


	 


	 


	120,680


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	120,720


	 




	Common stock issued for services


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	835,000


	 


	 


	 


	88


	 


	 


	 


	209,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	209,088


	 




	Common stock subscriptions


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	3,675,000


	 


	 


	 


	369


	 


	 


	 


	889,357


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	889,726


	 




	Stock based compensation


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	1,452,248


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	1,452,248


	 




	Preferred stock issued for cash


	 


	 


	200,000


	 


	 


	 


	20


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	1,999,980


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	2,000,000


	 




	Net Loss


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	3,308


	 


	 


	 


	(10,459,724


	)


	 


	 


	(10,456,416


	)




	Balance, at December 31, 2015


	 


	 


	200,000


	 


	 


	$


	20


	 


	 


	 


	78,781,757


	 


	 


	$


	7,887


	 


	 


	$


	36,356,626


	 


	 


	$


	1,072


	 


	 


	$


	(40,471,590


	)


	 


	$


	(4,105,985


	)




	Common stock issued in exchange for interest


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	6,390,011


	 


	 


	 


	638


	 


	 


	 


	475,594


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	476,232


	 




	Common stock issued for services


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	940,000


	 


	 


	 


	96


	 


	 


	 


	122,699


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	122,795


	 




	Common stock issued for rent


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	1,000,000


	 


	 


	 


	100


	 


	 


	 


	19,900


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	20,000


	 




	Common stock issued for warrants


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	11,908,335


	 


	 


	 


	1,192


	 


	 


	 


	594,225


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	595,417


	 




	Stock based compensation


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	683,036


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	683,036


	 




	Preferred stock issued for cash


	 


	 


	40,000


	 


	 


	 


	5


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	399,995


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	400,000


	 




	Net Loss


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	0


	 


	 


	 


	(14,119


	)


	 


	 


	(10,710,503


	)


	 


	 


	(10,724,622


	)




	Balance, at December 31, 2016


	 


	 


	240,000


	 


	 


	$


	25


	 


	 


	 


	99,020,103


	 


	 


	$


	9,913


	 


	 


	$


	38,652,075


	 


	 


	$


	(13,047


	)


	 


	$


	(51,182,093


	)


	 


	$


	(12,533,127


	)







	 



	 




	 




	See notes to consolidated financial statements.



	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	4



	 







	 




	 


	 






	MOBIQUITY






	TECHNOLOGIES,
	INC.




	 








	Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows


	 




	Years Ended December 31,


	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash Flows from Operating Activities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net loss


	 


	$


	(10,710,503


	)


	 


	$


	(10,459,724


	)




	Adjustments to reconcile net loss to net cash used in operating activities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Depreciation Expense


	 


	 


	130,634


	 


	 


	 


	164,346


	 




	Amortization - Intangible Assets


	 


	 


	28,600


	 


	 


	 


	28,609


	 




	Amortization - Debt discount


	 


	 


	2,662,564


	 


	 


	 


	614,867


	 




	Change in derivative instrument


	 


	 


	(1,304,873


	)


	 


	 


	(1,221,597


	)




	Stock-based compensation


	 


	 


	683,036


	 


	 


	 


	1,452,248


	 




	Gain on settlement of debt


	 


	 


	(36,177


	)


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Common stock issued for services


	 


	 


	122,730


	 


	 


	 


	209,088


	 




	Disposal of assets


	 


	 


	17,526


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Impairment of long-lived assets


	 


	 


	223,487


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Payments on accrued interest


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	(146,776


	)




	Changes in operating assets and liabilities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Accounts receivable


	 


	 


	24,385


	 


	 


	 


	122,579


	 




	Inventory


	 


	 


	38,602


	 


	 


	 


	72,961


	 




	Prepaid expenses and other assets


	 


	 


	593,969


	 


	 


	 


	(489,985


	)




	Accounts payable


	 


	 


	432,243


	 


	 


	 


	(71,325


	)




	Accrued expenses and other current liabilities


	 


	 


	371,813


	 


	 


	 


	355,078


	 




	Accrued interest


	 


	 


	792,112


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Total adjustments


	 


	 


	4,780,651


	 


	 


	 


	1,090,093


	 




	Net Cash Used in Operating Activities


	 


	 


	(5,929,852


	)


	 


	 


	(9,369,631


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash Flows from Investing Activities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Purchase of property and equipment


	 


	 


	(283,684


	)


	 


	 


	(5,221


	)




	Net Cash Used in Investing Activities


	 


	 


	(283,684


	)


	 


	 


	(5,221


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash Flows from Financing Activities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Proceeds from the issuance of notes


	 


	 


	3,400,760


	 


	 


	 


	5,042,035


	 




	Proceeds received from exercising warrants


	 


	 


	595,417


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Proceeds from issuance of common stock


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	2,720,000


	 




	Proceeds for the issuance of preferred stock


	 


	 


	400,000


	 


	 


	 


	2,000,000


	 




	Net Cash Provided by Financing Activities


	 


	 


	4,396,177


	 


	 


	 


	9,762,035


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net change in Cash and Cash Equivalents


	 


	 


	(1,817,359


	)


	 


	 


	387,183


	 




	Cash and Cash Equivalents, beginning of period


	 


	 


	2,044,662


	 


	 


	 


	1,654,171


	 




	Change in foreign currency


	 


	 


	(14,119


	)


	 


	 


	3,308


	 




	Cash and Cash Equivalents, end of period


	 


	$


	213,184


	 


	 


	$


	2,044,662


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Supplemental Disclosure Information:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash paid for interest


	 


	$


	169,873


	 


	 


	$


	119,776


	 




	Cash paid for taxes


	 


	$


	–


	 


	 


	$


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Non-cash Financing and Investing Activities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Stock issued for interest


	 


	$


	476,297


	 


	 


	$


	120,720


	 




	Stock issued for non-cash stock subscriptions


	 


	$


	–


	 


	 


	$


	889,725


	 




	Recognition of debt discount


	 


	$


	1,079,016


	 


	 


	$


	1,798,154


	 







	 



	See notes to consolidated financial statements.



	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	5



	 







	 




	 



	MOBIQUITY TECHNOLOGIES, INC.








	NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2016 AND 2015




	 



	NOTE 1: SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING
	POLICIES


	 


	NATURE OF OPERATIONS – On September
	10, 2013, Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. changed its name from Ace Marketing & Promotions, Inc. “the Company” or
	“Mobiquity”). We operate through two wholly-owned U.S. subsidiaries, namely, Mobiquity Networks, Inc. and Ace Marketing
	& Promotions, Inc. Mobiquity Networks owns 100% of Mobiquity Wireless S.L.U, a company incorporated in Spain. This corporation
	had an office in Spain to support our U.S. operations, which office was closed in the fourth quarter of 2016.


	 


	We operate a national location-based mobile
	advertising network that has developed a consumer-focused proximity network which we believe is unlike any other in the United
	States. Our integrated suite of proprietary location based mobile advertising technologies allows clients to execute more personalized
	and contextually relevant experiences, driving brand awareness and incremental revenue.


	 


	Mobiquity Technologies, Inc., a New York
	corporation (OTCQB: MOBQ). Through its wholly-owned subsidiary, Mobiquity Networks, Inc. has evolved and grown from a mobile advertising
	technology company focused on Driving Awareness and Foot-traffic throughout its indoor mall-based beacon network, into a next generation
	mobile location data and marketing company. The Company provides precise unique, at-scale location based data and insights on consumer’s
	real world behavior and trends for use in marketing and research. With our combined exclusive data sets of shopping malls, premium
	outlets and cinemas beacon data, and first party location data via our advanced Software Development Kit (SDK) utilizing multiple
	geo-location technologies; Mobiquity Networks provides one of the most accurate and scaled solution for mobile data collection
	and analysis. This should create several additional revenue streams, including, but not limited to; Push Notification Campaigns,
	Re-targeting Campaigns,

	Data Provision,

	Audience Profiles, Attribution Reporting and
	Custom Research.


	 


	Ace Marketing is our legacy marketing and
	promotions business which provides integrated marketing services to our commercial customers. While Ace Marketing currently represents
	substantially all of our revenue, we anticipate that activity from Ace Marketing will represent a diminishing portion of corporate
	revenue as our attention is now principally focused on developing and executing on opportunities in our Mobiquity Networks business.


	 


	GOING CONCERN - The accompanying consolidated
	financial statements have been prepared assuming the Company will continue as a going concern. The Company's continued existence
	is dependent upon the Company's ability to obtain additional debt and/or equity financing to advance its new technology revenue
	stream. The Company has incurred losses for the years ending December 31, 2016 and December 31, 2015 of $10,710,503 and $10,459,724,
	respectively. As of December 31, 2016, the Company has an accumulated deficit of $51,182,093. The Company has had negative cash
	flows from operating activities of $5,929,852 and $9,369,631 for the years ending December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively. These
	factors raise substantial doubt about the ability of the Company to continue as a going concern.


	 


	Management has plans to address the Company’s
	financial situation as follows:


	 


	In the near term, management plans to continue
	to focus on raising the funds necessary to implement the Company’s business plan related to the Bluetooth-enabled iBeacon
	compatible technology. Management will continue to seek out equity and/or debt financing to obtain the capital required to meet
	the Company’s financial obligations. There is no assurance, however, that lenders and investors will continue to advance
	capital to the Company or that the new business operations will be profitable. The possibility of failure in obtaining additional
	funding and the potential inability to achieve profitability raises doubts about the Company’s ability to continue as a going
	concern.


	 


	In the long term, management believes that
	the Company’s projects and initiatives will be successful and will provide cash flow to the Company that will be used to
	finance the Company’s future growth. However, there can be no assurances that the Company’s efforts to raise equity
	and debt at acceptable terms or that the planned activities will be successful, or that the Company will ultimately attain profitability.
	The Company’s long-term viability depends on its ability to obtain adequate sources of debt or equity funding to meet current
	commitments and fund the continuation of its business operations, and the ability of the Company to achieve adequate profitability
	and cash flows from operations to sustain its operations.


	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	6



	 







	 




	 


	PRINCIPLES OF CONSOLIDATION - The accompanying
	consolidated financial statements include the accounts of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc., formerly known as Ace Marketing & Promotions,
	Inc., and its wholly owned subsidiaries, Mobiquity Networks, Inc., Ace Marketing, Inc., (which has had its name changed to Ace
	Marketing & Promotions, Inc. and Mobiquity Wireless S.L.U.). All intercompany accounts and transactions have been eliminated
	in consolidation.


	 


	ESTIMATES - The preparation of financial
	statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles requires management to make estimates and assumptions that
	affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial
	statements and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. Actual results could differ from those
	estimates.


	 


	FAIR VALUE OF FINANCIAL INSTRUMENTS - Effective
	January 1, 2008, the Company adopted FASB ASC 820, “Fair Value Measurements and Disclosures” (“ASC 820”),
	for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis. ASC 820 establishes a common definition for fair value
	to be applied to existing generally accepted accounting principles that require the use of fair value measurements, and establishes
	a framework for measuring fair value and expands disclosure about such fair value measurements. The adoption of ASC 820 did not
	have an impact on the Company’s financial position or operating results, but did expand certain disclosures.


	 


	ASC 820 defines fair value as the
	price that would be received to sell an asset or paid to transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between market participants
	at the measurement date. Additionally, ASC 820 requires the use of valuation techniques that maximize the use of observable
	inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs. These inputs are prioritized below:


	 





	Level 1:




	Observable inputs such as quoted market prices in active markets for identical assets or liabilities






	Level 2:




	Observable market-based inputs or unobservable inputs that are corroborated by market data






	Level 3:




	Unobservable inputs for which there is little or no market data, which require the use of the reporting entity’s own assumptions.





	 


	Cash and cash equivalents include money
	market securities that are considered to be highly liquid and easily tradable as of December 31, 2016 and 2015. These securities
	are valued using inputs observable in active markets for identical securities and are therefore classified as Level 1 within
	our fair value hierarchy.


	 


	The carrying amounts of financial instruments,
	including accounts receivable, accounts payable and accrued liabilities, and promissory note, approximated fair value as of December
	31, 2016 and 2015, because of the relatively short-term maturity of these instruments and their market interest rates. No instruments
	are carried at fair value.


	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	7



	 







	 




	 


	The Company accounts for its derivative liabilities, at
	fair value, on a recurring basis under level 2.


	 




	 


	 


	 


	Level 1


	 


	 


	Level 2


	 


	 


	Level 3


	 


	 


	Total


	 




	 



	Fair value of derivatives



	 


	 


	$


	–


	 


	 


	$


	350,700


	 


	 


	$


	–


	 


	 


	$


	350,700


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	Embedded Conversion Features


	 


	The Company evaluates embedded conversion
	features within convertible debt under ASC 815 "Derivatives and Hedging" to determine whether the embedded conversion
	feature(s) should be bifurcated from the host instrument and accounted for as a derivative at fair value with changes in fair value
	recorded in earnings. If the conversion feature does not require derivative treatment under ASC 815, the instrument is evaluated
	under ASC 470-20 "Debt with Conversion and Other Options" for consideration of any beneficial conversion feature.


	 


	Derivative Financial Instruments


	 


	The company does not use derivative instruments
	to hedge exposures to cash flow, market, or foreign currency risks. The Company evaluates all of its’ financial instruments,
	including stock purchase warrants and options, to determine if such instruments are derivatives or contain features that qualify
	as embedded derivatives. For derivative financial instruments that are accounted for as liabilities, the derivative instrument
	is initially recorded at its fair value and is then re-valued at each reporting date, with changes in the fair value reported as
	charges or credits to income.


	 


	CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS - The Company
	considers all highly liquid debt instruments with a maturity of three months or less, as well as bank money market accounts, to
	be cash equivalents. As of December 31, 2016 and 2015, the balances are $213,184 and $2,044,662, respectively.


	 


	CONCENTRATION OF CREDIT RISK - Financial
	instruments, which potentially subject the Company to concentrations of credit risk, consist principally of trade receivables and
	cash and cash equivalents.


	 


	Concentration of credit risk with respect
	to trade receivables is generally diversified due to the large number of entities comprising the Company’s customer base
	and their dispersion across geographic areas principally within the United States. The Company routinely addresses the financial
	strength of its customers and, as a consequence, believes that its receivable credit risk exposure is limited.


	 


	The Company places its temporary cash investments
	with high credit quality financial institutions. At times, the Company maintains bank account balances, which exceed FDIC limits.
	As of December 31, 2016 and 2015, the Company exceeded FDIC limits by $0 and $1,644,032, respectively.


	   


	REVENUE RECOGNITION – The Company
	recognizes revenue, for all revenue streams, when it is realized or realizable and estimable in accordance with ASC 605, “

	Revenue
	Recognition

	”. The Company will recognize revenue only when all of the following criteria have been met:


	 




	 



	·




	Persuasive evidence for an agreement exists;





	 




	 



	·




	Service has been provided or shipment has occurred;





	 




	 



	·




	The fee is fixed or determinable; and,





	 




	 



	·




	Collection is reasonably assured.






	  



	ACE MARKETING – Ace Marketing’s
	revenue is recognized when title and risk of loss transfers to the customer and the earnings process is complete. In general, title
	passes to our customers upon the company’s shipment of the merchandise. Revenue is recognized on a gross basis since Ace
	Marketing has the risks and rewards of ownership, latitude in selection of vendors and pricing, and bears all credit risk. Advance
	payments made by customers are included in customer deposits. Ace Marketing records all shipping and handling fees billed to customers
	as revenues and related costs as cost of goods sold, when incurred. Additional source of revenue, derived from emails/texts directly
	to consumers are recognized under contractual arrangements. Revenue from this advertising method is recognized at the time of service
	provided.


	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	8



	 







	 




	 


	MOBIQUITY NETWORKS – Revenue is
	recognized with the billing of an advertising contract or data sale. The customer signs a contract directly with us for an advertising
	campaign with mutually agreed upon term and is billed on the start date of the advertising campaign, which are normally in short
	duration periods. The second type of revenue is through the licensing of our data. Revenue from data can occur in two ways; the
	first is a direct feed, which is billed at the end of each month. The second way is through the purchasing of audience segments.
	When an audience segment is purchased, we bill the buyer upon delivery, which is usually 1-2 days for the order date.


	 


	ALLOWANCE FOR DOUBTFUL ACCOUNTS - Management
	must make estimates of the collectability of accounts receivable. Management specifically analyzes accounts receivable and analyzes
	historical bad debts, customer concentrations, customer credit-worthiness, current economic trends and changes in customer payment
	terms when evaluating the adequacy of the allowance for doubtful accounts. As of December 31, 2016 and 2015, allowance for doubtful
	accounts were $104,611 and $104,611, respectively.


	 


	INVENTORY – Inventory is recorded
	at cost (First In, First Out) and is comprised of finished goods. The Company maintains an inventory on hand for its largest customer’s
	frequent order items. All items held are branded for the customer, therefore are not available for public distribution. The Company
	has an agreement with this customer, for cost recovery, if vendor relationship is terminated. There have been minimal reserves
	placed on inventory, based on this arrangement. As of December 31, 2016 and 2015, the Company has reserved against $31,676 and
	$31,676, respectively.


	 


	PROPERTY AND EQUIPMENT - Property and equipment
	are stated at cost. Depreciation is expensed using the straight-line method over the estimated useful lives of the related assets.
	Leasehold improvements are being amortized using the straight-line method over the estimated useful lives of the related assets
	or the remaining term of the lease. The costs of additions and improvements, which substantially extend the useful life of a particular
	asset, are capitalized. Repair and maintenance costs are charged to expense. When assets are sold or otherwise disposed of, the
	cost and related accumulated depreciation are removed from the account and the gain or loss on disposition is reflected in operating
	income.


	 


	LONG LIVED ASSETS - Long-lived assets such
	as property, equipment and identifiable intangibles are reviewed for impairment whenever facts and circumstances indicate that
	the carrying value may not be recoverable. When required impairment losses on assets to be held and used are recognized based on
	the fair value of the asset. The fair value is determined based on estimates of future cash flows, market value of similar assets,
	if available, or independent appraisals, if required. If the carrying amount of the long-lived asset is not recoverable from its
	undiscounted cash flows, an impairment loss is recognized for the difference between the carrying amount and fair value of the
	asset. When fair values are not available, the Company estimates fair value using the expected future cash flows discounted
	at a rate commensurate with the risk associated with the recovery of the assets. The Company recognized $223,487 impairment
	losses for the period ended December 31, 2016.


	  


	PATENTS and TRADEMARKS - Patents and trademarks
	developed during the prior years were capitalized for the period of development and testing. Expenditures during the planning stage
	and after implementation have been expensed in accordance with ASC985.


	 


	ADVERTISING COSTS - Advertising costs are
	expensed as incurred. For the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015, there were advertising costs of $6,341 and $14,495, respectively.


	 


	ACCOUNTING FOR STOCK BASED COMPENSATION.
	Stock based compensation cost is measured at the grant date fair value of the award and is recognized as expense over the requisite
	service period. The Company uses the Black-Sholes option-pricing model to determine fair value of the awards, which involves certain
	subjective assumptions. These assumptions include estimating the length of time employees will retain their vested stock options
	before exercising them (“expected term”), the estimated volatility of the Company’s common stock price over the
	expected term (“volatility”) and the number of options for which vesting requirements will not be completed (“forfeitures”).
	Changes in the subjective assumptions can materially affect estimates of fair value stock-based compensation, and the related amount
	recognized on the consolidated statements of operations. Refer to Note 8 “Stock Option Plans” in the Notes
	to Consolidated Financial Statements in this report for a more detailed discussion.


	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	9



	 







	 




	 


	BENEFICIAL CONVERSION FEATURES - Debt instruments
	that contain a beneficial conversion feature are recorded as deemed interest to the holders of the convertible debt instruments.
	The beneficial conversion is calculated as the difference between the fair values of the underlying common stock less the proceeds
	that have been received for the debt instrument limited to the value received.


	 


	FOREIGN CURRENCY TRANSLATIONS - The Company’s
	functional and reporting currency is the U.S. dollar. We own a subsidiary in Europe. Our subsidiary’s functional currency
	is the EURO. All transactions initiated in EUROs are translated into U.S. dollars in accordance with ASC 830-30,

	“Translation
	of Financial Statements,”

	as follows:


	 




	 



	(i)




	Monetary assets and liabilities at the rate of exchange in effect at the balance sheet date.





	 



	(ii)




	Fixed assets and equity transactions at historical rates.





	 



	(iii)




	Revenue and expense items at the average rate of exchange prevailing during the period.





	 


	Adjustments arising from such translations
	are deferred until realization and are included as a separate component of stockholders’ equity as a component of comprehensive
	income or loss. Therefore, translation adjustments are not included in determining net income (loss) but reported as other comprehensive
	income.


	 


	No significant realized exchange gains
	or losses were recorded since March 7, 2013 (date of acquisition of subsidiary) to December 31, 2016.


	 


	INCOME TAXES - Deferred income taxes are
	recognized for temporary differences between financial statement and income tax basis of assets and liabilities for which income
	tax or tax benefits are expected to be realized in future years. A valuation allowance is established to reduce deferred tax assets,
	if it is more likely than not, that all or some portion of such deferred tax assets will not be realized. The effect on deferred
	taxes of a change in tax rates is recognized in income in the period that includes the enactment date.


	 


	NET LOSS PER SHARE - Basic net loss per
	share is computed by dividing income available to common shareholders by the weighted-average number of common shares outstanding.
	Diluted earnings per share reflect, in periods in which they have a dilutive effect, the impact of common shares issuable upon
	exercise of stock options. The number of common shares potentially issuable upon the exercise of certain options and warrants that
	were excluded from the diluted loss per common share calculation was approximately 51,912,242 and 28,424,266 because they are anti-dilutive,
	as a result of a net loss for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively.


	 


	RECENTLY ISSUED ACCOUNTING PRONOUNCEMENTS
	- We have reviewed the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update (“ASU”) accounting pronouncements and interpretations
	thereof that have effectiveness dates during the periods reported and in future periods. The Company has carefully considered the
	new pronouncements that alter previous generally accepted accounting principles and does not believe that any new or modified principles
	will have a material impact on the corporation’s reported financial position or operations in the near term. The applicability
	of any standard is subject to the formal review of our financial management and certain standards are under consideration.


	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	10



	 







	 




	 




	NOTE 2: PROPERTY AND EQUIPMENT


	 


	Property and equipment, net, consist of
	the following at December 31:


	 




	 


	 


	USEFUL LIVES


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Furniture and Fixtures


	 


	3 or 5 years


	 


	$


	362,930


	 


	 


	$


	1,094,601


	 




	Leasehold Improvements


	 


	5 years


	 


	 


	4,084


	 


	 


	 


	4,084


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	367,014


	 


	 


	 


	1,098,685


	 




	Less Accumulated Depreciation


	 


	 


	 


	 


	351,622


	 


	 


	 


	995,330


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	15,392


	 


	 


	$


	103,355


	 





	 


	Depreciation expense for the years ended
	December 31, 2016 and 2015 was $130,634 and $164,346, respectively. The company disposed of approximately $736,100 of outdated
	fixed assets resulting in a loss on disposal of $17,526. The company performed an impairment assessment in accordance with ASC
	360-10-35-17, and determined that an impairment loss of $223,487 of the capitalized costs for internal use software exists as of
	December 31, 2016.


	 




	NOTE 3: INTANGIBLE ASSETS


	 


	Intangible assets, net, consist of the
	following at December 31:


	 




	 


	 


	USEFUL LIVES


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Acquisition of intellectual property (FuturLink)


	 


	5 years


	 


	 


	98,000


	 


	 


	 


	98,000


	 




	Website technology development (Venn/AcePlace)


	 


	5 years


	 


	 


	45,000


	 


	 


	 


	45,000


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	143,000


	 


	 


	 


	143,000


	 




	Less Accumulated Amortization


	 


	 


	 


	 


	105,883


	 


	 


	 


	77,283


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	37,117


	 


	 


	$


	65,717


	 





	Future amortization, for the years ending
	December 31, is as follows:







	2017



	 


	 



	27,157



	 





	2018



	 


	 



	9,960



	 





	Thereafter



	 


	 



	-



	 




	 


	 



	$




	37,117



	 





	 


	Amortization expense for the years ended
	December 31, 2016 and 2015 was $28,600 and $28,609, respectively.


	 



	Acquisition of Assets of FuturLink




	 



	On March 7, 2013, the Company acquired
	the assets of FuturLink at a cost of approximately $98,000, which cash was paid from the Company’s working capital. These
	assets include, without limitation, the FuturLink technology (patents and source codes), trademark(s) and access point (proximity
	marketing) component parts. At the time of acquisition, FuturLink’s assets were minimal; the purchase price was apportioned
	to the intellectual property received in exchange. The Company changed its name to Mobiquity Networks upon acquisition and is a
	consolidated component of these financial statements.


	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	11



	 







	 




	 




	NOTE 4: CONVERTIBLE DEBT AND DERIVATIVE
	LIABILITIES


	 


	Summary of Convertible Promissory Notes:


	 




	 


	 




	2016




	 


	 




	2015




	 





	Arnost Note



	 



	$




	322,000



	 


	 



	$




	322,000



	 





	Cavu Notes, net of $8,379 for 2016 and $28,227 for 2015 debt discounts



	 


	 



	241,621



	 


	 


	 



	221,773



	 





	Berg Notes (a)



	 


	 



	3,722,000



	 


	 


	 



	3,722,000



	 





	Investor Notes, net of discounts



	 


	 



	6,546,654



	 


	 


	 



	1,582,194



	 





	   Total Debt



	 


	 



	10,832,275



	 


	 


	 



	5,847,967



	 





	Current portion of debt



	 


	 



	10,832,275



	 


	 


	 



	4,276,194



	 





	Long-term portion of debt



	 



	$




	-



	 


	 



	$




	1,571,773



	 





	 




	 


	(a)



	Between August and December
	2015, the Company borrowed $3,675,000 from accredited investors. These loans are due and payable the earlier of December 31, 2016
	or the completion of an equity financing of at least $2,500,000. Upon the sale of the unsecured promissory notes, the Company
	issued $1 of principal, one share of common stock and a warrant to purchase one share of common stock at an exercise price of
	$0.40 per share through August 31, 2017. Accordingly, an aggregate of 3,675,000 shares of common stock and warrants to purchase
	a like amount were issued in the last six months of 2015. Each noteholder has the right to convert the principal of their note
	and accrued interest thereon at a conversion price of $0.30 per share or at the noteholder’s option, into equity securities
	of the Company on the same terms as the last equity transaction completed by the Company prior to each respective conversion date.





	 


	The Company has financial
	instruments that are considered derivatives or contain embedded features subject to derivative accounting related to 22 convertible
	notes issued totaling $3,675,000 which included a ratchet provision in the conversion price of $0.30 or a price equal to the last
	equity transaction completed by the Company as part of a subscription agreement. The notes all have a maturity date of December
	31, 2016. Embedded derivatives are valued separately from the host instrument and are recognized as derivative liabilities in the
	Company’s balance sheet. The Company measures these instruments at their estimated fair value and recognizes changes in their
	estimated fair value in results of operations during the period of change. The Company has estimated the fair value of these embedded
	derivatives for convertible debentures and associated warrants using a multinomial lattice model as of December 31, 2016. The fair
	values of these derivative instruments are measured each quarter, which resulted in a gain of $352,132. As of December 31, 2016,
	the fair market value of these derivatives aggregated $224,425, using the following assumptions: estimated 0.3 year term, estimated
	volatility of 313%, and a discount rate of 0.51%.


	 


	In April 2016 through
	the filing date of this Form 10-K, the Company issued and sold 12% unsecured promissory notes in the principal amount of $1,025,000,
	convertible at $0.20 per common share. Upon conversion, the note holders would receive 100% warrant coverage, exercisable at $0.20
	per common share over a period of five years with cashless exercise provisions. These notes automatically convert in the event
	at least $5 million is raised in an equity financing. Prior to the mandatory conversion date, note holders have the option to convert
	the principal and accrued interest also on the same terms as the mandatory conversion and the Company has the option to prepay.
	The fair values of the derivative instruments are measured each quarter, which resulted in a gain of $1,507,450 and initial derivative
	expense of $565,780. As of December 31, 2016, the fair market value of these derivatives aggregated $126,275, using the following
	assumptions: estimated 0.3 year term, estimated volatility of 279%, and a discount rate of 0.51%.


	 


	The Company raised
	$700,000 in the third quarter of 2016 from the sale of secured promissory notes in the principal amount of $700,000 from six accredited
	investors. Each Note was scheduled to be repaid on October 31, 2016, extended to December 15, 2016 but payment was not made. In
	lieu of interest on the Note, 4,900,000 restricted shares of common stock were issued to the Note Holders. At the option of the
	Note Holder, each Note shall be convertible at the lower of $.20 per common share or into securities on the same terms of the next
	completed equity offering of at least $10 million in gross proceeds. In the event the Note is converted into common stock, 100%
	warrant conversion shall be provided to the Note Holder for each share of common stock issued upon conversion. These warrants will
	have a term of three years and shall be exercisable at $.20 per common share. Prior to this offering, Thomas Arnost, Executive
	Chairman, has a secured interest in the amount of $322,000 in the assets of the Company and its subsidiaries. Mr. Arnost has agreed
	that the investors in this offering will have a pari passu first secured interest with Mr. Arnost in all assets of the Company
	and its subsidiaries. The fair values of the derivative instruments are measured each quarter, which resulted in a gain of $11,071.
	As of December 31, 2016, the fair market value of these derivatives aggregated $42,945, using the following assumptions: estimated
	volatility of 279.0%, and a discount rate of 0.51%.


	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	12



	 







	 




	 


	A recap of the derivative instruments is as follows:


	 






	Derivative Liability 2016




	Beginning balance


	 


	$


	(576,557


	)




	New Issuances


	 


	 


	(1,079,016


	)




	Gain, net


	 


	 


	1,304,873


	 




	Conversions


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Ending balance


	 


	$


	(350,700


	)





	 




	NOTE 5: FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS


	 


	Our financial assets and liabilities carried
	at fair value measured on a recurring basis as of December 31, 2016 and 2015, consisted of the following:


	 




	 


	 


	Total fair


	 


	 


	Quoted prices


	 


	Significant other


	 


	 


	Significant


	 




	 


	 


	value at


	 


	 


	in active


	 


	observable


	 


	 


	unobservable


	 




	 


	 


	December 31,


	 


	 


	markets


	 


	inputs


	 


	 


	inputs


	 





	Description



	 


	2016


	 


	 


	(Level)


	 


	(Level 2)


	 


	 


	(Level)


	 




	Derivative liability (1)


	 


	$


	350,700


	 


	$


	–


	 


	$


	350,700


	 


	 


	$


	–


	 




	 




	 


	 


	Total fair


	 


	 


	Quoted prices


	 


	Significant other


	 


	 


	Significant


	 




	 


	 


	value at


	 


	 


	in active


	 


	observable


	 


	 


	unobservable


	 




	 


	 


	December 31,


	 


	 


	markets


	 


	inputs


	 


	 


	inputs


	 





	Description



	 


	2015


	 


	 


	(Level)


	 


	(Level 2)


	 


	 


	(Level)


	 




	Derivative liability (1)


	 


	$


	576,557


	 


	$


	–


	 


	$


	576,557


	 


	 


	$


	–


	 





	 






	(1)



	The Company has estimated the fair value of these embedded derivatives for convertible
	debenture using a multinomial lattice model. 

	 




	 


	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	13



	 







	 




	 




	NOTE 6: INCOME TAXES


	 


	The provision for income taxes for the
	years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015 is summarized as follows:


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	 



	Current:



	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 



	Federal



	 


	 


	$


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 



	State



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 



	Deferred:



	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 



	Federal



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 



	State



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	–


	 


	 


	$


	–


	 





	 


	The Company has federal and state net operating
	loss carry forwards of approximately 50,653,000, which begin to expire 2025 and can be used to reduce future taxable income
	through 2034. The Company is open for tax years for the years ended 2008 through present.


	 


	The tax effects of temporary differences
	which give rise to deferred tax assets (liabilities) are summarized as follows:


	 






	 


	 


	YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Net operating loss carry-forwards


	 


	$


	(20,261,000


	)


	 


	$


	(15,977,000


	)




	Stock based compensation – options/warrants


	 


	 


	3,540,000


	 


	 


	 


	3,267,000


	 




	Stock issued for services


	 


	 


	971,000


	 


	 


	 


	971,000


	 




	Gain on derivative instrument


	 


	 


	(1,011,000


	)


	 


	 


	(489,000


	)




	Disallowed entertainment expense


	 


	 


	56,000


	 


	 


	 


	52,000


	 




	Charitable contribution limitation


	 


	 


	11,000


	 


	 


	 


	11,000


	 




	Preferred Stock


	 


	 


	39,000


	 


	 


	 


	39,000


	 




	Bad debt expense & reserves


	 


	 


	47,000


	 


	 


	 


	47,000


	 




	Penalties


	 


	 


	1,000


	 


	 


	 


	1,000


	 




	Loss on extinguishment of debt


	 


	 


	114,000


	 


	 


	 


	129,000


	 




	Beneficial conversion features


	 


	 


	119,000


	 


	 


	 


	119,000


	 




	Mobiquity-Spain – net loss


	 


	 


	830,000


	 


	 


	 


	695,000


	 




	Impairment of long lived assets


	 


	 


	89,000


	 


	 


	 


	0


	 




	Amortization of debt discount


	 


	 


	1,311,000


	 


	 


	 


	246,000


	 




	Deferred Tax Assets


	 


	 


	(14,144,000


	)


	 


	 


	(10,889,000


	)




	Less Valuation Allowance


	 


	 


	14,144,000


	 


	 


	 


	10,889,000


	 




	Net Deferred Tax Asset


	 


	$


	–


	 


	 


	$


	–


	 





	 


	A reconciliation of the federal statutory
	rate to the Company’s effective tax rate is as follows:


	 






	 


	 


	YEARS ENDED DECEMBER 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Federal Statutory Tax Rate


	 


	 


	34.00%


	 


	 


	 


	34.00%


	 




	State Taxes, net of Federal benefit


	 


	 


	6.00%


	 


	 


	 


	6.00%


	 




	Change in Valuation Allowance


	 


	 


	(40.00%


	)


	 


	 


	(40.00%


	)




	Total Tax Expense


	 


	 


	0.00%


	 


	 


	 


	0.00%


	 





	 


	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	14



	 







	 




	 


	NOTE 7: STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY (DEFICIT)


	 


	During the quarter ended March 31, 2015,
	the Company commenced a private placement offering at an offering price of $.30 per share with matching warrants issued to purchase
	an additional share of common stock at $.45 per share through March 31, 2020. Three investors purchased an aggregate of 1,666,667
	shares for proceeds of $500,000 from our private placement offering on March 30, 2015. The Company also issued 77,143 shares for
	$27,000 of interest and 90,000 shares for $22,000 of services rendered during the quarter.


	 


	During the quarter ended June 30, 2015,
	the Company issued 7,400,000 shares for proceeds of $2,220,000 under the private placement offering. We also issued 236,842 shares
	for $59,000 of interest and 435,000 shares for $119,000 of services during the quarter.


	 


	During the quarter ended September 30,
	2015, the Company issued 96,195 shares for $31,549 of interest and 135,000 shares for services during the quarter.


	 


	The private placement offering, which commenced
	in March 2015 and was completed in May 2015, provided for certain anti-dilution protection in the event of sales of common stock
	below $.30 per share. As a result of the note offering described in note 4, paragraph (d) to the table set forth therein, management
	of the Company has determined to issue to the investors one share of common stock for every $1 invested for a total of 2,720,000
	shares.


	 


	In December 2015, the Company sold
	200,000 shares of its Series AA Preferred Stock at a purchase price of $10 per share and raised $2 million. The Series AA
	Preferred Stock have no dividend, voting or liquidation preferences. These Series AA Preferred Stock shall be treated for
	liquidation purposes, the same as a holder of common stock. In the first quarter of 2016, the Company sold 40,000 shares of
	Series AA preferred stock and raised $400,000. Each share of Preferred Stock is convertible into 50 shares of Common Stock at
	an effective conversion price of $.20 per share of Common Stock. The Preferred Stockholders had anti-dilution protection
	rights through December 31, 2016.


	 



	Shares issued for services



	 


	During the year ended December 31, 2015,
	the Company issued 835,00 shares of common stock, at $0.19 to $0.36 per share for $209,090 in exchange for services rendered.


	 


	During the quarter ended March 31,
	2016, the Company issued 695,000 common shares, at $0.10 to $0.19 per share, valued at $97,800. During the June 30, 2016
	quarter the Company issued 245,000 common shares, at $0.10 to $0.11 per share, valued at $24,950 in exchange for services
	rendered. These shares were valued based on the trading price of the Company’s common stock on the date of
	issuance.


	 



	Shares issued for accrued interest



	 


	During the year ended December 31, 2015, the Company issued
	410,180 shares of common stock, at $0.18 to $0.50 per share for $119,776 in payment of interest for the year.


	 


	During the quarter
	ended March 31, 2016, the Company issued 210,333 common shares, at $0.13 to $0.18 per share, valued at $35,215. During the June
	30, 2016 quarter the Company issued 244,344 common shares, at $0.11 per share, valued at $27,000. During the September 30, 2016
	quarter the Company issued 5,215,334 common shares, at $0.06 to $0.11 per share, valued at $387,082. During the December 31, 2016
	quarter the Company issued 720,000 common shares, at .375 per share, valued at $27,000 in exchange for accrued interest.


	 


	During the quarter
	entered December 31, 2016, the Company issued 1,000,000 common shares in satisfaction of back rent owed the landlord in the sum
	of $57,157. The shares were valued at $20,000 and a gain on settlement of debt was recorded of $36,177.


	 


	During the quarter
	ended December 31, 2016, the Company issued 11,908,335 common shares, at $0.05 per share, valued at $594,417 for the exercise of
	outstanding warrants.


	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	15



	 







	 




	 


	NOTE 8: OPTIONS AND WARRANTS


	 


	The Company’s results for the years
	ended December 31, 2016 and 2015 include employee share-based compensation expense totaling $683,036 and $1,452,248, respectively.
	Such amounts have been included in the Statements of Operations within selling, general and administrative expenses. No income
	tax benefit has been recognized in the statement of operations for share-based compensation arrangements due to a history of operating
	losses.


	 


	The following table summarizes stock-based
	compensation expense for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015:


	 






	 


	 


	Years Ended December 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Employee stock based compensation-option grants


	 


	$


	603,536


	 


	 


	$


	1,223,332


	 




	Employee stock based compensation-stock grants


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Non-Employee stock based compensation-option grants


	 


	 


	79,500


	 


	 


	 


	30,155


	 




	Non-Employee stock based compensation-stock grants


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Non-Employee stock based compensation-stock warrant


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	198,761


	 




	 


	 


	$


	683,036


	 


	 


	$


	1,452,248


	 





	  


	NOTE 9: STOCK OPTION PLANS


	 


	During Fiscal 2005, the Company established,
	and the stockholders approved, an Employee Benefit and Consulting Services Compensation Plan (the “2005 Plan”) for
	the granting of up to 2,000,000 non-statutory and incentive stock options and stock awards to directors, officers, consultants
	and key employees of the Company. On June 9, 2005, the Board of Directors amended the Plan to increase the number of stock options
	and awards to be granted under the Plan to 4,000,000. During Fiscal 2009, the Company established a plan of long-term stock-based
	compensation incentives for selected Eligible Participants of the Company covering 4,000,000 shares. This plan was adopted by the
	Board of Directors and approved by stockholders in October 2009 and shall be known as the 2009 Employee Benefit and Consulting
	Services Compensation Plan (the “2009 Plan”). In September 2013, the Company’s stockholders approved an increase
	in the number of shares covered by the 2009 Plan to 10,000,000. In February 2015, the Board approved, subject to stockholder approval
	within one year, an increase in the number of shares under the 2009 Plan to 20,000,000 shares; however, stockholder approval was
	not obtained within the requisite one year and the anticipated increase in the 2009 Plan was canceled. In the first quarter of
	2016, the Board approved and stockholders ratified a 2016 Employee Benefit and Consulting Services Compensation Plan covering 10,000,000
	shares (the “2016 Plan”) and approving moving all options which exceeded the 2009 Plan limits to the 2016 Plan. The
	2005, 2009 and 2016 plans are collectively referred to as the “Plans.”


	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	16



	 







	 




	 


	All stock options under the Plans are granted
	at or above the fair market value of the common stock at the grant date. Employee and non-employee stock options vest over varying
	periods and generally expire either 5 or 10 years from the grant date. The fair value of options at the date of grant was estimated
	using the Black-Scholes option pricing model. For option grants, the Company will take into consideration payments subject to

	 

	the
	provisions of ASC 718 “Stock Compensation”, previously Revised SFAS No. 123 “Share-Based Payment” (“SFAS
	123 (R)”). The fair values of these restricted stock awards are equal to the market value of the Company’s stock on
	the date of grant, after taking into certain discounts. The expected volatility is based upon historical volatility of our stock
	and other contributing factors. The expected term is based upon observation of actual time elapsed between date of grant and exercise
	of options for all employees. Previously, such assumptions were determined based on historical data. The weighted average assumptions
	made in calculating the fair values of options granted during the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015 are as follows:


	 






	 


	 


	Years Ended December 31,


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Expected volatility


	 


	 


	135.6%


	 


	 


	 


	166.38%


	 




	Expected dividend yield


	 


	 


	0


	 


	 


	 


	0


	 




	Risk-free interest rate


	 


	 


	1.25%


	 


	 


	 


	1.76%


	 




	Expected term (in years)


	 


	 


	5.00


	 


	 


	 


	6.62


	 




	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Weighted


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Weighted


	 


	 


	Average


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Average


	 


	 


	Remaining


	 


	 


	Aggregate


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Exercise


	 


	 


	Contractual


	 


	 


	Intrinsic


	 




	 


	 


	Share


	 


	 


	Price


	 


	 


	Term


	 


	 


	Value


	 




	Outstanding, January 1, 2016


	 


	 


	19,340,000


	 


	 


	$


	.39


	 


	 


	 


	7.97


	 


	 


	 


	2,500


	 




	Granted


	 


	 


	1,000,000


	 


	 


	$


	.11


	 


	 


	 


	4.39


	 


	 


	 


	5,625


	 




	Exercised


	 


	 


	(899,999


	)


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Cancelled / Expired


	 


	 


	(1,125,000


	)


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Outstanding, December 31, 2016


	 


	 


	18,315,001


	 


	 


	$


	.41


	 


	 


	 


	5.18


	 


	 


	 


	5,625


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Options exercisable, December 31, 2016


	 


	 


	16,600,417


	 


	 


	$


	.41


	 


	 


	 


	5.14


	 


	 


	 


	5,625


	 





	 


	The weighted-average grant-date fair value
	of options granted during the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015 was $.08 and $.30, respectively. The aggregate intrinsic value
	of options outstanding and options exercisable at December 31, 2016 is calculated as the difference between the exercise price
	of the underlying options and the market price of the Company’s common stock for the shares that had exercise prices, that
	were lower than the $.06 closing price of the Company’s common stock on December 31, 2016.


	 


	As of December 31, 2016, the fair value
	of unamortized compensation cost related to unvested stock option awards was $485,936.


	 


	The option information provided above includes
	options granted outside of the Plans, which total 4,615,000 as of December 31, 2016.


	 


	The weighted average assumptions made in calculating the
	fair value of warrants granted during the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015 are as follows:


	 






	 


	 


	Years Ended


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Expected volatility


	 


	 


	0%


	 


	 


	 


	158.35%


	 




	Expected dividend yield


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	Risk-free interest rate


	 


	 


	0%


	 


	 


	 


	0.30%


	 




	Expected term (in years)


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	0.5


	 





	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	17



	 







	 




	 






	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Weighted


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Weighted


	 


	 


	Average


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Average


	 


	 


	Remaining


	 


	 


	Aggregate


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Exercise


	 


	 


	Contractual


	 


	 


	Intrinsic


	 




	 


	 


	 


	Share


	 


	 


	Price


	 


	 


	Term


	 


	 


	Value


	 




	 



	Outstanding, January 1, 2016



	 


	 


	 


	36,432,782


	 


	 


	$


	0.51


	 


	 


	 


	4.58


	 


	 


	 


	24,800


	 




	 



	Granted



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 



	Exercised



	 


	 


	 


	(11,008,336


	)


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 



	Cancelled/Expired



	 


	 


	 


	(4,171,712


	)


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 



	Outstanding, December 31, 2016



	 


	 


	 


	21,252,734


	 


	 


	$


	0.48


	 


	 


	 


	1.40


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 



	Warrants exercisable, December 31, 2016



	 


	 


	 


	21,252,734


	 


	 


	$


	0.48


	 


	 


	 


	1.40


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 





	 


	NOTE 10: COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES


	 



	COMMITMENTS –




	 



	In April 2011, we entered into our agreement
	with Simon Property Group, which agreement was amended first in September 2013 and then in July 2014. This second amendment provides
	for us to expand our location-based mobile mall network footprint to about 195 current Simon malls across the United States. Our
	agreement with Simon currently expires December 31, 2017. Simon is entitled to receive fees from us equal to the greater of a pre-set
	per mall fee or a percentage of revenues derived from within the Simon Mall network. The revenue share agreement in which Simon
	participates will exceed the minimum annual mall fees if the Company has generated revenues within the Simon network of about $15
	million or more in a calendar year. Our agreement with Simon requires the company to maintain letters of credit for each calendar
	year under the agreement represented by the minimum amount of fees due for such calendar year. For 2015, the minimum fees of $2.7
	million has been secured through two bank letters of credit, one of which was issued in the amount of $1,350,000 utilizing the
	funds of a non-affiliated stockholder and the second letter of credit was obtained in the same amount through the funds of Thomas
	Arnost, our Executive Chairman. In the event Simon draws down upon either letter of credit, we have until the next minimum payment
	due date (approximately 90 days) after the draw down to obtain replacement letters of credit. Each person who secured our letters
	of credit has the opportunity to notify us that they wish to turn the cash funds securing the letters of credit over to us and
	to convert such funds into Common Stock currently at a conversion price of $.20 per share. Also, each person who issued the letter
	of credit is receiving quarterly, while the letters of credit are outstanding, options to purchase 125,000 shares of Common Stock,
	exercisable at the prevailing market price per share on the date of grant and interest at the rate of 8% per annum on the monies
	that they have had to set aside in their bank accounts and are unable to have access to such monies. In April, July and October,
	2016, Simon drew down on each bank letter of credit for an aggregate of $837,880 owed to each letter of credit provider.


	 


	In April 2015, we entered into a license
	agreement with Macerich. Pursuant to our agreement with Macerich, we have the right to install Mobi-Beacons to send information
	across the air space of the common areas of our Macerich mall network in up to 55 malls, across the United States. Our right to
	install our Mobi-Beacons to market and sell third party paid advertising in the interior common areas of these malls shall be exclusive.
	In the fourth quarter of 2016, Macerich terminated this agreement.


	 


	Pursuant to a master agreement effective
	August, 2015, we entered into an agreement with PREIT pursuant to which we have the right to install our Mobi-Beacons and to send
	information across the air space of the common areas of our PREIT mall network, which will include approximately 27 malls in select
	states in the United States. Our right to install our Mobi-Beacons to market and sell third party paid advertising in the interior
	common areas of these malls is exclusive. Under our agreement between us and PREIT, PREIT is entitled to an agreed upon revenue
	share over the four-year term of the agreement. In the event the net revenue share as defined in the agreement is not attained
	for any measurement period, also as defined in the agreement, either party may terminate the agreement upon 90 days prior written
	notice. PREIT may also terminate the agreement if it determines that Mobiquity’s installed equipment is not adequate and/or
	provides a negative user experience for the visitors to the PREIT malls. The agreement also provides for PREIT to adjust the number
	of malls subject to the agreement from time-to-time based upon changes in its beneficial ownership in the malls.


	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	18



	 







	 




	 


	In January 2016, we entered into a license
	agreement with GGP, with an effective date of November 20, 2015. Pursuant to our agreement with GGP, we have the right to install
	Mobi-Beacons to send information across the air space of the common areas of our GGP mall network in up to 120 malls across the
	United States. Our right to install our Mobi-Beacons to market and sell third party paid advertising in the interior common areas
	of these malls is exclusive. In the fourth quarter of 2016, GGP terminated this agreement.



	 



	Pursuant to a master agreement entered
	into in 2015, we entered into an agreement with Rouse pursuant to which we have the right to install our Mobi-Beacons to send information
	across the air space of the common areas of our Rouse mall network, which will include approximately 30 malls in select states
	in the United States. Our right to install our Mobi-Beacons to market and sell third party paid advertising in the interior common
	areas of these malls is exclusive. Under our agreement between us and Rouse, Rouse is entitled to an agreed upon revenue share
	over the four-year term of the agreement. In the event the net revenue share as defined in the agreement is not attained for any
	measurement period, also as defined in the agreement, either party may terminate the agreement upon 90 days prior written notice.
	Either party may also terminate the agreement due to a material breach which is not cured within 30 days of written notice. Also,
	Rouse upon at least 60 days written notice to us prior to the end of the second contract year, may terminate the agreement with
	respect to any participating property for any reason at the end of the second contract year. The agreement also provides for Rouse
	to adjust the number of malls subject to the agreement from time-to-time based upon changes in its beneficial ownership in the
	malls.


	 


	In February 2012, the Company entered into
	a lease agreement for new executive office space of approximately 4,200 square feet located at 600 Old Country Road, Suite 541,
	Garden City, NY 11530. The lease agreement is for 63 months, commencing April 2012 and expiring June 2017. The annual rent under
	this office facility for the first year is estimated at $127,000, including electricity, subject to an annual increase of 3%. In
	the event of a default in which the Company is evicted from the office space, Mobiquity would be responsible to the landlord for
	an additional payment of rent of $160,000 in the first year of the lease, an additional payment of $106,667 in the second year
	of the lease and an additional payment of rent of $53,333 in the third year of the lease. Such additional rent would be payable
	at the discretion of the Company in cash or in Common Stock of the Company.


	 


	Our lease for approximately
	2,000 square feet of space at an annual cost of approximately $28,600 (inclusive of taxes) at 1105 Portion Road, Farmingville,
	NY 11738 expired in November 2013. We currently lease this property on a month to month basis for approximately $2,500 per month
	beginning December 2014, with a 5% increase in rent each month.


	 


	In March 2013, we entered
	into a two-year lease for an approximately 1,200 square foot facility of office and warehouse space in Barcelona, Spain, at monthly
	cost of approximately $2,200. This lease on a month-to-month basis. We have closed this facility and consolidated our efforts moving
	our activities back to the United States.


	 


	In March of 2014, we
	entered into a month-to-month lease agreement for approximately 400 square feet of office space located in Manhattan, NY at a monthly
	cost of $3,700. In May of 2015 we moved to a larger location with the same landlord on a month to month basis for $4,700 each month.


	 


	Minimum future rentals under non-cancelable
	lease commitments are as follows:


	 






	YEARS ENDING DECEMBER 31,


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	2017


	 


	 


	 


	2,467,968


	 




	 


	2018


	 


	 


	 


	0


	 




	 



	2019 and thereafter



	 


	 


	 


	0


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	2,467,968


	 





	 


	Rent and real estate tax expense was approximately
	$3,610,000 and $3,318,000 for the years December 31, 2016 and 2015, respectively.


	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	19



	 







	 




	 



	EMPLOYMENT CONTRACTS –




	 




	Michael D. Trepeta and Dean L. Julia



	 


	On March 1, 2005, the Company entered into
	employment contracts with two of its officers, namely, Dean L. Julia and Michael D. Trepeta. The employment agreements provide
	for minimum annual salaries plus bonuses equal to 5% of pre-tax earnings (as defined) and other perquisites commonly found in such
	agreements. In addition, pursuant to the employment contracts, the Company granted the officers options to purchase up to an aggregate
	of 400,000 shares of common stock.


	 


	On August 22, 2007, the Company approved
	a three-year extension of the employment contracts with two of its officers expiring on February 28, 2011. The employment agreements
	provided for minimum annual salaries with scheduled increases per annum to occur on every anniversary date of the contract and
	extension commencing on March 1, 2008. A signing bonus of options to purchase 150,000 shares granted to each executive were fully
	vested at the date of the grant and exercisable at $1.20 per share through August 22, 2017. Ten year options to purchase 50,000
	shares of common stock are to be granted at fair market value on each anniversary date of the contract and extension commencing
	March 1, 2008. Termination pay of one year base salary based upon the scheduled annual salary of each executive officer for the
	next contract year, plus the amount of bonuses paid (or entitle to be paid) to the executive for the current fiscal year of the
	preceding fiscal year, whichever is higher.


	 


	On April 7, 2010, the Board of Directors
	approved a five-year extension of the employment contract of Dean L. Julia and Michael D. Trepeta to expire on March 1, 2015.  The
	Board approved the continuation of each officer’s current salary and scheduled salary increases on March 1

	st

	of
	each year. The Board also approved a signing bonus of stock options to purchase 200,000 shares granted to each officer which is
	fully vested at the date of grant and exercisable at $.50 per share through April 7, 2020; ten-year stock options to purchase 100,000
	shares of Common Stock to be granted to each officer at fair market value on each anniversary date of the contract and extension
	thereof commencing March 1, 2011; and termination pay of one year base salary based upon the scheduled annual salary of each executive
	officer for the next contract year plus the amount of bonuses paid or entitled to be paid to the executive for the current fiscal
	year or the preceding fiscal year, whichever is higher.  In the event of termination, the executives will continue to
	receive all benefits included in the employment agreement through the scheduled expiration date of said employment agreement prior
	to the acceleration of the termination date thereof.


	 


	In July 2012, the Company approved and
	in January 2013 the Company implemented amending the employment agreements of Messrs. Julia and M. Trepeta to expire on February
	28, 2017, subject to an automatic one year renewal on March 1, 2013 and on each March 1

	st

	thereafter, unless the Employment
	Agreement is terminated in accordance with its terms on or before December 30

	th

	of the prior calendar year. In the event
	of termination without cause, the executives will continue to receive all salary and benefits included in the employment agreement
	through the scheduled expiration date of said employment agreement prior to the acceleration of the termination date thereof, plus
	one year termination pay.


	 


	On May 28, 2013, the Company approved amending
	the employment agreements of Messrs. Julia and Trepeta to provide that each officer may choose an annual bonus equal to 5% of pre-tax
	earnings for the most recently completed year before deduction of annual bonuses paid to officers or, in the event majority control
	of the Company is acquired by a person or a group of persons during the prior fiscal year, the officer may choose to receive the
	aforementioned bonus or 1% of the control consideration paid by acquirer(s) to acquire majority control of the Company.


	 



	Thomas Arnost



	 


	In December 2014, we entered into a three-year
	employment agreement with Thomas Arnost serving as Executive Chairman of the board. Mr. Arnost receives a monthly salary of
	$10,000 plus an annual grant of options for serving on the board of directors. In the event of his termination, by Mr. Arnost or
	by the company for cause, Mr. Arnost will receive his pay through the termination date. In the event that Mr. Arnost is terminated
	without cause, he shall be entitled to receive his salary paid through the end of the term of his agreement. Mr. Arnost may terminate
	the agreement at any time by giving three months’ prior written notice to our board of directors. Mr. Arnost will also be
	entitled to indemnification against all claims, judgments, damages, liabilities, costs and expenses (including reasonably legal
	fees) arising out of, based upon or related to his performance of services to us, to the maximum extent permitted by law.


	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	20



	 







	 




	 



	Sean Trepeta



	 


	In December 2014, Mobiquity Networks entered
	into an employment agreement with Sean Trepeta, to serve as President of Mobiquity Networks as an employee at will. Mr. Trepeta,
	as a full-time employee, is to be paid a salary at the rate of $20,000 per month. Upon the execution of the agreement, he received
	10-year options to purchase 1,500,000 shares of our common stock vesting quarterly over a period of three years. For calendar 2015,
	he will be entitled to a bonus of $125,000 upon revenues of Mobiquity Networks achieving a minimum of $6 million in revenues and
	a further bonus of $125,000 for a total of $250,000 at such time as Mobiquity Network’s revenues achieve a minimum of $12
	million, it being understood that any revenues which do not have a 30% margin shall not count toward these totals. All options
	granted to Mr. Trepeta will become immediately vested in the event of a change in control of our Company or sale of substantially
	all of our assets. In the event we terminate Mr. Trepeta without cause, after six months of continued employment under the
	employment agreement, Mr. Trepeta is entitled to receive three months’ severance pay.


	  



	Paul Bauersfeld



	 


	In December 2014, we entered into an employment
	agreement with Paul Bauersfeld, our Chief Technology Officer, who is an employee at will. Mr. Bauersfeld, as a full-time employee,
	is to be paid a salary at the rate of $25,000 per month. Upon the execution of the agreement, he received 10-year options to purchase
	1,000,000 shares of our common stock vesting quarterly over a period of three years. For calendar 2015, he will be entitled to
	a bonus of $125,000 upon revenues of Mobiquity Networks achieving a minimum of $6 million in revenues and a further bonus of $125,000
	for a total of $250,000 at such time as Mobiquity Network’s revenues achieve a minimum of $12 million, it being understood
	that any revenues which do not have a 30% margin shall not count toward these totals. The foregoing compensatory arrangements with
	Mr. Bauersfeld is in addition to the non-statutory stock options to purchase 2,600,000 shares of our common stock previously granted
	to Mr. Bauersfeld. All options granted to Mr. Bauersfeld will become immediately vested in the event of a change of control
	of our company or sale of substantially all of our assets. In the event we terminate Mr. Bauersfeld without cause. Mr. Bauersfeld
	is entitled to receive six months’ severance pay.


	 



	Sean McDonnell



	 


	Sean McDonnell, our Chief Financial Officer,
	is an employee at will and is currently receiving a salary of $132,000 per annum.


	 



	TRANSACTIONS WITH MAJOR CUSTOMERS –



	 


	The Company sells its products to a geographically
	diverse group of customers, performs ongoing credit evaluations of its customers and generally does not require collateral. During
	the year ended December 31, 2016 a customer accounted for approximately 35% of net revenues and for the year ended December 31,
	2015 a customer accounted for approximately 38% of net revenues. The Company holds on hand certain items that are ordered on a
	regular basis.


	 


	NOTE 11: SEGMENT INFORMATION


	 


	Reportable operating segment is determined
	based on Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.’s management approach. The management approach, as defined by accounting standards
	which have been codified into FASB ASC 280, “Segment Reporting,” is based on the way that the chief operating decision-maker
	organizes the segments within an enterprise for making decisions about resources to be allocated and assessing their performance.
	Our chief operating decision-maker is our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer.


	 


	While our results of operations are primarily
	reviewed on a consolidated basis, the chief operating decision-maker also manages the enterprise in two operating segments: (i)
	Ace Marketing and Promotions, Inc. captures Branding & Branded Merchandise (ii) Mobiquity Networks represent our Mobil Marketing.


	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	21



	 







	 




	 


	Corporate management defines and reviews
	segment profitability based on the same allocation methodology as presented in the segment data tables below:


	 




	Fiscal 2016




	 


	 


	Ace Marketing & Promotions, Inc.


	 


	 


	Mobiquity Networks Inc.


	 


	 


	Total


	 




	Net sales


	 


	$


	2,202,591


	 


	 


	$


	65,932


	 


	 


	$


	2,268,523


	 




	Operating (loss), excluding depreciation


	 


	 


	(575,492


	)


	 


	 


	(6,464,214


	)


	 


	 


	(7,039,706


	)




	Interest income


	 


	 


	3


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	3


	 




	Interest (expense)


	 


	 


	(4,463


	)


	 


	 


	(3,520,609


	)


	 


	 


	(3,525,072


	)




	Depreciation and amortization


	 


	 


	(20,925


	)


	 


	 


	(138,922


	)


	 


	 


	(159,847


	)




	Comprehensive Loss


	 


	 


	(600,877


	)


	 


	 


	(10,123,745


	)


	 


	 


	(10,724,622


	)




	Total assets at December 31, 2016


	 


	 


	374,156


	 


	 


	 


	352,017


	 


	 


	 


	726,173


	 




	 


	Fiscal 2015




	 


	 


	Ace Marketing & Promotions, Inc.


	 


	 


	Mobiquity Networks Inc.


	 


	 


	Total


	 




	Net sales


	 


	$


	2,491,875


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	2,491,875


	 




	Operating (loss), excluding depreciation


	 


	 


	(1,831,241


	)


	 


	 


	(7,436,250


	)


	 


	 


	(9,267,491


	)




	Interest income


	 


	 


	41


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	41


	 




	Interest (expense)


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	(996,011


	)


	 


	 


	(996,011


	)




	Depreciation and amortization


	 


	 


	(48,014


	)


	 


	 


	(144,941


	)


	 


	 


	(192,955


	)




	Comprehensive Loss


	 


	 


	(1,879,214


	)


	 


	 


	(8,577,202


	)


	 


	 


	(10,456,416


	)




	Total assets at December 31, 2015


	 


	 


	3,038,728


	 


	 


	 


	292,442


	 


	 


	 


	3,331,170


	 





	 


	All intersegment sales and expenses have
	been eliminated from the tables above.


	 


	NOTE 12: COMMON STOCK PURCHASE AGREEMENT


	  


	On March 31, 2014, the Company entered
	into a common stock purchase agreement (referred to herein as the “Purchase Agreement”), with Aspire Capital Fund,
	LLC, an Illinois limited liability company (referred to herein as “Aspire Capital”), which provides that, upon the
	terms and subject to the conditions and limitations set forth therein, Aspire Capital is committed to purchase up to an aggregate
	of $15.0 million of Common Stock over the approximately 24-month term of the Purchase Agreement. In consideration for entering
	into the Purchase Agreement, concurrently with the execution of the Purchase Agreement, we issued to Aspire Capital 1,000,000 shares
	of Common Stock as a commitment fee (referred to in herein as the “Commitment Shares”). Upon execution of the Purchase
	Agreement, we sold to Aspire Capital 1,000,000 shares of Common Stock (referred to herein as the “Initial Purchase Shares”).
	Concurrently with entering into the Purchase Agreement, we also entered into a registration rights agreement with Aspire Capital
	(referred to herein as the “Registration Rights Agreement”), in which we agreed to file one or more registration statements
	as permissible and necessary to register under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, or the Securities Act, the sale of the shares
	of Common Stock that have been and may be issued to Aspire Capital under the Purchase Agreement.


	  


	Pursuant to the Purchase Agreement and
	the Registration Rights Agreement, the Company was obligated to register 15,000,000 shares of Common Stock under the Securities
	Act, which includes the Commitment Shares and Initial Purchase Shares that have already been issued to Aspire Capital and an additional
	13,000,000 shares of Common Stock which the Company may issue to Aspire Capital after the registration statement is declared effective
	under the Securities Act. Said Registration Statement was declared effective by the SEC on April 28, 2014 and has since become
	stale. The Purchase Agreement terminated on March 16, 2016.


	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	22



	 







	 




	 




	NOTE 13: SUBSEQUENT EVENTS


	 


	There are no subsequent events required to be disclosed in the
	Notes to Financial Statements through the date of the report, except as follows:


	 


	In February 2017, The Company debt holders converted $3,772,000
	of notes being converted at 0.05 per share into 75,440,000 shares of common stock.


	 


	February 28, 2017, the Company entered
	into an agreement with a two non-affiliated persons to provide $1.6 million of short term secured debt financing in three monthly
	tranches. The Company will issue in connection with each tranche, a six-month secured convertible promissory note. In connection
	with this transaction, the Company agreed to issue an origination fee of 1,600,000 shares of restricted common stock. Alexander
	Capital L.P. acted as Placement Agent and Advisor for this transaction.


	 




	In February 2017, the Company
	reported that all of its Series AA preferred stock and substantially all of its outstanding debt both secured and unsecured
	(approximately $12.1 million) have been converted into equity securities of the Company as outlined below. It should be noted
	that the capital transactions below were based on a premium to the average closing sale price of $0.045 per share during the
	60 day period prior to February 08, 2017. The Company had outstanding 1,118,538 shares of newly designated Series AAA
	preferred stock and $1,350,000 of convertible notes. The convertible notes consist of $1,200,000 of secured notes and $150,000 of
	unsecured notes. Of the 1,118,538 shares of Series AAA preferred stock outstanding, 240,000 Series AA preferred stock with
	an original cost basis of $2.4 million were converted into Series AAA preferred stock. The remaining 878,538 shares of Series
	AAA preferred stock were issued in exchange for the conversion of principal and accrued interest of approximately $8,7855,380
	of unsecured debt. The terms of the Series AAA preferred stock can be summarized as follows:


	 


	The price of each preferred share may be
	convertible into common stock with an equivalent purchase price of $.10 per common share. If the preferred shares are converted,
	the subscriber will then receive 100% warrant coverage, with each warrant exercisable at $.05 per share with a cash payment to
	the Company through the close of business on December 31, 2019. The preferred shares have no voting or other preferences except
	as required by law other than the right of conversion described above and a liquidation preference equal to $.01 per share.


	 


	Thomas Arnost, our Executive Vice Chairman,
	and another principal stockholder agreed to convert letters of credit in the principal amount of $2,700,000 and $322,000 of secured
	debt into shares of common stock at the then marketing price of $.05 per share. Accrued interest on these obligations were either
	previously converted into our common stock or were upon conversion of the principal, converted into common stock at the fair market
	value of our common stock at each interest accrual date.


	 


	In April 2017, Michael Trepeta entered
	into a separation agreement with the Company pursuant to which he resigned as an executive officer and director. There is currently
	a vacancy in the Board of Directors of the Company. After his resignation, the Board changed Dean Julia’s title from Co-Chief
	Executive Officer to Chief Executive Officer.


	 




	Pursuant to Michael Trepeta’s separation
	agreement, Mr. Trepeta is entitled to the following benefits:


	 







	·



	Six months’ coverage under the Company’s existing director/officer insurance policy;









	·



	Indemnification per existing employment agreement;









	·



	Expense reimbursement through May 31, 2017;









	·



	All options vested shall continue until their normal expiration date; and









	·



	Mutual releases.






	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 








	 


	F-

	23



	 










	 




	 




	Item 9.



	Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on
	Accounting and Financial Disclosure

	.


	 


	Not applicable.



	 




	Item 9A.



	Controls and Procedures

	.


	 


	Under the supervision
	and with the participation of our management, including the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, we have evaluated
	the effectiveness of our disclosure controls and procedures as required by Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(b) as of the end of the period
	covered by this report. Based on that evaluation, the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer have concluded that these
	disclosure controls and procedures are not effective.


	 



	Report of Management on Internal Control over Financial Reporting




	 



	Our management is responsible
	for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting for the Company. Internal control over financial
	reporting is a process to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of our financial reporting for external purposes
	in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Internal control over financial reporting
	includes maintaining records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect our transactions; providing reasonable assurance
	that transactions are recorded as necessary for preparation of our financial statements; providing reasonable assurance that receipts
	and expenditures of company assets are made in accordance with management authorization; and providing reasonable assurance that
	unauthorized acquisition, use or disposition of company assets that could have a material effect on our financial statements would
	be prevented or detected on a timely basis. Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting is not
	intended to provide absolute assurance that a misstatement of our financial statements would be prevented or detected.


	 


	A material weakness
	is a deficiency, or combination of deficiencies, in internal control over financial reporting, such that there is a reasonable
	possibility that a material misstatement of our company’s annual or interim financial statements will not be prevented or
	detected on a timely basis. In its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting as of December
	31, 2016, our company determined that there were control deficiencies that constituted material weaknesses, as described below:


	 


	We did not maintain
	appropriate financial reporting controls

	 

	– As of December 31, 2016, our company has not maintained sufficient
	internal controls over financial reporting for the financial reporting process. As at December 31, 2016, our company did not
	have sufficient financial reporting controls with respect to timely financial reporting and the ability to process complex accounting
	issues such as debt conversions. Subsequent to December 31, 2016, our company has obtained the necessary assistance to ensure
	that the performance of complex accounting issues can be performed accurately and on a timely basis.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	30



	 







	 




	 


	Management conducted
	an evaluation of the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting based on the framework in

	Internal Control
	– Integrated Framework

	issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. Based on this
	evaluation, management concluded that the company’s internal control over financial reporting was not effective as of December 31,
	2016. There were no significant changes in our internal control over financial reporting during the year ended December 31,
	2016 that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting.
	Our independent auditors have not audited and are not required to audit this assessment of our internal control over financial
	reporting for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2016.



	 




	Item 9B. 



	Other Information

	.


	 


	In April 2017, Michael
	Trepeta entered into a separation agreement with the Company pursuant to which he resigned as an executive officer and director.
	There is currently a vacancy in the Board of Directors of the Company. After his resignation, the Board changed Dean Julia’s
	title from Co-Chief Executive Officer to Chief Executive Officer.


	 


	Pursuant to Michael
	Trepeta’s separation agreement, Mr. Trepeta is entitled to the following benefits:


	 







	·



	Six months’ coverage under the Company’s existing director/officer insurance policy;









	·



	Indemnification per existing employment agreement;









	·



	Expense reimbursement through May 31, 2017;









	·



	All options vested shall continue until their normal expiration date; and









	·



	Mutual releases.





	 




	 




	 




	 











	 



	31



	 









	 





	 






	PART III




	 





	Item 10.



	Directors, Executive Officers
	and Corporate Governance



	 


	Our executive officers and directors and
	their respective ages and positions as of the date of this Form 10-K are:


	 






	NAME (1) (2)


	 


	AGE


	 


	 


	POSITION




	Executive Officers:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Thomas Arnost


	 


	 


	69


	 


	 


	Executive Chairman of the Board




	Dean L. Julia


	 


	 


	48


	 


	 


	Chief Executive Officer/Treasurer/Director/Co-Founder




	Paul Bauersfeld


	 


	 


	53


	 


	 


	Chief Technology Officer




	Sean J. McDonnell, CPA


	 


	 


	55


	 


	 


	Chief Financial Officer




	Sean Trepeta


	 


	 


	48


	 


	 


	President of Mobiquity Networks and director





	 


	Directors are elected
	at the annual meeting of stockholders and hold office until the following annual meeting. The terms of all officers expire at the
	annual meeting of directors following the annual stockholders meeting. Officers serve at the pleasure of our board of directors
	and may be removed, either with or without cause, by our board of directors, and a successor elected by a majority vote of our
	board of directors, at any time. Nevertheless, the foregoing are subject to the employment contracts of our executive officers.


	 




	Executive Officers






	 






	Thomas Arnost


	. Mr. Arnost
	has been a director of our company since December 2011, he has served as Chairman of the Board since October 2013 and he has served
	as Executive Chairman of the Board since October 2014. Mr. Arnost served as the Co-President of Univision Television Group, from
	1997 to 2006, and prior to that as Executive Vice President of Univision Television Group from 1994 to 1996. Previously he served
	as the Co-President of Univision Communications, Inc. Station Group, which he joined in 1994. In 2002, Mr. Arnost helped in the
	successful launch of the Telefutura Station Group which has since significantly contributed to Univision's overall growth. During
	his tenure with Univision, total station group revenue grew from under $120 million in 1993 to approximately $700 million in 2006.
	Also during his tenure, Univision’s market value grew from roughly $500 million to over $14 billion. Mr. Arnost’s extensive
	business, financial, management and leadership experience in the telecommunications industry particularly qualifies him for serving
	on the company’s board as an independent director. Mr. Arnost graduated from the University of Arizona with a BS in Finance.


	 




	Dean L. Julia

	.

	Mr. Julia
	has served as Chief Executive Officer of Mobiquity since December 2000 and as Co-CEO since March 2012. In 1998, Mr. Julia co-founded
	Mobiquity and became an officer, director and principal stockholder of our company. Mr. Julia is responsible for establishing our
	overall strategy and fostering key relationships with technology partners and developers. Mr. Julia has also served as COO of Mobiquity’s
	wholly-owned subsidiary, Mobiquity Networks since its formation in January 2011, where he is responsible for the integration of
	the sales and intellectual property departments of Mobiquity. From September 1996 through February 1998, Mr. Julia served as President
	and Chief Executive Officer of DLJ Consulting, a financial intermediary consultant for public and private companies. Mr. Julia
	is a founder of our company and has served on the board since its inception. He is expected to resign from the board on the listing
	date of our common stock on the NYSE MKT. Mr. Julia received his Bachelor of Business Administration from Hofstra University in
	1990.


	 




	Paul Bauersfeld


	. Mr. Bauersfeld
	has served as Chief Technology Officer of our company since June 2013. Mr. Bauersfeld is a technology executive and engineer with
	over 20 years’ experience in software product development and entrepreneurial organizations. In 2003, Mr. Bauersfeld founded
	Varsity Networks, a leading online media and services company dedicated to serving the local sports market through technology.
	He served as CEO of Varsity Networks from its formation through 2013, where he was responsible for expanding the network to include
	over 10,000 local sports communities with millions of monthly visitors. Prior to his positions at Varsity Network, he held positions
	at a number of Fortune 100 and startup companies in the technology and media industries. Mr. Bauersfeld has also acted as an advisor
	to a number of technology developmental corporations. His roles have included Co-founder and CEO of MessageOne from 2000 to 2001,
	which enterprise was later acquired by Dell Computer Corp., VP of ecommerce at Ziff-Davis from 1999 to 2000, Technology Director
	at Viacom’s Nickelodeon Online from 1997 to 1999, Founder of GiftOne in 1996, where he served in the position of President,
	which entity was acquired by Skymall 1997, as well as engineering positions at Apple Computer from 1998 to 1993 and Xerox Corporation
	from 1986 to 1988. He has a BS in Electrical Engineering from Rochester Institute of Technology, which degree he received in 1986.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	32



	 







	 




	 




	Sean J. McDonnell, CPA


	. Mr.
	McDonnell has been our Chief Financial Officer since January 2005. Since January 1990, Mr. McDonnell has also owned and operated
	a private accounting and tax practice handling many different types of business entities and associations. Mr. McDonnell has spent
	much of his time helping his customers grow their companies and acquire financing for the purchase of buildings and equipment.
	Prior to starting his own practice, he was employed from 1985 through 1990 as a senior staff member at the accounting firm of Breiner
	& Bodian CPA's. After graduating from Dowling College in 1984 with a Bachelor in Business Administration, he was employed by
	Kenneth Silver C.P.A. from 1984 to 1985. Mr. McDonnell has been a certified public accountant for almost 20 years.


	 




	Sean Trepeta


	. Mr. Trepeta
	has been a director of our company since December 2011. Mr. Trepeta is also serving as President of Mobiquity Networks, where he
	is responsible for sales and marketing strategies. Mr. Trepeta continues to foster strategic relationships with agencies and national
	brands. Prior to joining the Mobiquity Networks team in May 2011, Mr. Trepeta was President of Varsity Networks, a leading online
	portal dedicated to serving the High School sports market, from 2007 to 2011. Prior to this, from 1998 to 2007, Mr. Trepeta was
	the President and Co-Founder of OPEX Communications, Inc., a leading telecommunication service provider which was located in Chicago,
	specializing in traditional long-distance, wireless, and dedicated services. Before OPEX, from 1996 to 1998, Mr. Trepeta was the
	vice president of sales and marketing for the US Buying Group, Inc. (USBG) responsible for developing a small business-buying program,
	which included value added services such as overnight shipping, office supplies, and computer software products, as well as a full
	line of telecommunications services. Mr. Trepeta also developed and implemented the agent and carrier divisions of USBG. Prior
	to joining USBG, he was with MCI Telecommunications and NYNEX in New York City. As Mr. Trepeta holds a Bachelor of Science degree
	from the State University of New York at Cortland. Mr. Trepeta is expected to resign from the board on the listing date of our
	common stock on the NYSE MKT. Mr. Trepeta is the brother of Michael Trepeta.


	 



	Corporate Governance




	 



	Our business, property
	and affairs are managed by, or under the direction of, our Board, in accordance with the General Corporation Law of the State of
	New York and our By-Laws. Members of the Board are kept informed of our business through discussions with the Chief Executive Officers
	and other key members of management, by reviewing materials provided to them by management.


	 


	We continue to review
	our corporate governance policies and practices by comparing our policies and practices with those suggested by various groups
	or authorities active in evaluating or setting best practices for corporate governance of public companies. Based on this review,
	we have adopted, and will continue to adopt, changes that the Board believes are the appropriate corporate governance policies
	and practices for our Company. We have adopted changes and will continue to adopt changes, as appropriate, to comply with the Sarbanes-Oxley
	Act of 2002 and subsequent rule changes made by the SEC and any applicable securities exchange.


	 



	Director Qualifications and Diversity




	 



	The board seeks independent
	directors who represent a diversity of backgrounds and experiences that will enhance the quality of the board’s deliberations
	and decisions. Candidates shall have substantial experience with one or more publicly traded companies or shall have achieved a
	high level of distinction in their chosen fields. The board is particularly interested in maintaining a mix that includes individuals
	who are active or retired executive officers and senior executives, particularly those with experience in the finance and capital
	market industries.


	 


	In evaluating nominations
	to the Board of Directors, our Board also looks for certain personal attributes, such as integrity, ability and willingness to
	apply sound and independent business judgment, comprehensive understanding of a director’s role in corporate governance,
	availability for meetings and consultation on Company matters, and the willingness to assume and carry out fiduciary responsibilities.
	Qualified candidates for membership on the Board will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, sex, ancestry, national
	origin or disability.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	33



	 







	 




	 



	Risk Oversight




	 



	Enterprise risks are
	identified and prioritized by management and each prioritized risk is assigned to the full board for oversight. These risks include,
	without limitation, the following:


	 


	Risks and exposures
	associated with strategic, financial and execution risks and other current matters that may present material risk to our operations,
	plans, prospects or reputation.


	 


	Risks and exposures
	associated with financial matters, particularly financial reporting, tax, accounting, disclosure, internal control over financial
	reporting, financial policies, investment guidelines and credit and liquidity matters.


	 


	Risks and exposures
	relating to corporate governance; and management and director succession planning.


	 


	Risks and exposures
	associated with leadership assessment, and compensation programs and arrangements, including incentive plans.


	 



	Board Leadership Structure




	 



	In accordance with
	the Company's By-Laws, the Chairman of the Board, Thomas Arnost, presides at all meetings of the Board. Currently, the offices
	of Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Officer are separated, although the Company has no fixed policy with respect to the
	separation of these titles. The Chairman of the Board is a non-executive officer of the Company.


	 



	Indemnification




	 



	The New York Business
	Corporation Law contains provisions permitting and, in some situations, requiring New York corporations to provide indemnification
	to their officers and directors for losses and litigation expense incurred in connection with their service to the corporation.
	Our certificate of incorporation and bylaws contain provisions requiring our indemnification of our directors and officers and
	other persons acting in their corporate capacities.


	 


	In addition, we may
	enter into agreements with our directors providing contractually for indemnification consistent with the certificate of incorporation
	and bylaws. Currently, we have no such agreements. The New York Business Corporation Law also authorizes us to purchase insurance
	for our directors and officers insuring them against risks as to which we may be unable lawfully to indemnify them. We intend to
	obtain limited insurance coverage for our officers and directors as well as insurance coverage to reimburse us for potential costs
	of our corporate indemnification of officers and directors.


	 


	As far as exculpation
	or indemnification for liabilities arising under the Securities Act of 1933 may be permitted for directors and officers and controlling
	persons, we have been advised that in the opinion of the Securities and Exchange Commission such exculpation or indemnification
	is against public policy as expressed in the Act and is, therefore, unenforceable.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	34



	 







	 




	 



	LACK OF COMMITTEES



	 


	Our Company has no
	audit, compensation or nominating committees of our board of directors or committees performing similar functions. The audit committee
	communications will go directly to the board members until such time as an audit committee is formed.


	 


	Under the National
	Association of Securities Dealers Automated Quotations definition, an “independent director” means a person other than
	an officer or employee of the Company or its subsidiaries or any other individuals having a relationship that, in the opinion of
	the Company’s board of directors, would interfere with the exercise of independent judgment in carrying out the responsibilities
	of the director. The board’s discretion in determining director independence is not completely unfettered. Further, under
	the NASDAQ definition, an independent director is a person who (1) is not currently (or whose immediate family members are not
	currently), and has not been over the past three years (or whose immediate family members have not been over the past three years),
	employed by the company; (2) has not (or whose immediate family members have not) been paid more than $120,000 during the current
	or past three fiscal years;  (3) has not (or whose immediately family has not) been a partner in or controlling shareholder
	or executive officer of an organization which the company made, or from which the company received, payments in excess of the greater
	of $200,000 or 5% of that organizations consolidated gross revenues, in any of the most recent three fiscal years; (4) has not
	(or whose immediate family members have not), over the past three years been employed as an executive officer of a company in which
	an executive officer of Mobiquity has served on that company’s compensation committee; or (5) is not currently (or whose
	immediate family members are not currently), and has not been over the past three years (or whose immediate family members have
	not been over the past three years) a partner of Mobiquity’s outside auditor.


	  


	The term “Financial
	Expert” is defined under the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, as amended, as a person who has the following attributes: an understanding
	of generally accepted accounting principles and financial statements; has the ability to assess the general application of such
	principles in connection with the accounting for estimates, accruals and reserves; experience preparing, auditing, analyzing or
	evaluating financial statements that present a breadth and level of complexity of accounting issues that are generally comparable
	to the breadth and complexity of issues that can reasonably be expected to be raised by the company’s financial statements,
	or experience actively supervising one or more persons engaged in such activities; an understanding of internal controls and procedures
	for financial reporting; and an understanding of audit committee functions.


	 


	The Company may in
	the future form an audit committee to consist of one or more independent directors. In the event an audit committee is established,
	of which there can be no assurances given, its first responsibility would be to adopt a written charter. Such charter would be
	expected to include, among other things:


	 




	 



	·




	being directly responsible for the appointment, compensation and oversight of our independent auditor, which shall report directly to the audit committee, including resolution of disagreements between management and the auditors regarding financial reporting for the purpose of preparing or issuing an audit report or related work;





	 




	 



	·




	annually reviewing and reassessing the adequacy of the committee’s formal charter;





	 




	 



	·




	reviewing the annual audited financial statements with our management and the independent auditors and the adequacy of our internal accounting controls;





	 




	 



	·




	reviewing analyses prepared by our management and independent auditors concerning significant financial reporting issues and judgments made in connection with the preparation of our financial statements;





	 




	 



	·




	reviewing the independence of the independent auditors;





	 




	 



	·




	reviewing our auditing and accounting principles and practices with the independent auditors and reviewing major changes to our auditing and accounting principles and practices as suggested by the independent auditor or its management;





	 




	 



	·




	reviewing all related party transactions on an ongoing basis for potential conflict of interest situations; and





	 




	 



	·




	all responsibilities given to the audit committee by virtue of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, which was signed into law by President George W. Bush on July 30, 2002.





	 


	 


	 








	 



	35



	 







	 




	 




	LACK OF INDEPENDENT DIRECTORS


	 


	Currently, the Company
	has four directors, each of which are members of management. Accordingly, the Company has no independent directors at the current
	time.


	 


	CODE OF ETHICS


	 


	The Company has a new
	code of ethics that applies to the Company's directors and officers which has been designed to deter wrongdoing and to promote:


	 




	 



	·




	Honest and ethical conduct, including the ethical handling of actual or apparent conflicts of interest between personal and professional relationships;





	 




	 



	·




	Full, fair, accurate, timely and understandable disclosure in reports and documents that the Company files with, or submits to, the SEC and in other public communications made by the Company;





	 




	 



	·




	Compliance with applicable governmental law, rules and regulations;





	 




	 



	·




	The prompt internal reporting of violations of the code of ethics to an appropriate pre-identified person; and





	 




	 



	·




	Accountability for adherence to the code of ethics.





	 


	A copy of the Code
	of Ethics was filed as Exhibit 14 to our Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2014.


	 


	COMPLIANCE WITH SECTION 16(A) OF THE EXCHANGE ACT


	 


	Section 16(a) of the Securities Exchange
	Act of 1934, as amended, requires our officers and directors, and persons who own more than ten percent of a registered class of
	our equity securities, to file reports of ownership and changes in ownership with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission").
	Officers, directors and greater than ten percent stockholders are required by the Commission's regulations to furnish us with copies
	of all Section 16(a) forms they file. During fiscal 2016, to the best of the knowledge of the Company’s directors and officers,
	no form 3’s or form 4’s or form 5’s were filed late with the Commission by officers or directors, except that
	Tom Arnost made Form 4 late filings.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	36



	 








	 




	 




	Item 11.



	Executive Compensation

	.


	 


	The following table sets forth the overall
	compensation earned over the fiscal years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015 by (1) each person who served as the principal
	executive officer of the company during fiscal year 2016 and 2015; (2) the Company’s most highly compensated (up to a maximum
	of two) executive officers as of December 31, 2016 and 2015 with compensation during fiscal years 2016 and 2015 of $100,000 or
	more; and (3) those two individuals, if any, who would have otherwise been in included in section (2) above but for the fact that
	they were not serving as an executive of the company as of December 31, 2016.





	 








	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 





	Salary Compensation





	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 







	Name and Principal





	 




	 




	 




	 





	Salary





	 




	 





	Bonus





	 




	 





	Stock





	 




	 





	Option Awards





	 




	 





	Non-Equity Incentive Plan Compensation





	 




	 





	Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Earnings





	 




	 





	All Other Compensation





	 




	 





	Total





	 







	Position





	 





	Year





	 




	 





	($)





	 




	 





	($)





	 




	 





	Awards





	 




	 





	($)(1)





	 




	 





	($)





	 




	 





	($)





	 




	 





	($)(2)(3)





	 




	 





	($)





	 






	Dean L. Julia




	 




	 




	2016




	 




	 




	$




	360,000




	 




	 




	$




	-




	 




	 




	 




	    –




	 




	 




	$




	-




	 




	 




	 




	       –




	 




	 




	 




	       –




	 




	 




	$




	32,596




	 




	 




	$




	392,596




	 






	Co-CEO of the company




	 




	 




	2015




	 




	 




	$




	360,914




	 




	 




	$




	–




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	$




	149,950




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	$




	57,866




	 




	 




	$




	568,730




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Michael D. Trepeta




	 




	 




	2016




	 




	 




	$




	300,000




	 




	 




	$




	-




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	$




	-




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	$




	38,625




	 




	 




	$




	338,625




	 






	Co-CEO of the company




	 




	 




	2015




	 




	 




	$




	360,592




	 




	 




	$




	–




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	$




	149,950




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	$




	53,793




	 




	 




	$




	564,335




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Sean Trepeta




	 




	 




	2016




	 




	 




	$




	240,000




	 




	 




	$




	–




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	$




	-




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	$




	26,746




	 




	 




	$




	266,746




	 






	President of Mobiquity Networks




	 




	 




	2015




	 




	 




	$




	240,000




	 




	 




	$




	–




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	$




	27,900




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	$




	24,804




	 




	 




	$




	292,704




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Paul Bauersfeld




	 




	 




	2016




	 




	 




	$




	300,000




	 




	 




	$




	–




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	$




	-




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	$




	26,746




	 




	 




	$




	326,746




	 






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Chief Technology Officer




	 




	 




	2015




	 




	 




	$




	301,737




	 




	 




	$




	–




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	$




	–




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	 




	–




	 




	 




	$




	27,028




	 




	 




	$




	328,765




	 





	 _____________








	(1)




	The options and restricted stock awards presented in this table for fiscal 2016 and 2015 reflect the full grant date fair value, as if the total dollar amount were earned in the year of grant. The stock awards are valued based on the fair market value of such Shares on the date of grant and are charged to compensation expense over the related vesting period. The options are valued at the date of grant based upon the Black-Scholes method of valuation, which is expensed over the service period over which the options become vested. As a general rule, for time-in-service-based options, the company will immediately expense any option or portion thereof which is vested upon grant, while expensing the balance on a pro rata basis over the remaining vesting term of the option.






	(2)




	Includes all other compensation not reported in the preceding columns, including (i) perquisites and other personal benefits, or property, unless the aggregate amount of such compensation is less than $10,000; (ii) any “gross-ups” or other amounts reimbursed during the fiscal year for the payment of taxes; (iii) discounts from market price with respect to securities purchased from the company except to the extent available generally to all security holders or to all salaried employees; (iv) any amounts paid or accrued in connection with any termination (including without limitation through retirement, resignation, severance or constructive termination, including change of responsibilities) or change in control; (v) contributions to vested and unvested defined contribution plans; (vi) any insurance premiums paid by, or on behalf of, the company relating to life insurance for the benefit of the named executive officer; and (vii) any dividends or other earnings paid on stock or option awards that are not factored into the grant date fair value required to be reported in a preceding column.






	(3)




	Includes compensation for service as a director described under Director Compensation, below.





	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	37



	 







	 




	For a description of the material terms
	of each named executive officers’ employment agreement, including the terms of the terms of any common share purchase option
	grants, see that section of this Form 10-K/

	A

	captioned “Employment Agreements.”


	 


	No outstanding common share purchase option
	or other equity-based award granted to or held by any named executive officer in the past three years were re-priced or otherwise
	materially modified, including extension of exercise periods, the change of vesting or forfeiture conditions, the change or elimination
	of applicable performance criteria, or the change of the bases upon which returns are determined, nor was there any waiver or modification
	of any specified performance target, goal or condition to payout, except as follows:


	 




	 



	·




	On December 19, 2014, we agreed to issue to Dean Julia and Michael Trepeta effective January 3, 2015, options to purchase 250,000 shares of our common stock at an exercise price of $.35 per share over a term of 10 years. These options were issued to replace a similar number of options exercisable at $1.00 per share due to expire on January 3, 2015.





	 




	 



	·




	In December 2015, the Board replaced Dean Julia’s and Michael Trepeta’s expiring options to purchase 200,000 shares at $1.20 per share with new six month options on the same terms.





	 


	For a description of the material terms
	of any contract, agreement, plan or other arrangement that provides for any payment to a named executive officer in connection
	with his or her resignation, retirement or other termination, or a change in control of the company see “Employment Agreements”.


	 



	Executive Officer Outstanding Equity
	Awards at Fiscal Year-End




	 



	The following table provides certain information
	concerning any common share purchase options, stock awards or equity incentive plan awards held by each of our named executive
	officers and Thomas Arnost that were outstanding as of December 31, 2016.


	  








	Option Awards




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Stock Awards




	 




	 




	Name




	 


	 


	 




	Number of




	Securities




	Underlying




	Unexercised




	Options(#)




	Exercisable




	 


	 


	 




	Number of




	Securities




	Underlying




	Unexercised




	Options(#)




	Unexercisable




	 


	 


	 




	Equity




	Incentive




	Plan




	Awards:




	Number of




	Securities




	Underlying




	Unexercised




	Unearned




	Options (#)




	 


	 


	 




	Option




	Exercise




	Price ($)




	 


	 


	 




	Option





	Expiration Date




	 


	 


	 




	Number of




	Shares or




	Units of




	Stock




	That




	Have Not




	Vested




	(#)




	 


	 


	 




	Market




	Value of




	Shares




	or




	Units of




	Stock That




	Have




	Not




	Vested




	 


	 


	 




	Equity




	Incentive




	Plan




	Awards:




	Number




	of




	Unearned




	Shares,




	Units or




	Other




	Rights




	That




	Have




	Not




	Vested




	 


	 


	 




	Equity




	Incentive Plan




	Awards:




	Market or




	Payout Value




	of




	Unearned




	Shares, Units or




	Other Rights




	That Have Not




	Vested




	 




	 



	Dean



	 


	 


	 


	250,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.35


	 


	 


	 



	12/19/24



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 



	L.



	 


	 


	 


	200,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	1.20


	 


	 


	 



	06/28/16



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 



	Julia



	 


	 


	 


	150,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	1.20


	 


	 


	 



	08/22/17



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	(1)


	 


	 


	 


	50,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.38


	 


	 


	 



	03/01/18



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	50,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.65


	 


	 


	 



	03/02/19



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	50,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.54


	 


	 


	 



	03/25/20



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	200,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.50


	 


	 


	 



	04/07/20



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.26


	 


	 


	 



	02/28/21



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.63


	 


	 


	 



	02/28/22



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	50,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.25


	 


	 


	 



	02/13/23



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.45


	 


	 


	 



	04/01/23



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	1,500,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.30


	 


	 


	 



	01/17/24



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.59


	 


	 


	 



	03/03/24



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	250,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.50


	 


	 


	 



	07/16/24



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.30


	 


	 


	 



	04/22/25



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.59


	 


	 


	 



	03/03/24



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.32


	 


	 


	 



	03/01/25



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 



	Michael



	 


	 


	 


	250,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.35


	 


	 


	 



	12/19/24



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 



	D.



	 


	 


	 


	200,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	1.20


	 


	 


	 



	06/28/16



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 



	Trepeta



	 


	 


	 


	150,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	1.20


	 


	 


	 



	08/22/17



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	50,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.38


	 


	 


	 



	03/01/18



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	50,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.65


	 


	 


	 



	03/02/19



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	50,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.54


	 


	 


	 



	03/25/20



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	200,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.50


	 


	 


	 


	04/07/20


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.26


	 


	 


	 



	02/28/21



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.63


	 


	 


	 



	02/28/22



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	50,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.25


	 


	 


	 



	02/13/23



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.45


	 


	 


	 



	04/01/23



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	1,500,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.30


	 


	 


	 



	01/17/24



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.59


	 


	 


	 



	03/03/24



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	250,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.50


	 


	 


	 



	07/16/24



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.30


	 


	 


	 



	04/22/25



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.59


	 


	 


	 



	03/03/24



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	$


	.32


	 


	 


	 



	03/01/25



	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 





	 


	 


	 








	 



	38



	 







	 




	 






	 


	 


	 


	Option Awards


	 


	 


	 


	 


	Stock Awards




	Name


	 


	 




	Number of




	Securities




	Underlying




	Unexercised




	Options(#)




	Exercisable




	 


	 




	Number of




	Securities




	Underlying




	Unexercised




	Options(#)




	Unexercisable




	 


	 




	Equity




	Incentive




	Plan




	Awards:




	Number of




	Securities




	Underlying




	Unexercised




	Unearned




	Options (#)




	 


	 




	Option




	Exercise




	Price ($)




	 


	 


	Option

	Expiration Date


	 




	Number of




	Shares or




	Units of




	Stock




	That




	Have Not




	Vested




	(#)




	 


	 




	Market




	Value of




	Shares




	or




	Units of




	Stock That




	Have




	Not




	Vested




	 


	 




	Equity




	Incentive




	Plan




	Awards:




	Number




	of




	Unearned




	Shares,




	Units or




	Other




	Rights




	That




	Have




	Not




	Vested




	 


	 




	Equity




	Incentive Plan




	Awards:




	Market or




	Payout Value




	of




	Unearned




	Shares, Units or




	Other Rights




	That Have Not




	Vested






	 



	Sean



	 


	 


	 


	50,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.75


	 


	 


	05/07/22


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 



	Trepeta



	 


	 


	 


	50,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.25


	 


	 


	02/13/23


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 



	(1) (2)



	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.59


	 


	 


	03/03/24


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	125,000


	 


	 


	 


	1,375,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.50


	 


	 


	12/19/24


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.30


	 


	 


	04/22/25


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 



	Thomas



	 


	 


	 


	250,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.50


	 


	 


	07/16/24


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 



	Arnost



	 


	 


	 


	125,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.45


	 


	 


	07/08/19


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.59


	 


	 


	03/01/24


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	250,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.40


	 


	 


	12/13/23


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	50,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.75


	 


	 


	05/07/22


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	50,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.25


	 


	 


	02/13/23


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	200,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.60


	 


	 


	12/20/16


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	125,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.43


	 


	 


	10/07/19


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	125,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.35


	 


	 


	01/07/20


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	125,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.30


	 


	 


	04/06/20


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	125,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.25


	 


	 


	07/06/20


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	125,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.30


	 


	 


	10/06/20


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.30


	 


	 


	04/20/25


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	125,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.1835


	 


	 


	01/27/21


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	-




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	125,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.1125


	 


	 


	04/07/21


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	-




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	125,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	$


	.1085






	 


	07/07/21


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	125,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.04


	 


	 


	10/07/21


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 



	Paul



	 


	 


	 


	500,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.45


	 


	 


	06/11/18


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 



	Bauresfeld



	 


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.59


	 


	 


	03/03/24


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 


	(1)


	 


	 


	 


	1,000,000


	 


	 


	 


	1,000,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.50


	 


	 


	07/15/19


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	500,000


	 


	 


	 


	500,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.50


	 


	 


	12/19/24


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 



	Sean



	 


	 


	 


	50,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	$


	.35


	 


	 


	12/19/24


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 



	McDonnell



	 


	 


	 


	250,000


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	.50


	 


	 


	01/17/24


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	–




	 


	(3)


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	________________






	(1)




	All options contain cashless exercise provisions.






	(2)




	Sean Trepeta owns warrants to purchase 150,001 shares at $.50 per share which are not granted under a compensation plan, which warrants he purchased from the company as part of a private placement offering which was primarily sold to non-affiliated persons.






	(3)




	Sean McDonnell owns warrants to purchase 83,334 shares at $.50 per share which are not granted under a compensation plan, which warrants he purchased from the company as part of a private placement offering which was primarily sold to non-affiliated persons.





	 


	 




	 





	 




	 











	 



	39



	 







	 





	 




	Employment Agreement of Executive Chairman




	 



	In December 2014, we entered into a three-year
	employment agreement with Thomas Arnost serving as Executive Chairman of the board. Mr. Arnost receives a monthly salary of $10,000
	plus an annual grant of options for serving on the board of directors. In the event of his termination, by Mr. Arnost or by the
	company for cause, Mr. Arnost will receive his pay through the termination date. In the event that, Mr. Arnost is terminated
	without cause, he shall be entitled to receive his salary paid through the end of the term of his agreement. Mr. Arnost may terminate
	the agreement at any time by giving three months prior written notice to our board of directors. Mr. Arnost will also be entitled
	to indemnification against all claims, judgments, damages, liabilities, costs and expenses (including reasonably legal fees) arising
	out of, based upon or related to his performance of services to us, to the maximum extent permitted by law.



	  






	Employment Agreements of Co-Chief Executive Officers




	 



	Each of the following executive
	officers is a party to an employment agreement with the company as of December 31, 2016.


	 




	Name


	 


	Position


	 


	Monthly Salary (1)


	 


	 


	Bonus


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Dean L. Julia


	 


	Chief Executive Officer


	 


	$


	30,000


	 


	 


	 


	(2


	)




	Michael Trepeta (3)


	 


	Former Co-Chief Executive

	Officer


	 


	$


	30,000


	 


	 


	 


	(2


	)





	 


	________________





	(1)




	Compensation of each executive officer named in the table above has his monthly base salary increased by $2,000 each subsequent March 1st during the term of the agreement and any extensions thereof. Each officer has deferred their March 1, 2015, 2016 and 2017 salary increase of $2,000 per month, which deferral can change on demand of the respective executive.






	(2)


	(3)




	Annual bonuses are paid by us by the last
	business day of March for the preceding calendar (fiscal) year, except in the event of termination prior to the end of any fiscal
	year (other than termination for cause), a pro rata portion of the annual bonus shall be paid within 30 days of termination. In
	2013, we approved amending the employment agreements of Messrs. Julia and Trepeta to provide that each officer may choose an annual
	bonus equal to 5% of pre-tax earnings for the most recently completed year before deduction of annual bonuses paid to officers
	or, in the event majority control of the company is acquired by a person or a group of persons during the prior fiscal year, the
	officer may choose to receive the aforementioned bonus or 1% of the control consideration paid by acquirer(s) to acquire majority
	control of the company.


	Since November 1, 2016, Mr. Trepeta has
	been on medical leave from the Company without the approval of the board of directors of the Company. During this time period,
	no salaries have been paid to or accrued for his benefit.





	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	40



	 







	 




	A summary of each Executive’s employment
	agreement, as amended, is as follows:


	 


	Each executive’s employment agreement
	has a term of five years and automatically renews for a period of one year thereafter effective on March 1

	st

	of each
	new calendar year unless the employment agreement is terminated in accordance with its terms on or prior to December 30

	th

	of the prior calendar year. As of January 1, 2016, each executive’s employment agreement currently expires on February 28,
	2021. Each executive may terminate his employment agreement upon written three-month notice.  In such event, we shall
	be relieved of all of our obligations under the agreement, except for payment of the executive’s base salary and annual bonus
	earned and unpaid through the effective date of termination, those obligations with respect to indemnification and director and
	officer insurance and severance pay as described below.


	 


	We may terminate the Executive’s
	employment for cause as defined in each agreement. In the event the employment agreement is terminated for cause, the executive’s
	base salary and any unearned annual bonus, severance pay and all benefits shall terminate immediately upon such discharge, and
	we shall have no further obligations to the executive except for payment and reimbursement for any monies due which right to payment
	or reimbursement accrued prior to such termination.


	 


	We may terminate the employment agreement
	upon the disability as defined in the agreement or death of the executive by giving written notice to the executive. In the case
	of disability, such termination will become effective immediately upon the giving of such notice unless otherwise specified by
	us. Upon any such termination, we shall be relieved of all our obligations under the executive’s employment, except for payment
	of the executive’s base salary and annual bonus earned and unpaid through the effective date of termination and severance
	pay.


	  


	In the event of termination by us of executive’s
	employment agreement without cause, then the executive shall be entitled to receive on the termination date termination pay of
	one-year base salary based upon the scheduled annual salary of each executive officer for the next contract year, plus the amount
	of bonuses paid or entitled to be paid to the executive for the current fiscal year or the preceding fiscal year, whichever is
	higher. In the event of termination, the executives will continue to receive all salary and benefits included in the employment
	agreement through the scheduled expiration date of said employment agreement prior to the acceleration of the termination date
	thereof.


	 


	We have agreed to defend and indemnify
	each Executive in his capacity as an officer against all claims, judgments, damages, liabilities, costs and expenses (including
	reasonable attorney’s fees) arising out of, based upon, or related to his performance of services to us, to the maximum extent
	permitted under law. We will also use our reasonable best efforts to include each Executive as an insured under all applicable
	directors’ and officers’ liability insurance policies maintained by us.


	 


	Each Executive is currently entitled to the following additional
	benefits:


	 




	 



	·




	$2,000 per month pay raise on each March 1 during the term of the Agreement and any extension thereof;





	 




	 



	·




	As an executive officer, the annual grant on March 1 of each year of ten-year stock options to purchase 100,000 shares at an exercise price equal to the then fair market value of our common stock as determined by our board of directors. As a director of the company, each Executive also receives as a board member the number of options granted annually to each other board member;





	 




	 



	·




	Election to our board of directors and during the term of employment, the board’s nomination for re-election to the board;





	 




	 



	·




	Paid disability insurance and term life insurance for the benefit of each Executive’s family in an amount fixed by our board of directors at a cost not to exceed $10,000 per annum;





	 




	 



	·




	Use of company automobile with all related costs paid for by us;





	 




	 



	·




	Health insurance; and





	 




	 



	·




	Right to participate in any pensions of our company.





	 


	 


	 








	 



	41



	 







	 




	 


	In the past, we agreed to compensate Dean
	Julia and Michael Trepeta with options to purchase Mobiquity Network Inc.’s common stock in the event such entity raised
	financing as a stand-alone enterprise for its operations. In order to terminate this arrangement, in January 2014, our board of
	directors approved an exchange of Mobiquity Network options previously issued Messrs. Julia and Trepeta for options to purchase
	1,500,000 shares of our common stock at the then fair market value of our common stock, under our 2009 Stock Option Plan as described
	below. As of December 31, 2016, our financial statements reflect accrued liabilities for salaries and other compensation items
	of $131,000 and $96,000 owed to Dean L. Julia and Michael Trepeta, respectively.


	 



	Employment Agreement – Paul Bauersfeld




	 



	In December 2014, we entered into an employment
	agreement with Paul Bauersfeld, our Chief Technology Officer, who is an employee at will. Mr. Bauersfeld, as a full-time employee,
	is to be paid a salary at the rate of $25,000 per month. Upon the execution of the agreement, he received 10-year options to purchase
	1,000,000 shares of our common stock vesting quarterly over a period of three years. For calendar 2015, he was entitled to a bonus
	of $125,000 upon revenues of Mobiquity Networks achieving a minimum of $6 million in revenues and a further bonus of $125,000 for
	a total of $250,000 at such time as Mobiquity Network’s revenues achieve a minimum of $12 million, it being understood that
	any revenues which do not have a 30% margin shall not count toward these totals. In fiscal 2015, Mr. Bauersfeld did not earn a
	bonus. The foregoing compensatory arrangements with Mr. Bauersfeld is in addition to the non-statutory stock options to purchase
	2,600,000 shares of our common stock previously granted to Mr. Bauersfeld. All options granted to Mr. Bauersfeld will become immediately
	vested in the event of a change of control of our company or sale of substantially all of our assets. In the event we terminate
	Mr. Bauersfeld without cause. Mr. Bauersfeld is entitled to receive six months’ severance pay. As of December 31, 2016, our
	financial statements reflect accrued liabilities for salaries owed to Mr. Bauersfeld of $95,000.


	 



	Employment Agreement – Sean Trepeta




	 



	In December 2014, Mobiquity Networks entered
	into an employment agreement with Sean Trepeta, to serve as President of Mobiquity Networks as an employee at will. Mr. Trepeta,
	as a full-time employee, is to be paid a salary at the rate of $20,000 per month. Upon the execution of the agreement, he received
	10-year options to purchase 1,500,000 shares of our common stock vesting quarterly over a period of three years. For calendar 2015,
	he was entitled to a bonus of $125,000 upon revenues of Mobiquity Networks achieving a minimum of $6 million in revenues and a
	further bonus of $125,000 for a total of $250,000 at such time as Mobiquity Network’s revenues achieve a minimum of $12 million,
	it being understood that any revenues which do not have a 30% margin shall not count toward these totals. For fiscal 2015, Mr.
	Trepeta did not earn any bonus. All options granted to Mr. Trepeta will become immediately vested in the event of a change in control
	of our Company or sale of substantially all of our assets. In the event we terminate Mr. Trepeta without cause, after six months
	of continued employment under the employment agreement, Mr. Trepeta is entitled to receive three months’ severance pay. As
	of December 31, 2016, our financial statements reflect accrued liabilities for salaries owed to Sean Trepeta of $67,500.


	 



	Employment Arrangements




	 



	Sean McDonnell, our Chief Financial Officer,
	is an employee at will and is currently receiving a salary of $132,000 per annum. As of December 31, 2016, our financial statements
	reflect accrued liabilities for salaries owed to Mr. McDonnell of $35,750.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	42



	 







	 




	 



	DIRECTOR COMPENSATION




	 



	Currently, all four directors of the Company
	are executive officers of the Company. Their compensation is described herein. In the event that the Company obtains non-executive/independent
	directors, it is anticipated that their compensation will include cash fees to attend board meetings and/or committee meetings
	and stock options in consideration of their services as a director.


	  



	Employee Benefit and Consulting Services
	Compensation Plans



	 


	On January 3, 2005, our company established
	an Employee Benefit and Consulting Services Compensation Plan (the “2005 Plan”) covering 2,000,000 shares, which 2005
	Plan was ratified by our stockholders in February 2005. On August 12, 2005, the company’s stockholders approved a 2,000,000
	share increase in the 2005 Plan to 4,000,000 shares. On August 28, 2009, the Board adopted the “2009 Plan” identical
	to the 2005 Plan with 4,000,000 shares under the 2009 Plan. In September 2013, the Company’s stockholders ratified a board
	amendment to increase the number of shares covered by the 2009 Plan to 10,000,000 shares. All references to “the Plans”
	include the 2005 Plan and 2009 Plan. As the 2005 and 2009 Plans are identical other than the number of shares covered by each Plan,
	it is the Company’s intention to first utilized the number of shares issuable (available) under the 2005 Plan prior to issuing
	shares under the 2009 Plan. In February 2015, the Board approved an increase in the number of shares covered by the 2009 Plan from
	10,000,000 shares to 20,000,000 shares, subject to stockholder approval within one year. However, since approval was not obtained
	within the requisite time period, the Board established a 2016 Plan covering 10,000,000 shares which is otherwise identical to
	the 2005 and 2009 Plans. All options granted under the 2009 Plan, which exceed the Plan limits, have been moved to the 2016 Plan.
	The 2005, 2009 and 2016 Plans are collectively herein referred to as the “Plan.”


	 




	Administration




	 


	Our board of directors administers the
	Plans, has the authority to determine and designate officers, employees, directors and consultants to whom awards shall be made
	and the terms, conditions and restrictions applicable to each award (including, but not limited to, the option price, any restriction
	or limitation, any vesting schedule or acceleration thereof, and any forfeiture restrictions). The board may, in its sole discretion,
	accelerate the vesting of awards.


	 




	Types of Awards




	 


	The Plans are designed to enable us to
	offer certain officers, employees, directors and consultants of us and our subsidiaries equity interests in us and other incentive
	awards in order to attract, retain and reward such individuals and to strengthen the mutuality of interests between such individuals
	and our stockholders.  In furtherance of this purpose, the Plans contain provisions for granting non-statutory stock
	options and incentive stock options and common stock awards.


	 



	Stock Options

	. A “stock option”
	is a contractual right to purchase a number of shares of common stock at a price determined on the date the option is granted.
	An incentive stock option is an option granted under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 to our employees with certain tax advantages
	to the grantee over non-statutory stock options. The option price per share of common stock purchasable upon exercise of a stock
	option and the time or times at which such options shall be exercisable shall be determined by the Board at the time of grant.
	Such option price in the case of incentive stock options shall not be less than 100% of the fair market value of the common stock
	on the date of grant and may be granted below fair market value in the case of non-statutory stock options. Incentive stock options
	granted to owners of 10% or more of our common stock must be granted at an exercise price of at least 110% of the fair market value
	of our common stock and may not have a term greater than five years. Also, the value of incentive options vesting to any employee
	cannot exceed $100,000 in any calendar year. The option price of our options must be paid in cash, money order, check or common
	stock of the company. The non-statutory stock options may also contain at the time of grant, at the discretion of the
	board, certain other cashless exercise provisions. These cashless exercise provisions are included in the currently outstanding
	non-statutory stock options granted by the board.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	43



	 







	 




	 


	Options shall be exercisable at the times
	and subject to the conditions determined by the Board at the date of grant, but no option may be exercisable more than ten years
	after the date it is granted. If the optionee ceases to be an employee of our company for any reason other than death, any incentive
	stock option exercisable on the date of the termination of employment may be exercised for a period of thirty days or until the
	expiration of the stated term of the option, whichever period is shorter. In the event of the optionee’s death, any incentive
	stock option exercisable at the date of death may be exercised by the legal heirs of the optionee from the date of death until
	the expiration of the stated term of the option or six months from the date of death, whichever event first occurs. In
	the event of disability of the optionee, any incentive stock options shall expire on the stated date that the Option would otherwise
	have expired or 12 months from the date of disability, whichever event first occurs. The termination and other provisions
	of a non-statutory stock option shall be fixed by the board of directors at the date of grant of each respective option.


	 



	Common Stock Award

	. Common stock
	awards are shares of common stock that will be issued to a recipient at the end of a restriction period, if any, specified by the
	board if he or she continues to be an employee, director or consultant of us. If the recipient remains an employee, director or
	consultant at the end of the restriction period, the applicable restrictions will lapse and we will issue a stock certificate representing
	such shares of common stock to the participant. If the recipient ceases to be an employee, director or consultant of us for any
	reason (including death, disability or retirement) before the end of the restriction period unless otherwise determined by the
	board, the restricted stock award will be terminated.


	 



	Awards



	 


	As of December 31, 2016, the Company has
	granted under the Plans a total of 13,700,001 options and outside the Plans a total of 4,615,000 options or a total of options
	to purchase 18,315,001 shares of the Company’s Common Stock with a weighted average exercise price of $.41 per share. The
	board has granted options with varying terms

	.




	 



	It is not possible to predict the individuals
	who will receive future awards under the Plans or outside the Plans or the number of shares of Common Stock covered by any future
	award because such awards are wholly within the discretion of the Board. The table below contains information as of December 31,
	2016 on the known benefits provided to certain persons and group of persons who own options under or outside the Plans.


	 








	 




	 



	Number of Shares


	Subject to Options



	 


	 




	Range of Exercise




	Price ($) per Share 




	 


	 




	Value of




	Unexercised




	Options at




	Dec. 31, 2016 (1)




	 




	Dean L. Julia, Co-CEO


	 


	 


	3,450,000


	 


	 


	 



	.25 – 1.20



	 


	 


	$


	–


	 




	Michael D. Trepeta, Co-CEO


	 


	 


	3,450,000


	 


	 


	 



	.25 – 1.20



	 


	 


	$


	–


	 




	Sean McDonnell, Chief Financial Officer


	 


	 


	300,000


	 


	 


	 



	.35 - .50



	 


	 


	$


	–


	 




	Sean Trepeta, President, Mobiquity Networks


	 


	 


	1,800,000


	 


	 


	 



	.25 - .75



	 


	 


	$



	–



	 




	Thomas Arnost, Executive Chairman


	 


	 


	1,350,000


	 


	 


	 



	.04 - .35



	 


	 


	$


	2,813


	 




	Paul Bauersfeld


	 


	 


	3,600,000


	 


	 


	 



	.45 -.59



	 


	 


	$


	–


	 




	Six Executive Officers as a group


	 


	 


	13,950,000


	 


	 


	 



	.25 – 1.20



	 


	 


	$


	–


	 




	Non-Executive Officer, Employees and Consultants


	 


	 


	4,365,000


	 


	 


	 



	.10 – 1.20



	 


	 


	$


	2,813


	 




	________________






	(1)




	Value is normally calculated by multiplying (a) the difference between the market value per share at period end (i.e. $.06_ based upon a last sale on (or the last trade date before) December 31, 2016) and the option exercise price by (b) the number of shares of Common Stock underlying the option.





	 




	In the past, the Company has granted certain
	employees and consultants, stock awards for services for the prior year with vesting to occur after the passage of an additional
	12 months. These awards totaled 45,000 Shares for 2008, subject to continued services with the Company through December 31, 2009.
	These awards totaled 51,000 Shares for 2009 subject to continued services with the Company through December 31, 2010. These awards
	totaled 105,000 Shares for 2010 subject to continued services with the Company through December 31, 2011. These awards totaled
	45,000 shares for 2011, subject to continued services with the Company through December 31, 2012. A total of 203,500 shares were
	issued under the 2005 Plan pursuant to the stock award program described above (net of cancellations). No stock awards were granted
	in fiscal 2012, fiscal 2013, 2014, 2015 and 2016.


	 




	Eligibility




	 


	Our officers, employees, directors and
	consultants of Mobiquity and our subsidiaries are eligible to be granted stock options, and common stock awards.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	44



	 







	 




	 




	Termination or Amendment of the Plans




	 


	The board may at any time amend, discontinue,
	or terminate all or any part of the Plans, provided, however, that unless otherwise required by law, the rights of a participant
	may not be impaired without his or her consent, and provided that we will seek the approval of our stockholders for any amendment
	if such approval is necessary to comply with any applicable federal or state securities laws or rules or regulations.



	  




	Item 12.



	Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners
	and Management and Related Stockholder Matters.





	 


	As of April 6, 2017,
	we have 185,201,768 shares of common stock outstanding. The only persons of record who presently hold or are known to own (or believed
	by the company to own) beneficially more than 5% of the outstanding shares of such class of stock is listed below. The following
	table also sets forth certain information as to holdings of our common stock of all officers and directors individually, and all
	officers and directors as a group. Shares of common stock which an individual or group has a right to acquire within 60 days pursuant
	to the exercise or conversion of options, warrants or other similar convertible or derivative securities are deemed to be outstanding
	for the purpose of computing the percentage ownership of such individual or group, but are not deemed to be outstanding for the
	purpose of computing the percentage ownership of any other person shown in the table.


	 






	Name and Address of Beneficial Owner (1)


	 


	Number of Common Shares


	 


	 


	Percentage (%)


	 




	Thomas Arnost (2)


	 


	 


	41,588,874


	 


	 


	 


	22.5


	 




	Michael D. Trepeta (3)


	 


	 


	4,466,402


	 


	 


	 


	2.4


	 




	Dean L. Julia (3)


	 


	 


	4,436,901


	 


	 


	 


	2.4


	 




	Sean Trepeta (4)


	 


	 


	2,950,001


	 


	 


	 


	1.6


	 




	Sean McDonnell (5)


	 


	 


	550,000


	 


	 


	 



	*



	 




	Paul Bauersfeld (6)


	 


	 


	3,700,000


	 


	 


	 


	2


	 




	All directors and officers as a group (six persons) (7)


	 


	 


	57,692,177


	 


	 


	 


	30.9


	 




	Clyde Berg/Carl Berg (8)


	 


	 


	76,925,101


	 


	 


	 


	41.5


	 




	____________



	*Represents less than 1%



	 






	(1)




	Beneficial ownership is determined in accordance with Rule 13d-3 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and is generally determined by voting powers and/or investment powers with respect to securities. Unless otherwise noted, all of such shares of common stock listed above are owned of record by each individual named as beneficial owner and such individual has sole voting and dispositive power with respect to the shares of common stock owned by each of them. Such person or entity’s percentage of ownership is determined by assuming that any options or convertible securities held by such person or entity, which are exercisable within sixty (60) days from the date hereof, have been exercised or converted as the case may be, but not for the purposes of determining the number of outstanding shares held by any other named beneficial owner. All addresses are c/o Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. 600 Old Country Road, Suite 541, Garden City, NY 11530.






	(2) 




	Includes 39,73,874 shares, warrants to purchase 500,000 shares and options to purchase 1,350,000 shares.






	(3)




	Mr. Trepeta’s beneficial ownership includes 1,016,402 shares and options to purchase 3,450,000 shares. Mr. Julia’s beneficial ownership includes 986,901 shares and options to purchase 3,450,000 shares.






	(4)




	Includes 1,000,000 shares and options/warrants to purchase 1,950,001 shares.






	(5)




	Includes 166,667 shares and options/warrants to purchase 383,333 shares.






	(6)




	Includes 100,000 shares and options to purchase 3,600,000 shares.






	(7)




	Includes all the securities referenced in notes (2) through (6).






	(8)




	Clyde Berg directly owns 4,966,667 shares
	and Berg & Berg Enterprises directly owns 1,000,000 shares. The Clyde J. Berg Trust owns 666,666 shares of common stock. The
	foregoing persons also own warrants to purchase 2,416,668 shares. Berg & Berg Enterprises also owns 678,751 shares of Series
	AAA Preferred Stock which are convertible into 67,875,100 shares of common stock. In the event the 678,751 shares of Series AAA
	preferred stock is converted, then the beneficial ownership by the Bergs will increase to 144,800,201 shares (46.7%) as a result
	of the issuance of 67,875,100 warrants. The amounts shown in the table and the footnotes reflect the combined ownership of all
	these accounts.





	 


	 


	 








	 



	45



	 







	 




	 




	Securities Authorized for Issuance under Equity Compensation
	Plans.




	 


	The following summary information is as
	of December 31, 2016 and relates to our 2005 Plan and 2009 Plan described elsewhere herein pursuant to which we have granted options
	to purchase our common stock:


	 




	 


	 



	(a)



	 



	(b)



	 



	(c)





	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 







	 



	 



	Plan category



	 



	Number of shares of common stock to be issued upon exercise of outstanding options



	 



	Weighted average exercise price of outstanding options(1)



	 



	Number of securities remaining available for future issuance under equity compensation plans (excluding shares reflected in column (a)(2)






	2005 and 2009 Equity Compensation Plans



	 



	18,315,001



	 



	.41



	 



	5,481,499 (2)






	_____________________






	(1)



	 



	Options are exercisable at a price range of $.10 to $1.20 per share.






	(2)



	 



	We have three stock plans with 24,000,000 shares authorized as of December 31, 2016. We have previously issued 203,500 shares under the Plan.





	 




	Item 13.



	Certain Relationships and Related Transactions
	and Director Independence.



	 


	We describe below all transactions and
	series of similar transactions, other than compensation arrangements, during our last three fiscal years, to which we were a party
	or will be a party in which:


	 




	 



	·




	the amounts exceeded or will exceed $120,000; and





	 




	 



	·




	any of our directors, executive officers or holders of more than 5% of our capital stock, or any member of the immediate family of the foregoing persons, had or will have a direct or indirect material interest.





	 


	Compensation arrangements for our directors
	and named executive officers are described elsewhere in this Form 10-K.


	 



	December 2014 and 2015 Transactions with the Bergs and Berg
	& Berg Enterprises



	 


	In November 2014, Carl
	and Mary Ann Berg 2011 CRT Carl Berg Trustee loaned Mobiquity $1 million. In December 2014, Clyde J. Berg 2011 CRT Carl Berg Trustee
	loaned Mobiquity $1 million. In December 2014, Sherry Berg-Zorn loaned Mobiquity $50,000. An additional $500,000 was loaned in
	January 2015 by the Clyde J. Berg CRT. In February 2015, Berg & Berg Enterprises loaned $850,000 to Mobiquity. On July 31,
	2015, the Company agreed on behalf of the aforementioned debt holders (in anticipation of the $500,000 loan referenced in the next
	paragraph by Berg & Berg Enterprises) that the principal and accrued interest on these Notes aggregating $3.4 million are now
	convertible at $.30 per share. Further, for every $1.00 principal and accrued interest thereon converted, the Note Holder will
	receive a five-year warrant to purchase one share of common stock at an exercise price of $.50 per share. No other securities will
	be issued to the Note Holders upon conversion of their securities.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	46



	 







	 




	 


	Between August and
	October 2015, the Company raised $3,675,000 through the issuance of its unsecured debt. The Company issued 3,675,000 shares of
	Common Stock and warrants to purchase a like number of shares as prepaid interest, exercisable at $.40 per share through August
	31, 2017. Of the $3,675,000, Berg & Berg Enterprises invested $1,000,000. In December 2015, Berg & Berg Enterprises also
	purchased 200,000 shares of the Company’s preferred stock convertible into 10,000,000 shares of common stock with anti-dilution
	protection for 2016.


	 





	Recent Financings



	 


	In 2015
	and 2016, we have completed the various financing summarized below.


	 




	Date


	 


	Dollar Amount


	 


	 


	# of Securities Sold




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	January 2015


	 


	$


	500,000


	 


	 


	Issued two-year promissory note in the principal amount of $500,000




	February 2015


	 


	$


	850,000


	 


	 


	Issued two-year promissory note in the principal amount of $850,000




	March 2015


	 


	$


	500,000


	 


	 


	Issued 1,666,667 common shares and a like number of warrants




	April 2015


	 


	$


	1,710,000


	 


	 


	Issued 5,700,000 common shares and a like number of warrants




	May 2015


	 


	$


	510,000


	 


	 


	Issued 1,700,000 common shares and a like number of warrants




	August/October 2015


	 


	$


	3,675,000


	 


	 


	Issued promissory notes in the principal amount of $3,675,000 and 3,675,000 shares of restricted common stock and warrants to purchase an additional 3,675,000 shares of restricted common stock




	December 2015-

	March 2016


	 


	$


	2,400,000


	 


	 


	Issued 240,000 shares of preferred stock convertible into 12,000,000 shares of common stock with anti-dilution protection for 2016




	April – May 2016


	 


	$


	1,025,000


	 


	 


	Issued convertible promissory notes in the principal amount of $1,025,000, convertible at $.20 per share with 100% warrant coverage.




	Third Quarter

	2016


	 


	$


	700,000


	 


	 


	Issued short term convertible promissory notes in the principal amount oif $700,000 and prepaid interest of 4,900,000 common shares.




	Fourth Quarter

	2016


	 


	$


	595,417


	 


	 


	Exercise of outstanding warrants/options at $.05 per share and issuance of approximately 11,908,335 shares of common stock.





	 



	First Quarter 2017 Loan Agreements
	and Certain Transactions




	 



	Prior to the February
	28, 2017 sale of secured debt, the Company’s holders of all of its Series AA preferred stock and substantially all of its
	outstanding debt both secured and unsecured (approximately $14.5 million) have been converted into equity securities of the Company
	as outlined below. It should be noted that the capital transactions below were based on a premium to the average closing sale price
	of $0.045 per share during the 60 day period prior to February 08, 2017.


	 


	On February 28, 2017,
	the Company entered into an agreement with a two non-affiliated persons to provide $1.6 million of short term secured debt financing
	in three monthly tranches, with the first monthly tranche in the amount of $600,000. The Company will issue in connection with
	each tranche, six-month secured convertible promissory note(s). Each note is initially convertible at $.05 per share. Any prepayment
	of the note requires the payment of a 25% premium and guaranteed interest for the entire six-month note. In the case of default,
	the amount owed by the Company will become 130% of the outstanding principal and accrued interest thereon. The Conversion Price
	will rest in the event that the note is unpaid and in default on the sixth month anniversary date of the issuance of the note.
	In connection with this transaction, the Company agreed to issue an origination fee of 1,600,000 shares of restricted common stock.
	Alexander Capital L.P. acted as Placement Agent and Advisor for this transaction.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	47



	 







	 




	 


	As of April 5, 2017,
	the Company has outstanding 185,201,768 shares of common stock, 1,118,538 shares of newly designated Series AAA preferred stock
	and $1,350,000 of convertible notes. The convertible notes consist of $1,200,000 of secured notes and $150,000 of unsecured notes.
	Of the 1,118,538 shares of Series AAA preferred stock outstanding, 240,000 Series AA preferred stock with an original cost basis
	of $2.4 million were converted into Series AAA preferred stock. The remaining 878,538 shares of Series AAA preferred stock were
	issued in exchange for the conversion of principal and accrued interest of approximately $8,785,380 of unsecured debt. The terms
	of the Series AAA preferred stock can be summarized as follows:


	 


	The price of each preferred
	share may be convertible into common stock with an equivalent purchase price of $.10 per common share. If the preferred shares
	are converted, the subscriber will then receive 100% warrant coverage, with each warrant exercisable at $.05 per share with a cash
	payment to the Company through the close of business on December 31, 2019. The preferred shares have no voting or other preferences
	except as required by law other than the right of conversion described above and a liquidation preference equal to $.01 per share.


	 


	Thomas Arnost, our
	Executive Vice Chairman, and another principal stockholder agreed to convert letters of credit in the principal amount of $2,700,000
	and $322,000 of secured debt into shares of common stock at the then marketing price of $.05 per share. Accrued interest on these
	obligations were either previously converted into our common stock or were upon conversion of the principal, converted into common
	stock at the fair market value of our common stock at each interest accrual date.


	 


	The Company also raised
	an additional $407,084 from the exercise of outstanding warrants and new subscriptions. For these transactions, the Company issued
	8,141,667 shares of common stock.


	 



	Transactions with Thomas Arnost, Executive Chairman




	 



	In December 2013, Thomas
	Arnost, a director of Mobiquity, purchased from TCA Global Credit Master Fund, the Company’s outstanding convertible promissory
	note in the amount of $350,000. Subsequently Mr. Arnost and the Company agreed to fix the conversion price of the note at $.30
	per share, extend the due date of the Note to June 12, 2014, which was subsequently extended to December 22, 2014 and again extended
	to December 31, 2015, subject to Mr. Arnost’s right to call the note at any time in his sole discretion, and increase the
	interest rate to 15% per annum. In December 2015, Mr. Arnost extended the due date of the note to December 31, 2016 and the Company
	agreed to lower the conversion price to $.20 per share.


	 


	Our agreement with
	Simon Properties requires us to maintain letters of credit for each calendar year under the agreement represented by the minimum
	amount of fees due for such calendar year. For 2015 and 2016, the minimum fees of $2.7 million has been secured through two bank
	letters of credit, one of which was issued in the amount of $1,350,000 utilizing the funds and the second letter of credit was
	obtained in the same amount through the funds of Thomas Arnost, our Executive Chairman. In the event Simon draws down upon either
	letter of credit, we have until the next minimum payment date (about 90 days) after the draw down to obtain replacement letters
	of credit. Each person who secured our letters of credit has the opportunity to notify us that they wish to turn the cash funds
	securing the letters of credit over to us and to convert such funds into our common stock. In February 2017, Thomas Arnost agreed
	to convert his $322,000of secured debt and both Mr. Arnost and SNW JR Properties agreed to convert their letters of credit and
	any accrued interest at a conversion price of $.05 per share as to the principal amount and at market price for interest accrued
	at each respective interest accrual date. A total of 36,838,872 shares were issued to Mr. Arnost and 27,779,680 shares were issued
	to SNW JB Properties.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	48



	 







	 




	 



	Executive Compensation




	 



	Please see “Executive Compensation”
	for information regarding compensation of directors and executive officers.


	 



	Employment Agreements




	 



	We have entered into employment agreements
	with Thomas Arnost, Dean L. Julia, and Michael D. Trepeta. These agreements also provide for us to indemnify such officers and/or
	directors to the maximum extent permitted by law. We also carry directors’ and officers’ liability insurance which
	protects each of our officers and directors up to the policy maximum of $4.0 million, subject to a deductible of $100,000 for securities
	claims and $75,000 for other claims. For more information regarding our employment agreements and indemnification provisions, see
	“Executive Compensation.”


	 



	Separation Agreement – Michael
	D. Trepeta




	 



	In April 2017, Michael
	Trepeta entered into a separation agreement with the Company pursuant to which he resigned as an executive officer and director.
	Pursuant to Michael Trepeta’s separation agreement, Mr. Trepeta is entitled to the following benefits:


	 







	·



	Six months’ coverage under the Company’s existing director/officer insurance policy;









	·



	Indemnification per existing employment agreement;









	·



	Expense reimbursement through May 31, 2017;









	·



	All options vested shall continue until their normal expiration date; and









	·



	Mutual releases.





	 




	Policies for Approval of Related Party
	Transactions




	 



	Our board of directors reviews and approves
	transactions with directors, officers and holders of 5% or more of our voting securities and their affiliates, or each, a related
	party. Prior to the filing of this Form 10-K, the material facts as to the related party’s relationship or interest in the
	transaction are disclosed to our board of directors prior to their consideration of such transaction. In connection with the proposed
	offering, we intend to adopt a written related party transactions policy that such transactions must be approved by our audit committee
	or another independent body of our board of directors.


	 



	Director Independence




	 



	Reference is made to “Item 10”
	for details pertaining to the lack of independent directors on the Company’s board of directors as of the filing date of
	this Form 10-K. As the Company has no independent directors as of the filing date of this Form 10-K, it also has no “Financial
	Expert” serving as an independent board member or to form an audit committee.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	49



	 








	 




	 




	Item 14.



	Principal Accountant Fees
	and Services.



	 


	In March, 2015, Sadler, Gibb & Associates,
	LLC became the Company’s public auditors. Their fees are described in the table below.


	 




	 


	 


	Year Ended December 31,


	 






	 


	 


	2015


	 


	 


	2016


	 




	Audit fees


	 


	$


	52,273


	 


	 


	$


	55,000


	 




	Audit- related fees


	 


	 


	34,500


	 


	 


	 


	19,700


	 




	Tax fees


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	All other fees


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	–


	 




	 


	 


	 


	–


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Total fees


	 


	$


	86,773


	 


	 


	$


	74,700


	 






	 




	Policy on Board Pre-Approval of Services
	of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm




	 



	Our Board has responsibility for appointing,
	setting compensation and overseeing the work of the independent registered public accounting firm. In recognition of this responsibility,
	the Board has established a policy to pre-approve all audit and permissible non-audit services provided by the independent registered
	public accounting firm. Prior to engagement of the independent registered public accounting firm for the following year’s
	audit, management will submit to the Board for approval a description of services expected to be rendered during that year for
	each of following categories of services:


	 



	Audit services

	include audit work
	performed in the preparation and audit of the annual financial statements, review of quarterly financial statements, reading of
	annual, quarterly and current reports, as well as work that generally only the independent auditor can reasonably be expected to
	provide, such as the provision of consents and comfort letters in connection with the filing of registration statements.


	 



	Audit-related services

	are for assurance
	and related services that are traditionally performed by the independent auditor, including due diligence related to mergers and
	acquisitions and special procedures required to meet certain regulatory requirements.


	 



	Tax services

	consist principally
	of assistance with tax compliance and reporting, as well as certain tax planning consultations.


	 



	Other services

	are those associated
	with services not captured in the other categories. We generally do not request such services from our independent auditor.


	 


	Prior to the engagement, the Board pre-approves
	these services by category of service. The fees are budgeted, and the Board requires the independent registered public accounting
	firm and management to report actual fees versus the budget periodically throughout the year by category of service. During the
	year, circumstances may arise when it may become necessary to engage the independent registered public accounting firm for additional
	services not contemplated in the original pre-approval. In those instances, the Board requires specific pre-approval before engaging
	the independent registered public accounting firm.


	 


	The Board may delegate pre-approval authority
	to one or more of its members. The member to whom such authority is delegated must report, for informational purposes only, any
	pre-approval decisions to the audit Board at its next scheduled meeting.


	 


	None of the services described above provided
	by our auditors were approved by the Board pursuant to paragraph (c)(7)(i)(C) of Rule 2-01 of Regulation S-X.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	50



	 








	 




	 





	PART IV



	 




	Item 15.



	Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules



	 


	(a)  FINANCIAL STATEMENTS


	 


	The following documents
	are filed under ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS and are included as part of this Form 10-K as the financial statements of the Company
	for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015:




	 




	Reports of Independent
	Registered Public Accounting Firms





	Consolidated
	Balance Sheets


	Consolidated Statements
	of Operations


	Consolidated Statement
	of Stockholders' Deficit


	Notes to Consolidated
	Financial Statements


	 


	(b)  EXHIBITS


	 






	Exhibit




	 


	 






	Number




	 




	Exhibit Title







	3.1



	 



	Certificate of Incorporation filed March 26, 1998 (1)






	3.2



	 



	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation filed June 10, 1999 (1)






	3.3



	 



	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation approved by stockholders in 2005(1)






	3.4



	 



	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation dated September 11, 2008 (11)






	3.5



	 



	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation dated October 7, 2009 (11)






	3.6



	 



	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation dated May 18, 2012 (11)






	3.7



	 



	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation dated September 10, 2013 (17)






	3.8



	 



	Amended By-Laws (1)






	3.9



	 



	2014 Amendment to By-Laws (19)






	3.10



	 



	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation filed December 22, 2015 (23)






	3.11



	 



	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation dated March 24, 2016 (21)






	3.12



	 



	Amendment to Certificate of Incorporation(22)






	4.1



	 



	Registration Rights Agreement (18)






	10.1



	 



	Employment Agreement - Michael Trepeta (2)






	10.2



	 



	Employment Agreement - Dean Julia (2)






	10.3



	 



	Amendments to Employment Agreement - Michael Trepeta (5)(7)






	10.4



	 



	Amendments to Employment Agreement - Dean L. Julia (5)(7)






	10.5



	 



	Joint Venture Agreement with Atrium Enterprises Ltd. (6)






	10.6



	 



	Agreement with Aon Consulting (6)






	10.7



	 



	Amendment to Exhibits 10.3 and 10.4 dated April 7, 2010 (10)






	10.8



	 



	Office Lease for Garden City, NY (11)






	10.9



	 



	Amendment to Employment Agreement – Dean L. Julia (11)






	10.10



	 



	Amendment to Employment Agreement – Michael D. Trepeta (11)






	10.11



	 



	Convertible Promissory Note (12)






	10.12



	 



	Registration Rights Agreement dated June 12, 2012 by and between the company and TCA (13)






	10.13



	 



	Equity Agreement dated June 12, 2012 by and between the company and TCA (13)






	10.14



	 



	Amendment to Dean L. Julia’s Employment Agreement (16)






	10.15



	 



	Amendment to Michael D. Trepeta’s Employment Agreement (16)






	10.16



	 



	Common Stock Purchase Agreement with Aspire Capital (18)






	10.17



	 



	Termination of TCA Registration Rights Agreement and Equity Agreement (18)






	 


	 


	 








	 



	51



	 







	 




	 







	10.18



	 



	Employment Agreement – Sean Trepeta (19)






	10.19



	 



	Employment Agreement – Paul Bauersfeld (19)






	10.20



	 



	Employment Agreement – Thomas Arnost (20)








	10.21



	 



	December 2013 Agreement with Thomas Arnost modifying secured debt purchased by Arnost from TCA (19)






	10.22



	 



	Letter Agreement dated December 9, 2014 with Thomas Arnost to extend expiration date of secured note to December 31, 2015 (19)






	10.23



	 



	Letter Agreement dated July 8, 2013 with Thomas Arnost to provide letter of credit for $1,350,000(19)






	10.24



	 



	Letter Agreement dated July 8, 2013 with SNW Properties to provide letter of credit for $1,350,000(19)






	10.25



	 



	Letter Agreement dated December 15, 2014 with Carl E. Berg (19)






	10.26



	 



	Separation Agreement with Michael D. Trepeta(*)






	10.27



	 



	Form of convertible promissory note. (22)






	11.1



	 



	Statement re: Computation of per share earnings. See Statement of Operations and Notes to Financial Statements






	14.1



	 



	Code of Ethics/Code of Conduct (Incorporated by reference to Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014)






	21.1



	 



	Subsidiaries of the Issuer (15)






	23.1



	 



	Consent of Sadler Gibb (*)






	31.1



	 



	Rule 13a-14(a) Certification in accordance with Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (*)






	31.2



	 



	Rule 13a-14(a) Certification in accordance with Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (*)






	32.1



	 



	Certification pursuant to 18. U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (*)






	32.2



	 



	Certification pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (*)






	99.1



	 



	2005 Employee Benefit and Consulting Services Compensation Plan (2)






	99.2



	 



	Form of Class A Warrant (2)






	99.3



	 



	Form of Class B Warrant (2)






	99.4



	 



	Amendment to 2005 Plan (4)






	99.5



	 



	Form of Class C Warrant (8)






	99.6



	 



	2009 Employee Benefit and Consulting Services Compensation Plan (3)






	99.7



	 



	Form of Class D Warrant (3)






	99.8



	 



	Form or Class E Warrant(9)






	99.9



	 



	Form of Class F Warrant (9)






	99.10



	 



	Form of Class G Warrant (9)






	99.11



	 



	Form of Class H Warrant (9)






	99.12



	 



	Form of Class AA Warrant (11)






	99.13



	 



	Form of Class BB Warrant (11)






	99.14



	 



	Form of Class CC Warrant (19)






	101.INS



	 



	XBRL Instance Document (*)






	101.SCH



	 



	Document, XBRL Taxonomy Extension (*)






	101.CAL



	 



	Calculation Linkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition (*)






	101.DEF



	 



	Linkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension Labels (*)






	101.LAB



	 



	Linkbase, XBRL Taxonomy Extension (*)






	101.PRE



	 



	Presentation Linkbase (*)





	_____________________



	* Filed herewith.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	52



	 







	 




	 







	(1)




	Incorporated by reference to Registrant's Registration Statement on Form 10-SB as filed with the Commission on February 10, 2005.






	(2)




	Incorporated by reference to Registrant’s Registration Statement on Form 10-SB/A filed with the Commission March 18, 2005.






	(3)




	Incorporated by reference to Form 10-K filed for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2009.






	(4)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant's Form 10-QSB/A filed with the Commission on August 18, 2005.






	(5)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant's Form 10-KSB for its fiscal year ended December 31, 2005.






	(6)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant's Form 10-KSB for its fiscal year ended December 31, 2006.






	(7)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant's Form 8-K dated September 21, 2007.






	(8)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant's Form 10-QSB for its quarter ended September 30, 2006.






	(9)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant's Form 10-K for its fiscal year ended December 31, 2010.






	(10)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant’s Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2011.








	(11)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant's Form 10-K for its fiscal year ended December 31, 2012.






	(12)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant’s Form 8-K dated June 14, 2012.






	(13)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant’s Form 8-K dated June 15, 2012.






	(14)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant’s Form 8-K dated June 6, 2013.






	(15)




	Incorporated by reference to the Registrant's Form 10-K for its fiscal year ended December 31, 2013.






	(16)




	Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K filed June 6, 2013.






	(17)




	Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K filed September 11, 2013.






	(18)




	Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K filed April 1, 2014.






	(19)




	Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K filed with the SEC on December 19, 2014.






	(20)


	(21)




	Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K dated December 2, 2014.


	Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K dated March 24, 2016.










	(22)


	Incorporated by reference to Form 8-K dated February 28, 2017.








	(23)


	Incorporated by reference to Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2015.




	 


	(c)  FINANCIAL STATEMENT
	SCHEDULES


	 


	We are not filing any
	financial statement schedules as part of this Form 10-K because such schedules are either not applicable or the required information
	is included in the financial statements or notes thereto.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	53



	 







	 




	 


	 

	 






	SIGNATURES




	 



	Pursuant to the requirements
	Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has caused this Report to be signed on its behalf by
	the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.


	 




	 



	MOBIQUITY TECHNOLOGIES, INC.





	 


	 


	 




	 



	By:




	/s/ Dean L. Julia





	 


	 



	Dean L. Julia,





	 


	 



	Principal Executive Officer





	 


	Dated: Garden City, New York


	April 14, 2017


	 


	Pursuant to the requirements
	of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this Report has been signed below by the following persons on behalf of the Registrant
	and in the capacities and on the dates indicated:


	 





	Signatures



	 



	Title



	 



	Date





	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	/s/ Dean L. Julia



	 



	Principal Executive Officer and Director



	 



	April 14, 2017






	Dean L. Julia  



	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	/s/ Sean McDonnell



	 



	Principal Financial Officer



	 



	April 14, 2017






	Sean McDonnell



	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	/s/ Sean Trepeta



	 



	Director



	 



	April 14, 2017






	Sean Trepeta



	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 





	/s/ Thomas Arnost



	 



	Chairman of the Board



	 



	April 14, 2017






	Thomas Arnost



	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	Dean L. Julia, Sean Trepeta and Thomas
	Arnost represent all the current members of the Board of Directors.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	54



	 


















	Exhibit 10.26



	 






	SEPARATION AGREEMENT AND GENERAL RELEASE




	 


	SEPARATION AGREEMENT
	AND RELEASE dated April 9

	th

	, 2017 (the “

	Agreement

	”) by and among MOBIQUITY TECHNOLOGIES, INC. f/k/a
	Ace Marketing and Promotions, Inc., a New York Corporation (“Mobiquity”), MOBIQUITY NETWORKS INC., a New York Corporation
	(“

	MNI

	”), ACE MARKETING & PROMOTIONS, INC. (“

	Ace

	”), and MICHAEL TREPETA (“

	Trepeta

	”).
	Mobiquity, MNI and Ace are collectively referred to as

	“MOBQ.”



	 


	WHEREAS, Ace and Trepeta
	entered into an agreement on or about March 1, 2005 (the “Original Employment Agreement”) to retain the services of
	Trepeta as an executive officer of Ace; and the employment Agreement between Ace and Trepeta was duly amended on or about September
	21, 2007, April 7, 2010 and January 25

	th

	2013 (the “Employment Agreement Amendments” and together with the
	Original Employment Agreement, the “Employment Agreement”); and


	 


	Whereas, since executing
	the Employment Agreement and all Employment Agreement Amendments, Trepeta has served as an employee, director and officer of Ace
	and Mobiquity; and


	 


	WHEREAS, since approximately
	October 20, 2016, Trepeta has been on medical leave, and has been unable to perform the essential functions of his positions with
	MOBQ;


	 


	NOW THEREFORE, FOR
	GOOD AND VALUABLE CONSIDERATION, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, and the agreements and covenants
	set forth in this Agreement, the parties herby agree as follows:


	 


	1.

	              


	End of Employment

	.


	 


	(a)

	            

	Trepeta and MOBQ mutually agree that Trepeta shall separate from MOBQ and Trepeta’s employment shall end effective
	on the (7

	th

	) day after the date hereof (the “Effective Date”).


	 


	(b)

	            

	As a result of Trepeta separating from MOBQ, Trepeta shall cease to be a director, officer or employee of Mobiquity, and/or
	Ace and/or MOBQ as of the Effective Date.


	 


	(c)

	            

	With the exception of any compensation or benefits provided for by the terms of this Agreement or any vested distribution
	for MOBQ’s 401k (if applicable), Trepeta has received all earned compensation from MOBQ to which he is entitled through the
	Effective Date.	


	 


	(d)

	            

	MOBQ shall continue to cover Trepeta as an insured under MOBQ’s Director and Officer Liability Insurance Policy for
	a period of six (6) six months commencing on the Effective Date.


	 


	(e)

	            

	MOBQ will indemnify, defend and hold harmless Trepeta for any and all allegations, claims, actions, suits, demands, damages,
	liabilities, obligations, losses, settlements, judgments, costs and expenses, (including without limitation attorneys’ fees
	and costs) which arise out of, relate to or result from any act or omission arising out of Trepeta’s performance of his duties
	as a director, officer, or employee of MOBQ during the period of time he was employed by MOBQ, to the extent provided in the Employment
	Agreement. At Trepeta’s request, subject to the consent of MOBQ, which shall not be unreasonably withheld, Trepeta shall
	be afforded separate counsel at MOBQ’s expense designated to Trepeta in connection with any manner for which indemnification
	or insurance may be applicable, if there is a conflict of interest with any other party or parties.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	1



	 







	 




	 


	(f)

	             

	To the extent provided by the federal COBRA law or, if applicable, state insurance laws, and by MOBQ’s current group
	health insurance policies, Trepeta shall be eligible to continue his group health insurance coverage at his own expense.


	 


	(g)

	            

	Trepeta will continue to receive all typical monthly expenses covered by MOBQ through May of 2017 in the same manner as
	provided in the Employment Agreement.


	 


	(h)

	            

	Trepeta is entitled to receive and retain all common stock previously granted to him, and, after the effective date, MOBQ,
	shall ensure all vested options to purchase MOBQ stock held by Trepeta as of the Effective Date to be exercisable pursuant to the
	terms of the stock option agreement(s) under which the options where granted. For the avoidance of doubt, MOBQ confirms that Trepeta
	has the right, pursuant to the terms of such stock option agreements, to exercise such vested options for the remainder of their
	respective original 10 (ten) year terms under such stock option agreement(s). A listing of Trepeta’s stock options grant
	and termination dates can be found in Trepeta’s Securities and Exchange Commission filings on SEC.gov as of the date hereof
	and is attached hereto in Exhibit A.


	 


	(i)

	             

	The MasterCard in Trepeta’s name will be paid off in full as it has been in existence since 1998 and used for the
	benefit of the Company since inception. It has been used for all companies listed in this agreement (MOBQ) and will no longer be
	used for any purposes. All “sub accounts” (Cards issued in any other names connected to the same account) will also
	be discontinued in their use and cancelled.


	 


	(j)

	             

	Trepeta is entitled to keep such devices and phone number(s), payment for such account will become the sole responsibility
	of Trepeta to pay after the monthly expense agreement ending in May 2017.


	 


	(k)

	            

	Trepeta has been notified by MOBQ that he has returned all requested documents and shall have no further obligations to
	return any past documents or items like computers, scanners, printers, faxes, fax machines or any similar items. Trepeta will be
	given the opportunity to retrieve all personal items that have been left at MOBQ offices. Trepeta and MOBQ will coordinate and
	agree upon any time or times that will be needed for Trepeta to come and retrieve such items (personal).


	 




	2.

	              


	Trepeta’s Release of Claims

	. In consideration of MOBQ’s agreements and release hereunder:


	 


	(a)

	            

	Trepeta affirms that Trepeta has not filed, caused to be filed, and/or is not presently party to any claim, complaint, charge,
	or action against MOBQ in any forum or form. As a material term of this Agreement, Trepeta attests that Trepeta has given MOBQ
	written notice of any and all concerns Trepeta may have regarding any ethical or compliance issues or violations on the part of
	MOBQ or any of MOBQ’s employees. In addition, Trepeta affirms that as of the Separation Date, Trepeta reported all hours
	worked, if applicable, and has been paid for and/or received all compensation, wages, overtime, bonuses, commissions, benefits,
	and or other amounts Trepeta may be entitled. Trepeta furthermore affirms that Trepeta has no known workplace injuries or occupational
	diseases.


	 


	(b)

	            

	With the exception of any rights created or confirmed by this agreement or arising in the future, Trepeta hereby irrevocably
	and unconditionally releases and forever discharges MOBQ and its directors, officers, employees, agents and attorneys from any
	and all claims, demands, causes of action, and liabilities of any nature, both past and present, known and unknown, from any act
	or omission of any kind occurring on or before the date of execution of this Agreement which arise under contract or common law,
	or any federal, state or local law, regulation or ordinance. Trepeta understands and agrees that Trepeta’s release of claims
	include, but is not limited to, the following: all claims demands, causes of action, and liabilities for past or future loss of
	pay or benefits, expenses, damages for pain and suffering, punitive damages, compensatory damages, attorney’s fees, interest,
	court costs, physical or mental injury, damage to reputation, and other injury, loss, damage or expense or equitable remedy of
	any kind whatsoever, except as set forth in section 2(d).


	 


	 


	 








	 



	2



	 







	 




	 


	(c)

	            

	Trepeta additionally hereby irrevocably and unconditionally releases and forever discharges MOBQ from any all claims, demands,
	causes of action and liabilities arising out of or in any way connected with, directly or indirectly, Trepeta’s employment
	by MOBQ or any other person, the terms and conditions of Trepeta’s employment, and any and all possible local, state or federal
	statutory and/or common law claims, including by not limited to:


	 


	(i)

	                   

	All claims which Trepeta might have arising under Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended, 42 U.S.C. §
	2000e, et seq.; Civil Rights Act of 1991, 42 U.S.C. § 1981a; 42 U.S.C. § 1981 and § 1988; Trepeta Retirement Income
	Security Act, as amended, 29 U.S.C. § 1001, et seq.; Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as amended, 42 U.S.C. §
	12101, et seq.; Equal Pay Act 1963, as amended, 29 U.S.C. § 206(d), et seq.; The Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, as
	amended, 29 U.S.C. § 2601, et seq.; The Age Discrimination in Employment Act, 29 U.S.C. § 621 et seq.; The Older Worker
	Benefit Protection Act of 1990; The Immigration Reform and Control Act, as amended; The Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification
	Act, 29 U.S.C. et seq.; The Occupational Safety and Health Act, as amended; and/or any applicable or related state law;


	 


	(ii)

	                   

	All claims for any wages, compensation, options, equity benefits, or other employment benefits owed as a result of Trepeta’s
	employment and/or separation from MOBQ;


	 


	(iii)

	                   

	All other claims, whether based on contract, common law, tort (personal injury), or statute, arising from Trepeta’s
	employment, the separation from that employment (including but not limited to workers’ compensation retaliation claims where
	allowed by law), or any investigation and/or interview conducted by or on behalf of MOBQ.


	 


	(d)

	            

	Trepeta does not waive rights or claims which cannot be waived by law. Trepeta understands, agrees and acknowledges that
	the provisions in this Agreement do not prohibit or restrict Trepeta from communicating with the DOJ, SEC, DOL, NLRB, EEOC or any
	other governmental authority, exercising Trepeta’s rights, if any, under the National Labor Relations Act to engage in protected
	concerted activity, making a report in good faith and with a reasonable belief of any violations of law or regulation to a governmental
	authority or cooperating with or participating in a legal proceeding relating to such violations including providing documents
	or other information, provided that by signing this Agreement, Trepeta is waiving rights to individual relief from MOBQ based on
	claims asserted in such a charge or complaint, or asserted by any third party on Trepeta’s behalf, except where such a waiver
	of individual relief is prohibited.


	 




	(e)

	            

	This release covers both claims that Trepeta knows about and those Trepeta may not know about. Trepeta expressly waives
	all rights afforded by any statute which limits the effect of a release with respect to unknown claims. Trepeta understands the
	significance of Trepeta’s release of unknown claims and Trepeta’s waiver of statutory protection against a release
	of unknown claims.


	 


	3.

	              


	MOBQ Release of Trepeta

	.


	 


	(a)

	            

	In consideration of Trepeta’s agreements and release hereunder, MOBQ, its successors and assigns hereby irrevocably
	and unconditionally releases and forever discharges Trepeta from any and all claims, demands, causes of action, and liabilities
	of any nature, both past and present, known and unknown, resulting from any act or omission of any kind occurring on or before
	the date of execution of this Agreement which arise out of Trepeta’s performance of his duties as a director, officer or
	employee of MOBQ during the period of time that he was employed by MOBQ or under the Employment Agreement, the Employment Agreement
	Amendments, or as a result of any other contract or common law, or any federal, state or local law, regulation or ordinance.


	 


	4.

	              


	Other Understandings, Agreements, and Representations

	.


	 


	(a)

	            

	Trepeta agrees that this Agreement binds Trepeta and also binds Trepeta’s spouse, children, heirs, executors, administrators,
	assigns, agents, partners, successors in interest, and all other persons and entities in privity with Trepeta.


	 


	(b)

	            

	MOBQ and Trepeta each promise and represent that they will not make or cause to be made, and MOBQ shall cause its officers
	and directors not to make, any derogatory, negative or disparaging statements, either written or verbal, about the other, provided
	that they may respond accurately and fully to any question, inquiry or request for information when required by legal process.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	3



	 







	 




	 


	(c)

	            

	Trepeta agrees to provide reasonable assistance and cooperation in the operation of MOBQ’s business, including but
	not limited to lawsuits, arbitration proceedings, governmental hearings, investigations or proceedings (collectively, “legal
	proceedings”) in which MOBQ or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates are a party or otherwise involved, as may be requested
	from time to time. By way of example, assistance and cooperation may include: (i) assisting in compiling documents or other data
	in response to MOBQ’s requests for information; (ii) meeting and/or talking with legal counsel of MOBQ from time to time
	to assist in the preparation of arguments and the discovery or compilation of factual matters, and (iii) providing testimony or
	statements in connection with any legal proceedings. MOBQ shall reimburse Trepeta for time actually expended at an hourly rate
	(based upon Trepeta’s base salary as of the last date of his employment) for cooperation that occurs post-employment. MOBQ
	shall also reimburse Trepeta for reasonable out-of-pocket expenses he incurs in connection with any such cooperation.


	 


	(d)

	            

	Prior to execution of this Agreement, Trepeta shall return to MOBQ all property belonging to MOBQ that Trepeta possesses
	or has possessed but has provided to a third party, including but not limited to, all equipment or other materials and all originals
	and copies of MOBQ documents, files, memoranda, notes, computer-readable information (maintained on disk or in any other form)
	and video or tape recordings of any kind other than personal materials relating solely to Trepeta. Trepeta warrants and represents
	that Trepeta has not retained, distributed or caused to be distributed, and shall not retain, distribute or cause to be distributed,
	any original or duplicates of any such MOBQ property specified in this Section.


	 


	(e)

	            

	As of the Effective Date, MOBQ shall close all credit card or loan accounts, including but not limited to the Citibank Master
	Account ending in #

	1463,

	which Trepeta may have personally guaranteed or for which he has financial responsibility.


	 


	(f)

	             

	This Agreement contains the entire understanding between Trepeta and MOBQ, and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings
	relating to the subject matter of this Agreement. This Agreement shall not be modified, amended, or terminated unless such modification,
	amendment, or termination is executed in writing by Trepeta and an authorized representative of MOBQ.


	 




	(g)

	            

	This Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the State of New York without regard to conflict of law principles thereof.


	 


	(h)

	            

	Any disputes that relate in any way to the provisions of this Agreement shall be resolved in the Courts of the State of
	New York in and for Nassau County or Suffolk County, or the federal courts for the Eastern District of New York.


	 


	(i)

	             

	Trepeta may take up to twenty-one (21) days from date of receipt to decide whether to accept this Agreement. Trepeta may
	actually accept and sign this Agreement at any time within this 21-day period, but Trepeta is not required to do so.


	 


	(j)

	             

	If Trepeta has not executed and delivered this Agreement within the 21-day period noted above, this Agreement is deemed
	revoked by MOBQ.


	 


	(k)

	            

	Trepeta may revoke acceptance of this Agreement at any time within seven (7) days after executing the Agreement. Any revocation
	must be made in writing and delivered to Mobiquity Technologies, Inc., 600 Old Country Road, Suite 541, Garden City, NY 11530,
	Attention: Dean Julia, CEO or via email at djulia@mobiquitynetworks.com. Trepeta understands that, unless revoked as described
	above, upon expiration of the seven (7) day period, this Agreement automatically shall take effect and become binding upon Trepeta.
	Trepeta’s choice, at Trepeta’s expense, before signing this Agreement.


	 


	 


	 








	 



	4



	 







	 




	 


	(l)

	             


	Notice Regarding Attorney

	: Trepeta is hereby advised to consult with an attorney of Trepeta’s choice, at Trepeta’s
	expense, before signing this Agreement.


	 


	(m)

	          

	Trepeta understands that nothing in this Agreement is intended to interfere with or deter Trepeta’s right to challenge
	the waiver of a claim under the Age Discrimination in Employment Act (ADEA) or state law age discrimination claim or the filing
	of an ADEA charge or ADEA complaint or state law age discrimination complaint or charge with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission
	or any state discrimination agency or commission or to participate in any investigation or proceeding conducted by those agencies.
	Further, Trepeta does not agree to ratify any ADEA or state law age discrimination waiver that fails to comply with the Older Workers’
	Benefit Protection Act by retaining the money received under the Agreement. Further, nothing in this Agreement is intended to require
	the payment of damages, attorneys’ fees or costs to MOBQ should Trepeta challenge the waiver of an ADEA or state law age
	discrimination claim or file an ADEA or state law age discrimination suit except as authorized by federal or state law.


	 


	Notwithstanding the
	foregoing paragraph, Trepeta agrees to waive any right to recover monetary damages in any charge, complaint, or lawsuit against
	MOBQ filed by Trepeta or by anyone else on Trepeta’s behalf pertaining to the preceding paragraph.


	 


	(n)

	            

	Should any provision in this Agreement or any provision of any agreement incorporated or referenced herein be declared or
	determined by any court to be illegal or invalid, the validity of the remaining parts, terms, or provisions shall not be affected,
	and the illegal or invalid part, term, or provision shall not be a part of this Agreement and any court of competent jurisdiction
	may release such illegal or invalid part, term or provision, to the maximum extent enforceable as near as possible to the parties’
	intent herein.


	 


	(o)

	            

	This Agreement may be executed in counterparts, a counterpart transmitted via electronic means, and all executed counterparts,
	when taken together, shall constitute sufficient proof of the parties’ entry into this Agreement. The parties agree to execute
	any further or future documents which may be necessary to allow the full performance of this Agreement. Signatures on this Agreement
	in .pdf format or delivered electronically or via facsimile have the effect of original signatures.


	 


	(p)

	            

	Trepeta represents and certifies that Trepeta: (i) has received a copy of this Agreement for review and study and has had
	ample time to review it before signing; (ii) has read this Agreement carefully; (iii) has been given a fair opportunity to discuss
	and negotiate the terms of this Agreement; (iv) understands its provisions; (v) has been advised to consult with an attorney; (vi)
	has determined that it is in Trepeta’s best interest to enter into this Agreement; (vii) has not been influenced to
	sign this Agreement by any statement or representation by MOBQ not contained in this Agreement; and (viii) enters into this Agreement
	knowingly and voluntarily.


	 








	(q)


	EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT
	MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT OR THE
	TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY). EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO
	REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HERETO HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO
	WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES
	HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION
	4(p).




	 


	 


	 


	[

	Rest of page intentionally
	left blank. Signature page follows.

	]


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	5



	 







	 




	 



	IN WITNESS WHEREOF

	, the undersigned
	have executed, or have caused to be duly executed, this Agreement as of the dates set forth below under their respective names.


	 


	 





	 




	MICHAEL TREPETA





	 


	 


	 




	 


	Date:


	 




	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 




	 



	MOBIQUITY TECHNOLOGIES, INC.





	 


	 


	 




	 


	By:


	 




	 


	 


	Name: ___________________________________




	 


	 


	Title: ___________________________________




	 


	 


	Date: ___________________________________




	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 




	 



	MOBIQUITY NETWORKS, INC.





	 


	 


	 




	 


	By:


	 




	 


	 


	Name: ___________________________________




	 


	 


	Title: ___________________________________




	 


	 


	Date: ___________________________________




	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 




	 



	ACE MARKETING PROMOTIONS, INC.





	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	Name: ___________________________________




	 


	 


	Title: ___________________________________




	 


	 


	Date: ___________________________________






	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	6



	 







	 




	 





	EXHIBIT A




	 




	Trepeta Options



	 






	Option Grant Date






	Number of Shares






	Option Termination Date







	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 





	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	7



	 














	Exhibit 23.1


	 




Click to enlarge
	 


	 




	 





	CONSENT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC
	ACCOUNTING FIRM



	 


	To the Board of Directors


	Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.


	 



	We
	hereby consent to the incorporation by reference into the Registration Statements (Registration No. 333-124185 and 333-128673)
	on Form S-8 of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc., of our report dated April 14 2017, with respect to the consolidated financial statements
	of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. for the years ended December 31, 2016 and 2015, appearing in this Annual Report on Form
	10-K of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. for the year ended December 31, 2016.



	 



	/s/ Sadler, Gibb & Associates, LLC



	 


	Salt Lake City, UT


	April 14, 2017














	Exhibit 31.1




	 






	CERTIFICATION PURSUANT TO




	RULES 13a-14(a) AND 15d-14(a) UNDER THE
	SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, AS AMENDED




	 






	I, Dean L. Julia certifies that:





	 


	 





	1.




	I have reviewed this annual report on Form 10-K of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.;





	 


	 





	2




	Based on my knowledge, this report does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which such statements were made, not misleading with respect to the period covered by this report;





	 


	 





	3.




	Based on my knowledge, the consolidated financial statements, and other financial information included in this report, fairly present in all material respects the financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the registrant as of, and for, the periods presented in this report;





	 


	 





	4.




	The registrant’s other certifying officer and I are responsible for establishing and maintaining disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)) and internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) for the registrant and have:





	 


	 




	 



	a)




	Designed such disclosure controls and procedures, or caused such disclosure controls and procedures to be designed under our supervision, to ensure that material information relating to the registrant, including its consolidated subsidiaries, is made known to us by others within those entities, particularly during the period in which this report is being prepared;





	 


	 




	 



	b)




	Designed such internal control over financial reporting, or caused such internal control over financial reporting to be designed under our supervision, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of consolidated financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;





	 


	 




	 



	c)




	Evaluated the effectiveness of the registrant’s disclosure controls and procedures and presented in this report our conclusions about the effectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures, as of the end of the period covered by this report based on such evaluation; and





	 


	 




	 



	d)




	Disclosed in this report any change in the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the registrant’s fourth fiscal quarter that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting; and





	 


	 





	5.




	The registrant’s other certifying officer and I have disclosed, based on our most recent evaluation of internal control over financial reporting, to the registrant’s auditors and the audit committee of registrant’s board of directors:





	 


	 




	 



	a)




	All significant deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal control over financial reporting which are reasonably likely to adversely affect the registrant’s ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information; and





	 


	 




	 



	b)




	Any fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting.





	 


	Date: April 14, 2017


	 





	/s/ Dean L. Julia



	 





	Principal Executive Officer



	 





	 


	 


	 








	 



	 



	 






	 













	Exhibit 31.2




	 






	CERTIFICATION PURSUANT TO




	RULES 13a-14(a) AND 15d-14(a) UNDER THE
	SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934, AS AMENDED




	 






	I, Sean McDonnell certifies that:





	 


	 





	1.




	I have reviewed this annual report on Form 10-K of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.;





	 


	 





	2




	Based on my knowledge, this report does not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which such statements were made, not misleading with respect to the period covered by this report;





	 


	 





	3.




	Based on my knowledge, the consolidated financial statements, and other financial information included in this report, fairly present in all material respects the financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the registrant as of, and for, the periods presented in this report;





	 


	 





	4.




	The registrant’s other certifying officer and I are responsible for establishing and maintaining disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)) and internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) for the registrant and have:





	 


	 




	 



	a)




	Designed such disclosure controls and procedures, or caused such disclosure controls and procedures to be designed under our supervision, to ensure that material information relating to the registrant, including its consolidated subsidiaries, is made known to us by others within those entities, particularly during the period in which this report is being prepared;





	 


	 




	 



	b)




	Designed such internal control over financial reporting, or caused such internal control over financial reporting to be designed under our supervision, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of consolidated financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;





	 


	 




	 



	c)




	Evaluated the effectiveness of the registrant’s disclosure controls and procedures and presented in this report our conclusions about the effectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures, as of the end of the period covered by this report based on such evaluation; and





	 


	 




	 



	d)




	Disclosed in this report any change in the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the registrant’s fourth fiscal quarter that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting; and





	 


	 





	5.




	The registrant’s other certifying officer and I have disclosed, based on our most recent evaluation of internal control over financial reporting, to the registrant’s auditors and the audit committee of registrant’s board of directors:





	 


	 




	 



	a)




	All significant deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or operation of internal control over financial reporting which are reasonably likely to adversely affect the registrant’s ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information; and





	 


	 




	 



	b)




	Any fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting.





	 


	Date: April 14, 2017


	 





	/s/ Sean McDonnell



	 





	Principal Financial Officer



	 





	 


	 


	 


	 






	 



	 



	 



















	Exhibit 32.1




	 






	CERTIFICATION PURSUANT TO




	18 U.S.C. SECTION 1350




	 



	In connection with the Annual Report of Mobiquity Technologies,
	Inc. (the “registrant”) on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016 as filed with the Securities and Exchange
	Commission on the date hereof (the “report”), I, Dean L. Julia, Principal Executive Officer of the registrant, certify,
	pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 1350, as adopted pursuant to § 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, that to my knowledge:


	 


	(1) The report fully complies with the requirements of section
	13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended; and


	 


	(2) The information contained in the report fairly presents,
	in all material respects, the financial condition and results of operations of the registrant.


	 


	April 14, 2017


	 





	/s/ Dean L. Julia



	 





	Principal Executive Officer



	 





	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	 



	 






	 













	Exhibit 32.2




	 






	CERTIFICATION PURSUANT TO




	18 U.S.C. SECTION 1350




	 



	In connection with the Annual Report of
	Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (the “registrant”) on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016 as filed with
	the Securities and Exchange Commission on the date hereof (the “report”), I, Sean McDonnell, Principal Financial Officer
	of the registrant, certify, pursuant to 18 U.S.C. § 1350, as adopted pursuant to § 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002,
	that to my knowledge:


	 


	(1) The report fully complies with the requirements of section
	13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended; and


	 


	(2) The information contained in the report fairly presents,
	in all material respects, the financial condition and results of operations of the registrant.


	 


	April 14, 2017


	 





	/s/ Sean McDonnell



	 





	Principal Financial Officer



	 





	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 








	 



	 



	 






	 













Mobiquity Technologies Inc. (via Public) / Mobiquity Networks Joins PlaceWise Media’s Active Shopper Exchange (ASX)



























                        Hello .
                    


 Taiwan 







News


International News


Education


Environment


Healthcare


Technology


Internet




Science


Social and Non-Profit


Local News




Politicsand Policy


Government


Politics


Local Government


International Policy




Businessand Economy


Economy


Finance


Stock Markets




Jobs and Labor


Company News


Industry News


Aerospace


Agriculture


Chemicals


Commodities


Construction


Consumer Electronics


Defense


Energy


Nuclear Energy


Oil and Gas


Renewable Energy




Financial Services


Banking


Insurance




Fishing and Aquaculture


Manufacturing


Information Technology


Metals and Mining


Pharmaceuticals and Biotechnology


Real Estate


Professional and Business Services


Legal




Telecommunications


Tobacco


Retail


Transportation


Air Transportation


Maritime Transportation


Rail Transportation


Road Transportation




Utilities


Forestry and Wood Industry






Artsand Culture


Art


Books and Literature


Entertainment


Cinema


Media


Radio and Television




Music






Lifestyleand Leisure


Automotive


Home and Garden


Fashion and Luxury


Clothing and Textile




Food


Travel and Hospitality


Boating and Yachting




Sports


Baseball


Basketball


Boxing


Cricket


Cycling


Football (American)


Football (Australian)


Football (Soccer)


Golf


Hockey


Racing


Rugby


Sailing


Skiing and Winter Sports


Tennis


Volleyball











noodls browser compatibility check

The security settings of your browser are blocking the execution of scripts.
To use noodls, javascript support must be enabled. Please change your browser's security settings to enable javascript.
If you have changed your browser's security settings, you can click here.






related announcements
Finance


GM - General Motors Company
Equinox, Acadia, Envision and XT5 Achieve Best July Ever


Oxford Bank Corporation
Oxford Bank Corporation Announces Second Quarter 2017 Operating Results[...]


Windstream Holdings Inc.
Windstream adds improved customer experience and network connectivity[...]


More
Stock Markets


C.H. Robinson Worldwide Inc.
Indo-American Chamber of Commerce Honors C.H. Robinson with Corporate[...]


QTS Realty Trust Inc.
QTS Achieves Eight Consecutive Years of Five 9s Facility Uptime Performance


Cedar Fair LP
Cedar Fair Conference Call Notice


More











search






















Mobiquity Technologies Inc.



27/04/2017 | Press release | Distributed by Public on 27/04/2017 20:32
Mobiquity Networks Joins PlaceWise Media’s Active Shopper Exchange (ASX)








April 27th, 2017
         By Mobiquity Networks|
      

        NEW YORK, NY April 27, 2017 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) - Mobiquity Networks, a mobile location data and marketing company and wholly owned subsidiary of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (OTCQB: MOBQ), has announced an agreement with PlaceWise Media to join the Active Shopper Exchange (ASX).
      

        Mobiquity Networks provides precise, unique, and at-scale location-based data and insights on consumers' real world behavior and trends for use in marketing and research and PlaceWise is the leading provider of digital media services to the shopping center industry. In March of this year, PlaceWise released ASX, a retail shopper data exchange that enables retailers, brands, and shopping centers to share data and deliver highly contextual and personalized experiences for shoppers who are actively in-market using web, mobile, social and display media.
      

        With PlaceWise constantly working to enhance their unique data assets within ASX, this new relationship with Mobiquity adds accurate, scalable, and valuable location and behavioral data to ASX.
      

        'We believe our mall and retail partners already benefit from the unique geo-behavioral insights that our data provides,' said Jeff Fraser, PlaceWise's VP of Sales. 'Mobiquity takes it to the next level.'
      

        'Our exclusive mall and premium outlet data sets have delivered significant ROI to our customers for some time now,' said Sean Trepeta, President of Mobiquity Networks. 'We are proud to make our data and analysis a part of ASX's unique industry offering and contribute to the exchange in meaningful ways.'
      

About Mobiquity Technologies:
        Mobiquity Networks, a wholly owned subsidiary of Mobiquity Technologies, Inc. (OTCQB: MOBQ), is a next generation mobile location data and marketing company. The company provides precise, unique, at-scale location based data and insights on consumer's real world behavior and trends for use in marketing and research. With our combined exclusive data sets of mall and premium outlet beacon data, and first party location data via our advanced SDK; Mobiquity Networks provides one of the most accurate and scaled solution for mobile data collection and analysis. For more information visit www.mobiquitynetworks.com


About PlaceWise Media:
        PlaceWise has been the leading provider of digital services to the shopping center industry since 1997. Delivering over 200 million digital shopper engagements per year on behalf its over 800 shopping center clients, PlaceWise is the trusted third party provider of digital services in this industry. PlaceWise uses digital technology to drive local shoppers to their local shopping center. For more information, visit www.placewise.com


        SAFE HARBOR STATEMENT UNDER THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995.
        Certain statements in this press release constitute 'forward‐looking statements' within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Such forward‐looking statements involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors which may cause the actual results, performance or achievements of the company to be materially different from any future results, performances or achievements express or implied by such forward‐looking statements. The forward‐looking statements are subject to risks and uncertainties including, without limitation, changes of competition, possible loss of customers, and the company's ability to attract and retain key personnel.
      

Media Contacts:


        Mobiquity Technologies, Inc.
        Sean Trepeta
        (516) 256‐7766 x210
[email protected]


        PlaceWise Media
        Hannah Rogers
[email protected]
        Marketing Content & PR Manager
      













Sharing and Personal Tools

Please select the service you want to use:

Newsvine
Digg
Delicious
StumbleUpon
Technorati
Buzz
Favorites
Google Reader





Public link

Please use the above public link if you want to share this noodl on another website.


Close





Smartlinks
| Mobiquity Technologies Inc.
| Finance
| Stock Markets
| Security Markets
| Stock Markets
| Security Markets
| Company News
| Financial Services
| Information Technology
| Telecommunications Services
| Retail
| Advertising Companies
| OTC Markets




 Back


 View original format











Copyright ©2006-2017 Public Technologies Inc.  | 
Privacy Policy | Terms of Use | Contact




